Vol. II. 2
CLINTON BRADSHAW. CHAPTER I.
Old
Mr. Bradshaw, intended having a survey
made of the boundaries of the Purchase, as one of
his neighbours, who was a testy, litigious character,
seemed anxious to create a dispute on the subject,
alleging that Mr. Bradshaw's fence encroached
considerably on his property. Clinton had
promised
his father that he would attend the survey,
and the day after the incidents recorded in the last
chapter, the old gentleman entered his son's office,
and told him the surveyers and neighbours were
to meet that day at the Purchase, and he had come
in for him.
I must see Mr. Shaffer first, father, said
Bradshaw, concerning a case that may come up
in the criminal court, as the grand jury have
met.
I will wait here, then, till you return, my son.
Neighbour Styles talks a great deal touching that
boundary line; and I wish you to attend.
Bradshaw found Mr. Shaffer in the criminal
court. The judge had just concluded his charge
to the grand jury, and they were retiring.
Bradshaw stated to Mr. Shaffer his father's wish,
and asked him, if he had learned any thing of Jane
Durham's case.
You've put me on a strong scent, my young
friend, said Shaffer. I've been pumping
Johnson
on the subject, and old Moll. It's a foul
business
,
I believebut I'll manage it. You can go in
the country, and no fear for your fair client. Let
me see: this is Tuesdaynothing will be done in
her case this week. You had better go in the
country and take a little fresh air. You look thin,
my young friend.
I shall be in town, said Bradshaw, the day
after
to-morrow. If you should have business at the
jail, Mr. Shaffer, do have some conversation with
Jane Durham.
It is my intention, my young friendit is my
intention. Acting in my capacity, Mr. Bradshaw,
proceedings should not be had against so young and
interesting a woman, as you represent this one to
be, without due deliberation.
If any thing of importance against her should
turn up, Mr. Shaffer, in my absence, will you do
me the favour to inform me of the fact, by note?
Send it to Jackson's livery stable, with directions
to have it sent out to me immediately, and your
order
will be obeyed.
I will, my young friend. You need have no
fear in the case. There has been foul play, and it
must be ferreted out. Mr. Bradshaw, you must
shake the dust of the city, and of your law books,
off of you, when you get into the country, and
give yourself an airing. You look thin, my young
friend, quite thin, and sallow. Too much study is
a mistaken notion, sirentirely a mistaken notion.
The brain's like the body, sir: fatigue it, and it
cannot do as much work as when it was fresh; and
this is most particularly the case, if the body that
furnishes the brain with blood happens to be none
of the strongest.
Bradshaw bid Shaffer good morning, and
hurried
to his office. Writing on a card where he had
gone, and when he would return, he stuck it on his
door with wafers, and entered the chaise with his
father. In their way out, they drove by the jail,
where Bradshaw stopped a moment, informed Jane
Durham where he was going, and told her that
she had better speak freely of her case to Mr.
Shaffer
.
On Wednesday, the neighbours and surveyors
met, and, notwithstanding long rigmarole remarks
from farmer Styles, who was a bit of a scamp, the
surveying progressed rapidly. On Thursday and
Friday, however, it rained in torrents, and the
party
did not go out. Saturday morning they
commenced
again; when, near mid-day, as they were
running the line through a wood, a horseman came
bounding across one of Mr. Bradshaw's freshly
sowed fields, that was skirted by the wood, and
exclaimed, as soon as he got within hearing of
Clinton
Bradshaw
Squire, there's one of your cases called upa
gal for murder. She was in the bar when I left.
She begged and prayed so to see you, that I rode
in a great hurry. She said she would pay me. Do
you know if she has money, squire? Nancy said she
would pay if the gal didn't. Here's a writing the
gal sent you. She's mightily skeered.
Bradshaw hastily snatched the note from the
constable, and read as follows, in a hand scarcely
legible
Mr. Bradshaw: They have me in court for the
murder. For mercy's sake, come to me.
Jane Durham
.
Bradshaw started, in utter astonishment! He
could learn nothing from the officer, except that
she was arraigned for the murder, and she wanted
to see him.
Is it possible, said Bradshaw, that Shaffer
has done this?
Mr. Shaffer's not in town, sir, said the officer.
He got word, last Tuesday afternoon, that his
brother, who lives some fifty miles up the country,
was taken suddently sick. He posted right off to
see him, and left Mr. Scrags to attend to the state's
business. Scrags had the indictment found the
next day; and, this morning, he sent right over to
the jail for her, and said she must be tried, whether
or no, right off. The poor gal's frightened woful.
When they put her in the bar, she fainted. They
recovered her, read the indictment to hershe
pled `not guilty.' The Judge asked her if she
had a lawyer, and she said, you. I asked her
where you were, and she told me you was here.
She said she could git money to pay me, and I
bolted right off.
Bradshaw told his father, he must leave him
instantly
,
and hurried to the stable for his horse.
He mounted, and rode rapidly to town,
accompanied
by the officer, from whom he could learn
nothing
more than what he had already
communicated
.
The first object that met Bradshaw's eye
as he hurried into court, was Jane Durham at the
bar, with her hair loose about her head, and her
eye fixed on the door with a vacant stare.
After
a moment's bewilderment, she recognised
Bradshaw
,
and starting up, exclaimed, in accents that
went to the heart of every one present.
Mr. Bradshaw, Oh! I am not guilty.
She would have fallen prostrate on the floor, if
one of the officers of the court had not caught her.
She's his Miss, I expect, said one of the crowd
to another.
Likely, said the other, who was a frequenter
of such places as Dean'sshe feels bad for
herself
;
but if she killed a man who was just seeking
his pleasure, she deserves what she'll git.
The Judge, in sharp accents, said to Bradshaw,
as he entered, Mr. Bradshaw, the court have
waited for you, sir.
Bradshaw told the court, that he was entirely
taken by surprise, in the casedid not know that
there was even an indictment found, and from a
conversation with Mr. Shaffer, he
May it please your honour, exclaimed Scrags,
jumping up, and interrupting Bradshaw, I stand
in the place of the state's attorneythis
indictment
has been found, now, three daysthe
counsel
for the prisoner has never asked for a copy of
it, nor had any witnesses summoned; he knows the
law, sir.
Bradshaw here rose to explain to the Judge
what had transpired between Mr. Shaffer and
himself, but the Judge interrupted him.
Mr. Scrags acts for the state's attorney, Mr.
Bradshaw: he tells the court, this is the only
indictment
that has been foundthe court must
either go on with this case or adjourn. What
witnesses
have you, sir?
Bradshaw here spoke to Jane Durham, and
requested
her to take a seat by him. She did so.
He asked her if she had any witnesses.
None, whatever, sirnone, but God!
Is there any one, who, you have reason to
believe
,
would be of service to you? If there is, you
can make a deposition to that effect, and I can
have the case put off.
No, Mr. Bradshaw, I have nonenot oneI
know not a soul, that I saw there, but old Moll,
and she's against me.
That you saw
where?
asked Bradshaw.
At a place they call Dean's.
Bradshaw spoke to Mr. Scrags, and asked him
if he would not consent to have the case put off
till the return of Shaffer.
Till the return of Shaffer! why, Mr.
Bradshaw
,
Mr. Shaffer deems me competent to attend
to this business, sir, or he would not have
requested
me to do so.
Bradshaw here addressed the court, told them
he was entirely taken by surprise, and wanted
time to prepare for trial, and arrange his thoughts
on the subject.
Why, Mr. Bradshaw, said the Judge, if you
had any legal reason for continuing the casethe
court would grant itbut it seems the prisoner has
no witnessesand a gentleman of your capacity
does not want any time to prepare on the
testimony
of the state's witnessesif you do, there will
be time enough to apply for it when you have
heard the testimony: you have no legal grounds
for a continuance, sir; and as there is no other
case that we could call up in its place, if the
state's attorney insists upon going on with this,
you have no alternative.
Mr. Scrags arose, and said he must insist upon
going on with the case. It is a very plain
one, I assure your honour, said he; the prisoner
is indicted in the first degree.
The court ordered the jury to be sworn.
Bradshaw
did not challenge any of the panel, but sat
anxiously conversing with Jane Durham.
After the jury were sworn, Scrags arose and
stated to them that the young woman, Jane
Durham
,
was indicted for an offence which involved
her life; and that he would prove, by three
witnesses
,
that, on the evening of , at a ball, at
Dean's, a house of notorious character, the prisoner
at the bar quarrelled with a man named Israel
Carpenter, a stranger, whom she had allured to the
place, and struck him several blows over the head
with a large club, and stabbed him repeatedlyof
which wounds he died. The speaker here went
into a disquisition on the enormity of the offence,
and the necessity of making an example of some
one, in those times of frequent crime.
The first person called to the stand was old Moll.
She appeared sober, and in a reckless, impudent
manner, stated that she was at Dean's ball, and
saw Jane Durham. That very 'oman, said she,
pointing to her, hit the man, with a club, over
the head; and stab him with a dirk she snatched
out of somebody's hand.
While Moll was giving in her testimony,
Bradshaw
observed Fritz in the crowd, and called him.
He conversed with him several minutes, when Fritz
left the court. As Fritz left, old Job, the jailer,
entered, puffing and blowing, with his daughter
Lucy by his side. Bradshaw spoke apart with
Job, while Jane Durham, imploringly, beckoned
Lucy to her. Jane was seated at the trial table,
beside Bradshaw, and poor Lucy hesitated to enter
the railing, when Nancy, who came in at this
moment
,she
had been going in and out all the time,
took her by the hand, and led her to Jane
Durham
.
Take a seat by the poor thing, whispered
Nancy, and comfort her.
Oh! Lucy! Lucy! won't you stay with me till
it is all over, asked Jane Durham of the jailer's
daughter; and she threw her arms round her neck,
while such heavy sobs, which she in vain tried
to suppress, broke from her bosom, that the Judge
said they had better conduct the prisoner to the
window, a moment and throw it open. Old Moll
was ordered to take a seat. Nancy and Lucy
Vol. II. 3
supported Jane Durham to the window. The
apple
woman then made her way through the crowd,
and soon returned with a glass of wine and water,
which she insisted upon Jane Durham's drinking.
Don't be cast down, dear, said she, don't be
cast down, it may turn out better than ye think.
Nancy wished to comfort her, but she felt there
was little ground. Lucy stood by her side,
holding
one of Jane's hands in both of hers; which she
patted with her own, with a quick, unconscious
motion, while the tears rolled down her cheeks.
Bradshaw said not a word to any one, but
walked up and down the space between the seats
of the lawyers and the little box, in which the
prisoner
generally sat, with so dark a brow that no
one interrupted him. He spoke a few moments
with Job, and while conversing with him, he met
the gaze of Johnson, the watchman, who turned
away his head the moment he caught Bradshaw's
eye.
The court now ordered the case to be resumed.
Jane Durham, much more composed, took her seat
by Bradshaw, with Lucy by her side. Old Moll
went through her testimony. Have you any
questions to ask this witness, Mr. Bradshaw?
asked Scrags.
None, sir, replied Bradshaw.
Bradshaw is conducting his case very strangely,
whispered one of the old practitioners to another;
why don't he have the witnesses examined apart?
I suspect that it is so bad a case that he dares not
cross-examine. The girl don't look like a
murderess
.
I would cross-examine if I were her
counsel
.
Call your next witness, Mr. Scrags, said
Bradshaw.
Henry Adams! called out Scrags.
Jane Durham started up like a deer, when the
ball of the hunter enters its heart, and looked
wildly round. Her bonnet had been taken off at
the window, by Lucy; and the start, and an ashy
paleness that accompanied it, were observed by all.
Lucy spoke gently to her; and, as if unconsciously,
she resumed her seat, pale as marble, and as
statue-like
.
The impression, against their wishes, was
produced
upon the audience by Jane Durham's manner,
that she was guilty. Adams had one of his hands in a
sling; and he limped considerably, as he approached
the witness stand. With a fiendish smile he looked
first at Bradshaw, and then at Jane Durham,
before
he faced the jury.
Adams related, with regard to the murder, just
what Scrags had said he could prove. Bradshaw,
when Adams had gone through his examination in
chief, said he had no question to ask.
The court, as well as the bar, was surprised at
his conduct; but he seemed not to notice it, and
spoke to no one around him.
The physicians, who examined the dead body,
gave in their testimony; they stated, that there
were two wounds on the head of the deceased,
either of which would have caused death: both
fractured his skull terribly.
I have but one more witness to examine, may
it please your honour, said Scrags, rubbing his
hands; call Johnson, the watchman, Mr. Clerk, if
you please.
Johnson, as he passed Scrags, whispered, Don't
you think it will do without my testimony?
Oh, no! said Scrags, we must clinch the nail.
Johnson took his station on the stand, and braced
himself against the railing.
He stated, that hearing an uproar at the Dean's
ball-room, as he went his rounds, he entered to
quiet it, and there saw Jane Durham, &c.
swearing
almost with verbal exactness, to what the
other witnesses had sworn.
Shall Johnson quit the stand, Mr. Bradshaw,
asked Scraggs, exultingly, or have you any
questions
,
sir?
No, questions sir, said Bradshaw.
Have you any witnesses, sir?
Yes, sir; I believe I will examine you first, Mr.
Scrags.
Examine me, sir! exclaimed Scrags. Why,
Mr. Bradshaw, I know nothing of this business.
What do I know?
I want your answers, under oath, Mr. Scrags.
May it please your honour, said Scrags,
addressing
the court, I know nothing in the world
of this business. Is it proper to examine me, who
officiates here for the state's attorney?
Certainly it is, said the judge; the state's
attorney might be himself examined, and I see
not why you may not be examined, Mr. Scrags.
If an illegal question is put to you, you need not
answer it. Be sworn, sir.
Scrags was accordingly sworn; his manner was
very much confused. As he took the stand, he
threw a furtive glance on Johnson and Adams,
while they, evidently with the greatest anxiety,
were observing him.
Mr. Scrags, when did Johnson first speak to
you about this case? asked Bradshaw.
He spoke to me about it last week, sir.
When did he give you a deed of his house
and lot, sir?
Scrags started, and looked at Johnson, while
Johnson as intently looked at him.
Speak out, sir, said Bradshaw, in a
commanding
tone.
This morning, muttered Scrags.
He gave you a deed of his house and lot this
morning! For what professional service was that
deed given?
Scrags hesitated a long time. He then turned
to the court, and said it was for professional
advice
and
he was bound not to expose the
business
of his clients.
Sit down, Mr. Scrags, said Bradshaw.
Johnson, take the stand a moment.
Johnson, with a countenance as full of terror
as it ever had been of audacity, took the stand.
There was a breathless silence in the court room,
which had now become crowded, the report having
gone through the city, that a trial for murder was
going on.
Don't criminate yourself, Johnson, said
Scrags, to the watchman, as the latter passed near
him, in a voice which was meant to be a whisper,
but which burst out in a tone loud enough to be
3*
heard over the whole court, in spite of himself.
Every one looked astonished. The judge, in
expectation
of some startling development, said
nothing
.
Bradshaw began by asking Johnson
questions
concerning the murder. In his answers, the
watchman contradicted himself at every step
his perjury was apparent to allbig drops stood
upon his forehead,while in the very height of
this mental torture, Bradshaw changed the nature
of his questions, and asked him
How many blows did you strike the man
under
the lamp?
What man?
Carpenter, the dead man, whom you accuse
this young woman of murderingout with itI
know it all, Johnson, as well as Mr. Scrags.
Then, Scrags is an infernal scoundrel if he
told you! exclaimed Johnson, hardly knowing
what he said.
May it please the court, said Bradshaw,
rising, the business of to-day may well astonish.
I was ignorant when I entered the court of much
of what I have since learnedthough I was
satisfied
that this young woman was innocent.
Johnson
murdered the man Carpenterhe suborned
these two witnesses, old Moll and Adamsand
he bribed Mr. Scrags to bring the case on in the
absence of Mr. Shaffer. This I shall prove by
the testimony of Joseph Presley, the jailer, and
the reverend Mr. Norris, the chaplain of the
prison
,
and by the testimony of an individual at the
jail, who overheard a conversation between old
Moll and Johnson the day old Moll appeared
before
Squire Bailley. And, by two whom I
expect
here momently, I will show that Johnson,
not only by his own confession, but by the
evidence
of others, is the murdererothers, who saw
him do the deed. Mr. Clerk, please to swear Mr.
Presley. Job, tell the jury what you know
concerning
this business.
Why, do you see, gentlemen and the court,
said Job, I'll jist tell all I know about it in my
own way, if you'll let me. When this poor girl was
brought to jail, I didn't think her guilty, nor did
Squire Bradshaw. Old Moll treated her so bad in
jail, that I know she had a spite agin her. Mr.
Scrags came over to the jail, and had a talk with
Molland you know I couldn't refuse him,
because
he wanted to see her as a lawyer. But I
kept my eye on himand him and Johnson came
there one day, and asked to see Adamsso I told
'em I would bring him out into a roomthe room's
got a thin petition, though it seems thickand
you can see through it in two places, from the
room that jines it, that's dark. Well, I jist took
Adams into that roomthey said they wanted to see
him aloneso I left 'em alone. But I told Parson
Norris the circumstanceand I told him,
according
to human natur, them men was plotting
villanny
because
Adams had been so hurt by Squire
Bradshaw when the squire saved the gal, Jane
Durham
,
from him, that he could scarcely move in his
cell; and when I told him that Johnson and Scrags
wanted to see him, though it pained him every step
he took, he went to the room. Well, the Parson
and I went into the room that jinesand we heard
them talkingJohnson said, after a good deal of
talk round, that they might accuse him of killing
the manfor he had knocked him over the head
hard enough, and, says he to Scrags, if you'll have
the indictment found agin this girl, Jane Durham,
I'll be a witness against her, and so will Adams.
She's a thing that has no friends, said Johnson
his very words, (here Jane Durham held down her
head, and wept as though her heart would break,)
and we can fix it without any fuss`yes,' said
Adams `I hate her as I do hllI'll swear to any
thing; and, as she was at the ball, we can easily
make it out, if we git old Moll to help, for Johnson
knows that I know he did for the dead man, and
so does old Moll. But I won't work for nothing,'
said he: `you must promise to git me a pardonand
if you can't do that, you must bring me tools when I
git well, that I can cut out.' They promised to do
soand then Johnson promised Scrags, if he would
promise to do the business, to give him a deed of
his house and lot.
The Reverend Mr. Norris corroborated Job's
testimony. The person who overheard the
conversation
between old Moll and Johnson in the jail,
stated, that he was standing at his cell door, next
to a cell in which old Moll was confined, when Job,
the jailer, came there with Johnson, and took old
Moll out of her cell into the passage, and left Moll
and Johnson together, and went to the cells in the
other end of the passage: he could see as well as
hear them, through the hole in his door. When
Job was out of hearing, the witness stated, Johnson
asked old Moll if she would go to Squire Bailley,
and swear against the girl, according to her
promise
.
She hesitated, and said, You killed the
man, and you must pay me high for it. He said,
he would pay her what he promised; and when
Job came to them, they all went away together.
Bradshaw here said, with the permission of the
court, he would ask Adams and old Moll some
questions. Adams was called to the stand; but he
refused to move a step, and told the court and jury
they might all go to hell. Old Moll was called up.
She tossed her head, faced Bradshaw, and asked
himwhen his trial was to come on, for trying to
murder a man in her house. She broke forth
with the vilest abuse of him and Jane Durham.
The court ordered her to be taken away.
Bradshaw here arose to request an order of the
court for the arrest of Scrags, but, on looking round
the room, he discovered that worthy had gone. A
warrant was issued for him.
The jury by acclamation acquitted Jane
Durham
;
and the court ordered the sheriff to take
Johnson and old Moll, and keep them in close
custody
.
It was now almost dark, and the court
adjourned
.
Bradshaw told Jane Durham, who sat
as if in a trance, that she was at liberty, and he
would order a hack, if she wished, and take her
to her house. But she said she would rather go to
the jail with Lucy, upon which the kind-hearted
jailer's daughter was insisting.
Wait till the crowd pass out, said Bradshaw,
and I'll order a hack, and go with you.
Mean while, as the shades of night gathered in,
old Job, with several constables, left the court-house
for the jail, with Adams, Johnson, and old Moll in
custody. A great and incensed crowd, which had
been gathering all the afternoon, and which a large
city so soon furnishes, on any excitement, and of
various materials, followed after the constables and
their charges, hooting, hallooing, and, occasionally,
throwing missiles at the prisoners. Old Job,
fearing
a rescue, or that some of them might be hurt,
or escape in the crowd, proposed that they should
return to the court house, and wait till the crowd
had gone. At this, Johnson, who hoped there
would be some chance of escaping, taunted him
with cowardice; and, as the constables proposed
going on, Job said no more. The jail, as our
readers
are aware, was (and is) in the outskirts of the
city: the nearest way that led to it, was across a
common, in which direction the constables
conducted
the prisonersthe crowd following close at their
heels.
We had better take the round-about way,
through the streets, said Job.
Don't bother yourself, old turnkey, replied
one of the constables; we have the charge of 'em
to the jail, and I'll warrant they get there: all you
have to do, is to see they don't get out after you've
turned the key on 'em.
Well, replied Job, it's your business to get
'em therethat's a fact; but if I know any thing
about human natur, we'll have a fuss on the
common
,
or my name's not Job Presleywe'll have
some bones brokenow mind it.
On they went, notwithstanding Job's admonition.
It was almost dark, when they reached the
common
;
the crowd still pressing on them, their
violence
increasing with the darkness.
Boys, said Job to the prisoners, I'll tell you one
thing, in the beginningI've got two pistols loaded
to the top, and if any one of you tries to get off,
I'll shoot him downnow mind me.
On the common, there were many loose-stones,
and the bones of animals, whose bodies had been
dragged there when the city was smaller. The
crowd here made furious demonstrations, not of
rescuing the prisoners, but of committing a violent
assault upon them. Job was well known in the city,
and every moment some one would call out to him,
from the crowd, To clear out, that they'd do for
the villains. Job, we'll save you the trouble of
locking them up, my old boy. Yes, we'll put
them into the canal.
No, boys, you can't do that, said Job, turning
round to the crowd, in answer to the last remark.
He who's born to be hung will never be drowned.
Ha! ha! hurra for old Job Presley! shouted a
hundred voices.
Such is the nature of a mob, that this little jest
of Job appeased the most of them,and seeming
disposed to await the tardier visitation of justice
on the prisoners, they followed to the jail, cracking
jokes with Job, who kept them in good nature, till
the gate closed upon himself and the prisoners. He
then, through the bars, thanked them for their
company
,
the safe escort they furnished, and bade them
good night, telling them he would always rather
lock them
out
than
in;
at which they gave three
cheers for old Job Presleybade him take good
care of the prisoners, and dispersed in the greatest
good nature, laughing heartily, as they went on
their way.
[1]
[1]
Mobs, lately, have not been so
good-humoured.
That's just the way with human natur, said
Job, in great glee.
Human devil! exclaimed one of the
constables
.
I thought you said there'd be bones broken
crossing over the common.
Bones broken! exclaimed Job, in high
disdain
;
and so there was bones broken! Warn't
them old bones, on the common, broken at a
furious
rate? Don't you know, according to law,
there's two mistructions (constructions) upon every
thing? Yes! and there'd been heads broken, too,
if it hadn't been for me; but you didn't care, I
suppose
,
as you couldn't ha' lost any brains, no how.
CHAPTER II.
After
Job had seen his prisonersAdams,
Johnson
,
and old Mollsafely locked up, he entered his
apartment, where he found Bradshaw, Jane
Durham
,
and Lucy, who had ridden to the jail in a
hack, and got there before him. With no small
degree of self-complacency, Job narrated how he
had put the mob in good-humour, and saved the
lives, as he alleged he verily believed, of the whole
concern.
Bradshaw and Jane Durham had partaken of
Mrs. Presley's tea; and while the jailer's wife was
preparing a cup for him, Bradshaw said to him
Job, if it is not against your regulations, I will
walk with Miss Durham in the jail-yardit is so
beautiful a night; if you are willing, Miss Durham.
Miss Durham said she would like to; and that,
if Bradshaw felt interest enough in her now, she
would continue the account she was giving of
herself
,
and tell how she came in the alley. And Job
said,
O! certainly, squire, certainly: there's no
accusation
agin herthe saddle's now on the right
horse. That Adams, I tell you, is a worser devil
'an the whole on 'em. I'm sorry we sha'n't be able
Vol. II. 4
to hang him as well as Johnson. Well! him and
old Moll will go the voyage togetherthat's
certain
.
He hates you (to Jane Durham) more 'an
any man ought to hate a woman.
Jane Durham turned suddenly pale, and said she
knew it.
Well, he can't harm you, continued Job, for
I've locked him up in his cell, fast enough. Yes,
squire, you can walk in the yardcertainly. She
can come in jist when she chooses, and you can go
out jist when you choose. There's a guard at the
gate, and I'll tell him. I don't think, continued
Job, laughing, you could get over that wall, if you
was to try. Chaps have escaped that way, once
or twice; but it was by using some boards that were
in the yard, that ain't there now.
The night of the fire, was the last one of
winter
,
or rather, we should say, of the rough weather,
as the first spring month had nearly passed. Very
rough weather had occurred in this month, but by
one of those magic changes, that sometimes take
place in our climate, every appearance of winter
had disappeared three or four days previous to the
evening of which we now speak. The change
produced the sensation that every one has felta
desire to go into the open air. The night was
perfectly
calm, the moon was in the upper sky, and
not a cloud was to be seen. The air was balmy
and refreshing, and so stirless that its breath could
not be felt, save in its invigorating influence. The
jail was built of large dark stone, that had an
ancient
appearance; its small windows, with their
closely set iron bars in the thick wall, that projected
in a castellated manner above the roof, and hid it
from view; together with its great size, and the
high strong wall around, and the evident strength
and security in every thing that met the eye, gave
it the look, to an imaginative mind, of some of those
old baronial possessions of which we read. The
jail was so dark-looking, and the wall around it so
high, that though the moon shone full upon it, it
appeared to lie in shadow. To the right of the
jail, in the yard, was the gallows, which had been
erected for the execution of two pirates: beneath it
were several graves. There executed criminals had
formerly been buried, but latterly, their bodies had
been taken to Potter's field. There was nothing in
the jail yard, but some flowers, around the jailer's
apartments, which Lucy cultivatedand, sad
contrast
!
the gallows. The ground was hard, with a
short dry grass upon it; and immediately about the
graves, and under the gallows, the grass grew long;
for those who had the liberty of the jail yard
seldom
trod in those ominous precincts: it might be,
too, that the ground was fertilized there, by the
decomposition of the bodies beneath it. As the
moon shone full upon the jail, here and there, a
dark face could be seen looking between the bars
of the narrow windows, to catch a little air, or a
little light, like helpless, hopeless despair from the
regions of the damned, upon the beatitude above.
An indistinct humthe indefinable noises of the
cityon whose outskirts, as we have said, the jail
stood, fell upon the ear with a murmuring
ceaseless
sound. Save this, though it was so early,
nothing
was heard by Bradshaw and his companion,
as they walked on through the large yard. All at
once, as they approached the gallows, Jane
Durham
lifted her eyes from the ground, and,
beholding
it, said, in a melancholy voice
See there, Mr. Bradshaw, there's the gallows,
the place for murderers; shall we go and sit at its
foot, and talk of destiny? If, said she, with
affected
gaiety, `there is a destiny that shapes our
end, rough hew it as we may,' then am I going
directly to it; but where is the Jack Ketch, and
the unfeeling crowd, and the priest to shrive me?
Jane, said Bradshaw, I am going directly to
it, too, according to that; and, do you know, that I
don't believe either of us will die there, unless as
martyrsand this, you know, is not the age of
martyrdom. No, Jane, there is no more danger
there for you than for mebut come, you were
telling me of yourself, the other evening, when
Lucy interrupted you; let us walk this way, and
let me be a listener. As Bradshaw spoke, he
turned away from the gallows, and they passed
round a corner of the jail, which hid it from view.
There was a short bench, immediately against the
wall of the jail, under a window, on which
Bradshaw
and the girl sat down.
If stone walls have ears, said Jane Durham,
as she sat down, how many a sad tale have these
walls heard! and, perhaps, of many a wretch as
guiltless as I, of the imputed charge.
But stone walls have only terrors, according to
that proverb, for the guilty, Jane. However, there
may be a listener, at the window above us, said
Bradshaw, looking up at it;it was about two feet
and a half above their heads;no, there cannot
be, either, for half of the cells, as they call them,
along here, are under the ground; and, if there
should be a prisoner in this one, he is below where
we are sittingthe window is far above his head,
and he has no means of reaching it to listen.
Oh, I should not care if he did hear me! Why
should Ibut it is natural that I shouldno
matter
he
cannot. She sat silently for a moment
wiped her eyes, in which she was trying to suppress
the tears, and said
Where was I? How bright the moon is! I was
telling you of the day. O! how well I remember it!
when Adams came home with my father. Three
years had rolled over us since we left Mr.
Carlton's
.
In all that time I lived in a perpetual dread;
daily, daily! hourly, hourly! things were getting
worse. The destitution, the utter hopelessness of
my poor mother's condition and my own, had gone
right into my heart; and I could feel it in every
throb, like a load of lead. It is there still, with
a mountain's weight added to it. When I saw my
father coming, I went behind my mother's bed,
and they did not see me when they first entered.
`What! have ye no fireye lazy hussy,' exclaimed
my father, staggering towards the bed, `have ye
no fire. Get up, and be off after some wood.'
Adams laughed, and caught my father, who would
have fallen as he stepped towards the bed, had he
not been supported by him, and led to a seatan
old broken chair on which I had been seated. My
father bent down over the coals, and continued
4*
cursing my mother. Adams really seemed to
enjoy
itand to take a delight in drawing him out,
and getting him to repeat his imprecations and
charges against her. He, I believe, had been
drinking as much as my father; but the liquor
made him even more fiendish, while he showed its
effects much less.
`Take that spinning-wheel there, and put it
on the fire, Adams,' exclaimed my father, `I'm as
cold as if I hadn't a drop in me. I'd go to hell to
get warm!'
Adams took hold of the spinning-wheel, and
was going to break it, when I jumped from my
hiding-place, and begged him not.
He gazed at me a moment, and then handed
me the wheel, saying; `Why, Bill, is that your
daughter? She's pretty! What will you take for
her?'
`You may have her for the asking,' said my
fathercursing me.
He entered into conversationand I did all I
could to conciliate him, and please my father.
While we were speaking, a man came over the
old field, by our cabin, with a load of wood on a
sledge, and he stepped in to warm himself. He
was surprised to see we had no wood such a cold
day; and he went out and brought some inmade
up a fire, and threw off a good many logs for us
when he went away. Adams then went down to
the grocery to bring something for us to eat; and,
notwithstanding I had a horrible dislike to him
and well I might, from his manner to meyet I
rejoiced on account of my mother.
After this, Adams almost lived at our house.
My father was out with him late and early. Adams
had acquired a great influence over him; and they
brought food and clothing to the house, which led
my mother and me often to wonder where they
could have obtained them, as neither of them ever
did any work. They would return in the middle
of the night with flour, butter, eggs, meat, and
various
articles, of almost every kind; some of which
were very costly. They had fixed up our
dwelling
into something like comfort, by stopping up the
chinks between the logs with stones and clay.
They remained within all day, and at night
went out. Through the day, they would drink
and sleep, and seemed anxious not to be observed;
for they staid most of their time up in a kind of
loft, above the room, where mother and I were:
they brought home, one night, a small sheet-iron
stove, and put it up there, introducing the pipe into
the chimney. When they would go up into the
loft, they often dragged the ladder after them, and
only let it down for me to take up their dinner, or
water to mix with their drink. Thus the winter
wore away, and the spring came. In the mean
time, Adams importuned me with the most
infamous
proposals, and when I treated him with
contempt, he offered to marry me, and got my
father
to second him. My mother was bedridden;
and I was her constant companion, day and night.
I kept from her my trouble as long as I could, but
she caught me repeatedly weeping and sobbing
through the night, and insisted upon knowing what
ailed me. I told her; and, also, that I loathed
Adams, who, I believed, was every thing that was
bad; that he was leading my father into every
wickedness; and, that he would not only bring
deeper sorrow on us than we had ever known, but sin
and shame. My mother seemed staggered by what I
said. All at once, my father's manner to her changed.
Since his connexion with Adams, he had drunk
less than he formerly did; he was less at home, and
he was kinder than he had been for years; this
made her think, though she was fast falling into
the grave, that happier times were yet to come.
In fact,
she
was comparatively happy to what she
had been before we knew Adams. Not so with me.
I believe, from the manner in which my father
spoke to me, when he first told me he wished I
would marry Adams, that he would have avoided
it, but he dared not. I told him how Adams had
behaved to me, and that I would do any thing to
please him but
that
. He looked angry, as I spoke:
he was perfectly sober; and I have sometimes
thought it might have been at what I told him of
Adams. It was after this, he became kind to my
mother, and asked her to persuade me to marry
Adams. When she spoke to me on the subject, I
begged her, on my knees, never to mention it to
me again. This was in the night: early in the
morning, my father came home with Adams, and
she told him what I had said. I was out of the
house, but I knew it by his manner, when I came
in. He looked moody, and went into the loft to
Adams. In a short time, I heard them conversing
together: Adams was very angry. I heard my
father
say, `Have patience; she's but a girl; she'll
consent yet.' Adams replied, with an oath, `She
must consent, or I'll blow you, old boy. It must be
quick, tooI
will
have her.' I heard no more.
Adams descended the stairs, and looked furiously
at me, as he went out. This man was so much of
a ruffian, that, though he pretended to be attached
to me, he never could assume a gentle tone, in
speaking to me. His eye glowed on me like a
hyena's
,
impatient for its prey. I never left the side
of my mother, and he never could wile me away
by any art, or I know not what would have
become
of me.
In about an hour, my father descended from the
loft, very drunk. He sat down, called me to him,
and tried to persuade me that Adams would make
me a good husband, and to marry him. I told him
I could not. He then stamped, raved, and swore
he would kill me. Then he fell to entreaty, and
said I would save his life by it. He moved me so,
that I was on the eve of consenting, when Adams
came in intoxicated. Without saying a word, he
went up stairs, and sternly called my father. What
my father said seemed to pacify him, for I heard
no more high words between them, the whole day;
and, at night, they went out together. In the
middle
of the night, my mother awoke, and heard me
sobbing, and began to speak to me of Adams. She
used every entreaty; and, after extorting a half
promise from me, that I would marry him, she fell
asleep. I arose,for it seemed to me that I never
should know sleep again,hurried on my clothes,
and sat down on a chair, where I rocked myself to
and fro, for hours. At last, I rose up and went out.
The night was beautiful: just such a night as this.
Away, in the moon-light, I saw the village, and I
thought, could there be one there so miserable as
I? I had no companionsno one from the village
ever came to see my mother; and whenever I
went there, to buy any thing at the grocery, some
of the by-standers would stop me, and ask questions
about my father and Adams, and throw out dark
hints. The only persons that ever came to our
house, were some of the neighbouring negroes. In
fact, my father, but particularly Adams, discouraged
the coming of any one else. I heard Adams once
say to my father`Let the niggers come; they
can't bear testimony against a white man.' The
night was, indeed, beautiful. I sat down upon the
door-sill and looked round upon the scene, and
thought that God's bright world was a mockery to
me. The scene increased my sense of loneliness
and desolation, and I walked behind the house and
entered a dark stable, that Adams had built of
rough logs,for I felt as if I wanted to be in the
dark,and I covered myself up in the straw. How
long I remained there, I do not know; but, at last,
I heard footsteps near to me, and, in a moment
afterwards
,
the door of the stable opened, and Adams
and my father entered.
`Confound it,' said Adams; `while you were
drinking there, I gained all this booty! What in
the devil kept you so late?'
`Why,' said my father, `after I left you, as I
told you, I ran that rusty nail into my hand, up to
the head, in getting over a fence. My arm is so
swelled, and it pains me so, that I feel it at the top
of my shoulder.'
`You must bathe it in whisky,' replied Adams.
But get a spade. We must put this ready into
that tin box that's over the door, and bury it here.
Nobody will ever think of looking into the stable
for it. I like to done for that fellow. I tell you
what, he loves cash. After I knocked him off of
his horse, I had to give him two pretty deep digs
with my carving knife, before I got it. Come, be
after the spadeit's round the house, I believe.'
My father went after the spade. Adams stood
within the stable, where the light shone on him
through the door. I dared scarcely breathe. Once
he turned his face towards me. I felt a cold chill
in every vein: I thought he had discovered me.
My heart seemed to me to beat so loudly, that he
had heard it. It occurred to me that he knew I
was in the stable, and that he would send my
father
away for something, and then what would
become
of me! As this reflection crossed my mind,
I was on the eve of springing up and darting past
him, when he muttered to himself, with a devilish
smile, tossing up what appeared to be a purse of
money, and catching it, as he spoke
`This is a big haul to-night. Bill thinks more
of his daughter than I thought was in him. I'll
frighten him till I get her. She begins to give in,
hey. I'll pay her up for this foolingthe way her
mother's fixed is nothing to what she'll know.'
My father now entered with the spade, said
he, couldn't at first find it, and as he complained
very much of his arm, Adams put the money in
the tin box, dug the hole, and buried it; he
covered it over carefully, pushed a stick in, so that
he might find the place, and came right to where
I lay, lifted a bundle of straw from my side, threw
it down and stood over me. After standing a
moment
he gathered up some loose trodden straw,
that lay at my very feet, walked away, and
scattered
it over the spot where he had buried the
box. All the while my father kept walking to and
fro, shaking his hand, blowing on it, and exclaiming
how much it pained him. When Adams had
scattered
the straw, they left the stable. As soon as
they left, I hurried to the door to see which way
they went: my anxiety was to get into the house
undiscovered. As they passed round one corner of
the house, I ran like lightning round the other,
and got to the door, before they turned the front
corner. Just as I was lifting the latch, they came
round the corner and saw me. I pretended to
have been in the act of leaving the house,
remarking
,
`Is it you? I heard a noise, and did not know
what it was.' Adams tried to be very gentle, was
in high spirits, and said, `Jane, your father has run
a rusty nail in his hand, and it hurts him: you
ought to make a bread and milk poultice for it.'
At my father's request I did so. In applying
the poultice, I was astonished to see how much the
arm was swollen. He was in great pain; he drank
deeply to deaden it, but without effect: at last he
took a large quantity of opium, which Adams was
in the habit of using, threw himself on the floor, and
went to sleep. When my father awoke he was
deliriousraving mad. The swelling had extended
from his arm, which had become perfectly black,
to the body; Adams had to assist me, while I bathed
it, my mother could do nothing. She lay in bed
and looked on, while the ravings of my father
frightened her nearly to death. In his ravings he
spoke as if he had committed crimes at the
instigation
of Adams; and he would curse and bite at him
as he held him. This infuriated Adams so much,
that he threatened to kill my father, and struck
him several times over the head with such
violence
that he became insensible, and continued in
a stupor for several hours. I could make no
resistance
to Adams's assault on my father, but I fell
down on my knees before him, and begged him in
mercy to desist. He sat down by him, as he lay
insensible, and said not one word until he recovered.
My father looked languidly round, asked for water,
and said he was much worse, but he did not seem
to know that Adams had ill treated him. I asked
him, if he did not think I ought to go somewhere
for a doctor. He said yes, yes, and begged me to
go at once. `Go,' said he, `to Squire Bennett's, at
the villagethere's a great doctor comes from
town to tend his wife for a cancer. Go and get
him to come here, for God's sake, or I shall die.
We'll pay him any thingAdams will pay him,'
Adams said not a word, but looked as moody and
dark as I had ever seen himafter awhile he
lightened up, and said
`Yes, go, Janego at once. I'll stay with
your father until you come back. If the doctor
isn't there, get them to tell you when he comes,
and you can go, at that time, after him.'
I have said, the village was in sight of our
house, across the old fields, but we could not go
Vol. II. 5
directly to it in consequence of the swamp, which
lie immediately between them. The path wound
by the side of the swamp, and then through a
wood to the village. The wood was very
lonely
the
trees of great size, and close together,
while many wild vines and bushes grew among
them. I left the house, and hurried on, with a
rapid step, to Squire Bennett's, thinking all the
time of my father. I had got about half way
through the woodto the loneliest spot in it
when I heard quick steps behind, and I turned,
and beheld Adams not ten feet from me. My
first impulse was to run, but he called out, `Jane,
your father says'and, thinking he had some
message from my father, I involuntarily stopped
till he reached me. He then caught hold of my
arm, and asked me, `If I had been fooling with
my father.' `How fooling?' said I. `Are you
willing to marry me? Stop till you answer!' he
exclaimed. `There, take a seat upon that log.'
`We can talk as we walk on,' said I. He forced
me to sit down by himsaying, `No, it must be
settled before you walk another step. You can't
fool me. You heard what your father said in his
crazy fits! I see you think it's true. Then, by
, you can't leave this woods until you
promise
to marry me. I'm not going to have you
to tell tales! Do you promise me?'
I knew not what to do, or say. I was
terror-stricken
by his manner, for he seemed
desperately
resolute. `Let me go on for the doctor,' said
I, at last; `this is no time to talk about such
things: wait till my father gets well.'
`Ha!you want to deceive me, do you!' he
exclaimed, seizing both my hands, and looking at
me with an awful eye. `You shall die before you
do! Do you mark that? Yes, die on this spot!
I have you
now!
' he exclaimed, with a malicious
laugh. `I can do with you just what I choose,
and then end you and chuck you into the swamp.
Will you marry me, my bird?'
`I will! I will!' I cried out, for he looked as
if he would fulfil his threat; and I feared he would,
be my promises what they might.
`You will, hey!that's right! When?'
`When my father is well. Let me now go, I
entreat you, for the doctor!'
`Then swear it!' said he`swear it!'
`I swear,' I faltered out.
`You must swear,' he exclaimed, `according
to law!' And he drew from his pocket a small
Bible that I had often read to my mother, made
me get down on my knees before him, put both
hands on the book, and swear to keep my
promise
,
with the awful penalty, if I did not, of
having my mother and father murdered before
my eyes by him, and of being myself his victim,
with the most terrible denunciations upon my soul
eternally. `Here,' said he, handing me the Bible,
`the book's yours; take it, and remember your
oath. I'll remember the other, if you don't
mark that! Can I trust you,' said he, and he
grasped my head, with a hand on each side of it,
pushed it back, and looked me in the eye
steadily
.
`Remember, you're mine, whether you keep
your oath or not, and if you don't, you'll see your
father and mother die, and I'll burn you up in the
house with them. Go after the doctor.'
At his bidding I arose. I felt as if I were
about fainting; but, fearing the awful
consequences
if I should, situated as I was with him,
I summoned an unnatural energy, and, after
staggering
a few steps, hurried on. He stood,
looking
after me, and when I had proceeded a few
yards from him, he called out, `Stop!' I stood
still. `Come here.' I obeyed his command. `Do
you remember your oath?' said he, between his
teeth, as he grasped my shoulder. `I do! I do!'
I exclaimed. `Will you keep it?' he asked,
pressing
my shoulder as if he meant to crush me to the
earth. `I will! I will! I will!only let me go
for the doctor!' `Go,' said he; and I hurried off
with all the strength I could command. I dared
not look behind me until I got to a turn in the
path; then I stole a fearful glance, as I turned, to
the place where I had left Adams; he had
followed
a few steps after, and was standing as if
irresolute. I stood behind a tree, and looked at
him. He walked up and down several times, and
then hastened off towards our house. I felt relieved
when I knew he was not dogging me, and, with
a quick step, I advanced, but not without casting
many and many a fearful look behind. Thinking
of nothing distinctly but with confused thoughts
of every thingmy half promise to my mother
of the previous nightAdams burying the
money
what
he saidhis treatment to my father
my father's illnessmy mother'sthis last
scene with Adamspassing through my mind,
and acting like a spur to hurry me onwards, I
soon reached the house of Squire Bennett, in the
village. I entered his office, and found, within,
several persons; some of whom I took to be
constables
,
and some I knew to be neighbouring
farmers
.
I soon discovered they were talking of the
robbery which Adams had committed.
`Is there no clew for detecting the robber?'
asked the squire.
`The doctor says,' observed one, whom I took
to be a constable, `that it ain't proper to talk to
him about it yet, he's so badly hurt. He's got two
stabs in him, deep ones, and then, you see, he laid
out all night and bled like a pig.'
`It's old Jemmy Swartz, the drover, you tell
me,' said Squire Bennett, `who lives over by the
Purchase?'
Is it possible? interrupted Bradshaw. Why,
Jane, I remember the circumstances of his being
robbed and stabbed, perfectly: he was just
returning
home, after having sold a drove of cattle.
Yes, sir, continued Jane Durham, the very
same. The squire asked me what I would have.
I related to him the terrible state of my father's
arm, and said we wanted to have the doctor, who
came out to see Mrs. Bennett, to come and see
him.
`Why, my dear,' said the squire, who was a
good-natured man, `I don't know whether the
doctor will go or not: he's a great press of patients.
However, you had better come and see him
yourself
he'll
be here about half after four, this
afternoon
.'
5*
I inquired after Mrs. Bennett's health, and
left the office. Scarcely any one observed me,
they were so much occupied in talking of the
robbers
.
`It will be hard work to find out the fellow
that did it,' said one of the by-standers`at least,
till Jemmy is well. The robber managed well
we couldn't track him at allhe either went up,
or come down the main road.'
I left the squire's, and was soon on my way
home. Home! what a home! When I reached
the outskirts of the woods, near the village, I sat
down on a stump and wept bitterly, wringing my
hands in very anguish. At last, I dried my eyes
and reflected upon what I should do. I determined
to escape Adams one moment, and then I thought
of the horrible oath he had made me take, and
that it was impossible. Well, thought I, with a
casuistry, which, I think, much less wrong now,
than I did then, for I shuddered while I used it, I
promised to marry him when my father was well,
but I did not promise that I would not tell how he
has treated me, making me swear to marry him.
The threats which he used in the woods, when he
said, I believed what my father said in his crazy
fits, and he was not going to let me tell tales
frightened me awfullywhile the very suspicions
that he expressed, gave me a hint, which he little
thought would occur to me. I hoped, while my
father was ill, Adams would not importune me,
and to prevent him from doing it, I determined to
tell to my father, while he was by, merely as if I
were telling the news, the conversation which I
had heard at the squire's office, without narrating
that part of it which stated, it would be hard to
find the robber. Knowing Adams's selfish nature,
I was satisfied this would keep him so much on the
alert, for himself, that he would forget me. Then
again, I thought, if my father died, and somehow,
I feared he would, the only way of escaping
Adams would be, to inform the magistrate he was
the robber. This could not hurt my father in the
grave, and it would save me, from worse than
death; but the thought of the risk I should run,
if Adams suspected me in the least, of having such
an intention, gave me a sickness at the heart, that
almost overcame me. Had it not been for my poor
mother, I don't think I ever would have returned
to the house; but, after reflecting upon all these
suggestions again and again, and upon my poor
mother's condition, I resolved, in the event of my
father's death, if there was no other way of
avoiding
a union with Adams, to inform upon him. I
then fell down on my knees, by the stump, and
clasping the Bible in my uplifted hands, I prayed,
with the fervour of my whole soul, and with
streaming eyes, to God, that he would forgive me
if I was wrong in taking such a horrible oath
that he would suffer me to escape without
breaking
itand that, if I must, to save my mother and
my father, be the wife of Adams, he would sustain
me; for I felt I could not sustain myself. I arose
by a sudden resolution, and soon reached home.
I found my father calm and conscious, but much
worse. His arm was offensive to the smell, and
his body, all in the region of the shoulder, inflamed
and black. He did not complain of much pain.
Adams was by his side; he had brought down their
bed from the loft, and spread it on the floor for
him. My mother was sitting up in her bed, gazing
on my father. I told my father, I was to go for
the doctor again, at five o'clock. He asked me
who I saw, and I related the conversation
concerning
the robbery. My father looked at Adams when
I told it. Adams started, walked about the room,
whispered something to him, and after asking me
a great many questions, went up into the loft.
At five o'clock, I went for the doctor. He had
seen Mrs. Bennett when I arrived, and was just
getting into his gig, having said he could not find
the way to my father's. I addressed him, and
earnestly entreated him to come, saying I would
run on before, and show him the way. He
inquired
if I was the wife of the sick man: I told
him I was the daughter.
`Miss,' said he, `I cannot suffer you to
run
on
before and show me the way; but if you will ride
with me, and point it out, I will go.'
Perhaps I should have said that, expecting the
visit of the doctor, I had fixed up our cabin, and
arrayed myself in a new dress, (which my father
had given me, in hopes of coaxing me to marry
Adams,) with all the neatness I was mistress of; for,
I thought, if I looked well-dressed, he would feel
more sure of being paid, and be more apt to come.
I entered the doctor's gig. We had to go a
considerable distance farther, by the wagon-track,
than by the path through the woodsfor a gig
could not travel on the path; and the wagon-track
went around the woods, and came out above the
swamp, into the old fields. The doctor, you know
him,or did know him, for he's dead now,was
the celebrated Dr. Pn. He spoke very
kindly
to me, as we rode along, and gave me an ease
which has surprised me often since, when I have
thought of it. I told him of my father's hand, my
mother's illness; and, without my knowing it, he had
learned from me every thing I dared to tell of
myself
and family, by the time we reached our house.
My father and mother were alone when we
entered
.
I saw Adams peering down on the doctor,
from the loft. After a few minutes, he descended.
The moment the doctor beheld my father's hand,
he exclaimed`Why was not a physician sent for
before?' He asked several questions concerning
my father, and then turned to my mother. He
took a seat by her bed, felt her pulse, and spoke
kindly to her, observing that he would prescribe
for her, too. He then again examined my father's
head and arm, and, looking at his head, said
`He must have been severely beaten on the
headwas he not?'
Adams spoke up quickly, and said`It was in
getting over a fence that he hurt his hand: he fell
on his head.'
Adams eyed me, but I tried to show no
emotion
.
The doctor here gave me directions as to
bathing
my father's arm, and giving him medicines.
I told him we had not the medicines, and asked
him if he thought we could get them at the
apothecary's
shop in the village.
`Yes,' said he; `come with me. I will drive
you there in a short time. It's in my way to the
city.'
Adams did not offer to go; for, in the present
state of excitement in the village, on account of
the robbery, he had no wish to make his
appearance
yet,
I thought he did not like the idea of my
going with the doctor.
When we entered the gig, the doctor asked me
who Adams was; and he evidently suspected
something
wrong from my confused answers.
`Do not be alarmed, my dear,' said he; `but
it is proper that I should say to you, your father is
in a dangerous condition.'
I burst into tears. He soothed me and changed
the subject, asking me a great many questions of
myself. At the village he obtained the medicines
for me, and drove me back home. He stopped a
moment at the house, repeated his directions as to
the medicines, and hurried off, as it was nearly
dark.
When the doctor went, Adams cross-questioned
me a great deal as to what he had said to me, and
of my answers. The doctor came the next day, all
the way from the city, to see my father. He said
the hand was mortifying; and he feared it was too
late for an amputation. So it proved. Three days
after the first visit of the doctor, while Adams was
awayand he had absented himself a good deal
since the robberymy father called me to his
bed-side, and was apparently very anxious to
communicate
something to me. After several vain
efforts to speak, he faltered out, `
Never marry
Adams
!'and died.
Overcome by her emotions, Jane Durham here
buried her face in her hands, and wept bitterly.
Bradshaw knew it was best to let her grief have
its way. After a few minutes, she continued:
My father's last words satisfied me that his
fear of Adams had been the only motive that
induced
him to ask me to marry him. It fixed
my determination never to do so. Adams hired
some of the neighbouring negroes to dig a grave
near the house, where the corpse was laid. My
mothermy poor mother, notwithstanding all she
had suffered from the neglect and abuse of my
father, loved him dearly; his death afflicted her
sorely. It was almost too much for her at the
time; and it hastened her end. The earth was
scarcely on my father, before the bed on which he
died was removed out of the room, and while I
was sitting on it, with feelings I cannot describe,
Adams asked me `When we should be married?'
Forgetting all prudence, I exclaimed, never! never!
My father, with his dying breath, told me never to
marry you!
Adams started as if a thunderbolt had struck him.
`Did he say that?' asked he, of my mother.
She said nothing, but inclined her head. He
clenched his hand, and facing me, asked, `Do you
mean to keep your oath?' At this instant the
doctor drove up to the door. While the doctor was
fastening his horse, Adams came close to me,
looking
like an incarnate devil, and said, in a low voice
through his teeth
`Remember your oath! Get ready to-night
I will bring a preacher here, and we will be
married
.'
The doctor entered. He sat down by my
mother's
bed, and tried to make us forget our
misfortunes
,
by interesting us in the case of the robbery.
He said he was attending Swartzthat he was
better. `To-morrow,' continued he, `the
magistrate
will attend him to take his deposition. He
may, by taking cold, or by some imprudence, be
taken off yet. It is proper his account of the
robbery
should be made publiche can, I believe,
describe
the person of the robber.'
Adams, you may suppose, was no careless
listener
to this. He kept his seat a moment or two;
and, as I passed near him, he said, `Mind, I will
come to-night:' and he left the house. My mind
was made up: I looked after him till I saw him
enter the woods; and when the doctor left the
house, I followed him out, and narrated to him,
hurriedly, my situation, and all I knew of Adams
and of the robbery.
`There is not one moment to be lost!' said he.
`Get into my gig, and I will drive you to the
magistrate's
:
you must make a deposition of the facts;
and to-night, instead of having you for a bride,
Jane, the hand-cuffs of the constables will clasp
him much more appropriatelythe infernal
scoundrel
!
Don't be alarmed: it will be so arranged,
that when he comes to the house to-night, he will
be taken.'
The doctor drove rapidly to the magistrate's
called the squire into a private room, where I
narrated
the facts that I knew of the robbery, the
burying
of the money, &c. The warrant for his
arrest
was intrusted to three trusty persons. My dread
was to return to the house, and spend the awful
interval
till the coming of Adams. I could not leave my
mother alonethat was impossibleand I feared
Adams might be at the house, suspect me, and fulfil
his threat, or that something terrible would occur
at his arrest. The doctor read my feelings, and
told me not to be alarmed. `I will take you home,'
said he, `and, as it is now near night, I will stay
with your mother and yourself until they have
taken him. He must, also, be well securedI
never
read of a greater scoundrel.
The doctor took the magistrate aside, borrowed
a pair of pistols from him, and took me home. He
told me the plan was to take Adams as he came
through the woods, if possible, but, if not, to
surround
the house after he had entered. `You and
I have the post of danger, Jane,' he said, `and,
therefore, of honour;I joke. Don't be alarmed;
there's no danger: I shall dissect the scoundrel yet.'
`Could not the constable hide in the stable?'
said I.
`Oh, no! that won't do. If Adams should be
in the house when they entered the stable, he would
see them, and, probably, he is now lurking in the
woods, watching if any one comes to the house.'
We found my mother terribly frightened: she
told us, that, a short time after we left, Adams had
returned, and threatened to kill her and me, if I
did not marry him. He had been up in the loft,
armed himself, and gone out, saying, as he went,
he would return at night.
I got supper for the doctor, while he sat and
conversed with meoh! so differently to what I
Vol. II. 6
had been used to. You know, at school, Mr.
Bradshaw
,
I was thought to be fond of study; so much
so, that Mr. Lusby, as my father was poor, and
could not school me, rather than I should not be
taught, received me without charge. I availed
myself of all opportunities of reading, at the Swamp,
but they were precious few, indeed. A Bible and
an old volume or two were all the books I ever
had, and they were burned by my father, in a fit
of intoxication. Listening to the doctor, and
thinking
of his kindness, I, at times, entirely forgot my
own situation, Adams, and the catastrophe
awaiting
him. Hours thus passed away. My mother lay
in bed, in a kind of insensibilityher usual way.
About eleven o'clock, we heard footsteps approach
the door, and some one stopped at it, as if listening.
We heard a low whisper, and then the persons
walked round the house.
`It's Adams, I suspect,' said the doctor, in a
low tone: `he has some one with him. It may be
the constables; if it is, it is no use to go out; and,
if it is Adams, I had better let him come in. The
constables will surround the house and be more
sure of him.'
It was a bright moonshiny night: there were
no trees around the house, and the constables, if
they were on the alert, must have secreted
themselves
in the woods.
`Don't be frightened,' said the doctor; `we
must converse as if we had no suspicions.' So
saying
,
he took up the conversation, as though there
had been no interruption. We heard some one
again advancing, and, in a moment more, the door
opened, and Adams entered, with an ill-looking
man, dressed in a rusty suit of black. He spoke
to the doctor gruffly, told his companion to sit down,
and took a seat himself.
`Is Mrs. Durham worse?' asked Adams of the
doctor.
`Much worse,' said the doctor, without turning
to Adams, for he was scrutinizing his companion in
black.
`Why, Hollands,' he exclaimed, `is that you?'
The man was somewhat confused, but he soon
rallied, and said, `Yes, sir.'
`What brings you away out here? there is a
poor chance for you in the country, isn't there?'
`People die every where, sir,' replied Hollands.
`I brought him out,' said Adams, `to attend my
wedding. Jane and I are to be married to-night.
It's rather soon after the funeral, but her father
and I were friends, and it was his last wish I
should marry her, that she might have some one to
take care of her, and'
Here, the door opened without the ceremony
of a rap, and three constables entered, followed by
a magistrate and two other persons. Adams
started
up, as if his first impulse was to dash by the
constables
out of the house, but the number deterred
him, and he sat down.
`Mr. Adams,' said one of the constables, `I
arrest
you, sir.'
`For what?' asked Adams, keeping his seat and
endeavouring to be self-possessed, while his husky
voice and blanched cheek betrayed his emotions.
`Here is the paper,' said the constable,
showing
the warrant, while himself and companions got
close to him.
`Who applied for it?' asked Adams, turning to
the magistrate.
`Jane Durham,' replied Mr. Bennet.
`I never killed the old man, her father,'
exclaimed
Adams. `She has sworn to a dd lie.
Ask the doctor there, he'll tell you that his hand
mortified, and killed him.'
`'Tis not for murder,' said the magistrate; `it
is for the robbery of Jemmy Swartz.'
Adams trembled, while his assumed
self-possession
forsook him. He looked at me with a deadly
hate, then to the door, as if he would escape; but
he saw the effort would be hopeless, as several
persons
stood between him and itand by it one, not
the most valiant of the party, ostentatiously
displayed
a great horse-pistol. After a strong effort
to recover himself, he seemed to reflect whether
my testimony could affect himfor he had some
familiarity with courts of justiceand asked,
`Can what her father said against me, to her,
be given against me?'
`To make a long story short,' said the
magistrate
`she
saw you bury the money.'
Adams snatched a knife from his pocket, and
sprung at mebut the constables caught him
instantly
.
He struggled fearfully with them, striving
to get at me, but they hurled him to the floor, and
bound him hand and foot. He loaded me with
imprecations
,
and said he would have my life yet.
`This is not a hanging matter,' said he. `It is only
penitentiary, and that don't last for ever. When
I'm out, look out.'
`Don't mind him,' said the magistrate. `Come
and show us where he buried the money.'
I led them to the stable, and pointed out the
place. They soon dug up the tin box, and found
in it five hundred dollars in notes, and a few dollars
in silver. The notes were in the drover's
pocket-book
,
which had his name on it. I left them
searching
about the stable, and went into the house to see
after my mother. Just as I entered, one of the
constables said, pointing to the man whom the
doctor
called Hollands, who came with Adams`We
ought to take this man to jailoughtn't we? he's
his comrade.'
`You've no proof against me,' said Hollands,
very much frightened. `I never heard tell of the
robbery before. I can prove, pint blank, that I
was in town. Adams will tell you I had nothing
to do with ithad I, Hen?'
`You had as much to do with it as I had,' said
Adams.
`Sir,' said Hollands, turning to the doctor, `I
hav'n't seen him, sirI'll swear to itI hav'n't seen
him for these two weeks, before to-night.'
`What did he want with you, Hollands?' asked
the doctor. `Tell the whole truth, nowthat's the
best way for you. Honesty's the best policy.'
`Why, sir,' said Hollands, after a good deal of
hesitation, and stammering, `I'll jist out with the
matter. You see, Adams come to me, in town, last
night, a little after dark, and he asked me to go
and drink with him, and I did. While we were
drinking, he asked me how I come on; and if I got
many bodies for the doctors now-a-day; and if
6*
they paid well. I told him there was bodies
wanted, but the season not being sickly, there was
a poor chance of them; that I wanted one very
badly
,
just now; and would go halves with any body
who would help me to get one, and give him no
trouble about it. `Well,' said he, `if you'll do me
a small favour, I'm your man. You know,' said he,
`you've played the parson in some of our shines.
If you will put on your old suit of black, and go
out to the Long Swamp with me, and pretend to
marry me to a girl there, I'll give you a body that's
right by the housea fresh one: you may have it
all to yourself. You can ride out with me in a
carry-all I've got; and when you've married me to
the little hussy, I'll help you to dig up the body.
You can take it to town in the carry-all.' I asked
him who the girl was. He said she was a fool of
a country girl, who was his miss; that she bothered
him to make an honest woman of her; and that I
could do it as well as the best kind of a parson. I
agreed to come with him, and we came out.'
Think of it, Mr. Bradshaw, it was the body of
the father, with which he meant to procure the
ruin of the daughter! Why dwell more upon him.
He was convicted, and sentenced to the
penitentiary
for ten years.
In the court-house, at his trial, he could not hide
his hatred of me: He cursed me outright, and
threatened my life, while I was giving in my
testimony
.
He asked to address the jury just before
they retired. He told them I had killed my father;
that my character was infamous; that a negro who
was my paramourhad assaulted the drover, and
given me the money which I had buried in the
stable, and that I laid it on him to screen myself
and the negro. After the death of my father, and
the conviction of Adams, my mother and myself
continued to live at the Swamp. She was rapidly
sinking to the grave; Dr. P continued to attend
her, through the spring and summer, till she died.
I might say he was at the house almost every day.
Here Jane Durham paused, and Bradshaw could
see the blush mantling on her cheek, even in the
moonlight. I have narrated, she continued,
the most wretched part of my life, save that
which I have to add to it of the last week; but
not the most sinful. You know, Mr. Bradshaw,
that Dr. P had every qualification to win a
woman's affection. Reflect, reflect, sir, I was little
more than sixteen. He was an angel of light to
the men I had known. He had been the means
of rescuing me from Adamshe had befriended
me when I had no friendhe had been kind to my
fatherI saw him daily by the bed-side of my
mother, he supported her and me, when, but for
him, we might have starved. He brought me
books; he praised my mind; he sat by me for hours
in our lonely dwelling in the old fields, as my
mother
lay insensible on her bed, and taught and read
to me. He praised my person, and told me how I
should adorn itand all this before he spoke to me
of love. I had thought of him by day and by night,
and loved him without once thinking of the passion,
or its consequences. Is it any wonder that I gave
him my affections, yielded to him without any tie,
but the tie which we are told is linked in sorrow
and in shame, when I could not, would not yield
to Adams, let what might be the tie. I know, I
know he loved me, said she, bursting into tears
he may have struggled with his feelings more
than I struggled with mine. Better born, better
bredbut for the distinctions of society and my
miserable family, I might have been nearer to him,
if not dearer; and more honourable, if not more
happyyes, yes, much more happyfor the very
education he gave methe refinement he taught
the sensibility he enlivenedtold me more acutely
what I was. But if I erred in yieldingmastered
by a passion which I could not controlyielding to
a tie of love, when no other tie was dreamed of
and not thatfor I deemed him unmeasurably
above meif I erred, has not mine been the sorrow,
and the shame, and the deep humiliation. Who, I
ask, would hear my story, and wish to make it
their own? Who can hear it, and not feel that I
have some justification for what I am. No,
merciful
and holy God! I may fold another to my heart,
for the daily bread which I eat in bitterness, and
in bitterness give to my child; but he who first
won it is there indelible and ever present as yon
bright star in heavenif I ever yield this faded and
frail form for bread, it shall not be to sustain my
own miserable lifenobut my child's, my child's,
there is no prostitution, at least of the soul, in that.
But why dwell upon this? I thought I had taught
myself entirely to hide such feelings. The world,
sir, has no ear for that sophistry, though it is an
impulse of our better nature, that tries to apologize
for the errors which our pride, as well as our
conscience
tell us is not justifiable.
Towards midsummer, my mother died: she
passed away like the flame from the wick, when
the oil is exhausted. She said just before she died to
Dr. P, `I see how it is, with you and my
daughter. I wish, Oh! how I wish it had been
otherwise. It would have saved me a pang keen
as death, but you have a good heart, and if you do
not cast her offand do not let her dying mother
charge you do notshe will be happier than her
mother, though she was a lawful wife. Bury me
by my husbandhe was unkind to me while he
lived, but he was my husband, and now he's in his
grave, he cannot hurt me, though I am near to
him, with even an unkind word.' I did not think
my mother dreamed of my situation with Dr.
P. She had seen it allbut not until it was
too lateand then her affection for me would not
let her speak of itit burst out, though, in her
dying words. We buried her by my father. Long,
long, after the grass waved over her, and I had
left the Swamp, and lived in the city, did her last
words sound in my ears, sleeping and waking
Those words of hers, a `pang keener than death,'
have been a thousand deaths to me. I thought of
them the first morning I spent in prison with that
wretched woman till I believed the judgment of
God had fallen on me, and I was to be like her:
they will haunt me till the sod is on me, as it is on
my poor mother. But whoever sinned that did
not sorrow for it: here, even in this world, the
unknown
retribution of the other weighs us down
with an undefinable dreada dread, that, while it
stretches to the dark beyond, encompasses us here,
poisoning our joy, and maddening our sorrow.
No one not placed in my situation can judge
of my feelings. It is easy to say what I should
have done, but who would have done otherwise?
who could have done otherwise?My mother's
last words rung in my ears, but I had yielded
before
I heard them. They but made me unhappy
when I recalled them. Dr. P sometimes brought
to the house in town where I lived, friends to sup
with him: and, among others, Mr. Glassman. Mr.
Glassman has his faults, I know, and they are said
to be many and grievous; but you know he is a
fascinating man, and no one sees his errors but
those who feel them. Almost every evening,
through the winter, and often in the summer, he
would sit hour by hour, and converse with Dr.
P: he was his most intimate acquaintance.
He possesses that worldly wisdom that Dr. P
so much wanted, and he was often his adviser.
Dr. P's brow would often darken, when
playing
with his child, as he thought of its birth; but
the lectures at the college, after he was appointed
professor, and his extensive practice, with his
increasing
ambition, (for, as he felt his powers among
men, his purposes became more determined and
loftier,) so occupied his mind, that he rarely, at last,
let such reflections trouble him. I observed this
more particularly, after he became acquainted
with Mr. Glassman. Mr. Glassman, who seemed
to know every thing, would talk to him in such
eloquent terms of his professionof the great men
in itand of the glorious opportunity there was
for him to become distinguished. Oh! how Mr.
Glassman loves talentit made even me, ambitious
of cultivating my mind when I've heard him
converse
.
Whenever he would come to see the
doctor
,
and he was not in, he would scarcely stay a
minute. I once asked him why he did not stay
longer. He looked at me with a soul-searching
eye, and said`Jane, I have a bad character
among your sexthe doctor is my friend: he loves
you, you love himif I call here while he is out, and
stay, some busy tattler will tell him, that my visits
are prompted by another feeling than that of
friendship
.
Though I may have deceived one of your
sex, when they trusted in meso, don't trust me
I never deceived one of mine. The doctor is my
friend: on his noble and generous nature I might
rely with confidence, that no slanderous
imputation
of the world would break our friendshipbut,
I should be careful that no suspicion should, for a
moment, darken itparticularly, when that
suspicion
would strike a tender pointa point upon
which men are most vulnerableand when I can
so easily prevent it. Therefore, do not, from the
impulse of your courteous feelings, ask me again
to stay, because a woman's voice has a power over
me, which I have not schooled myself to resist.'
Mr. Glassman always treated me with respect,
and when other gentlemen came to the house with
the doctor, his manner to me made them
respectful
.
Dr. P had told me of Mr. Glassman's
infirmitiesthat he was subject to fits of low
spirits
,
and that, without being at all an habitual
drinker, he too frequently sought relief in the cup.
One evening, I shall never forget, Mr. Glassman
came to the house intoxicated. What he had
drank did not enliven him; on the contrary, it
increased
his melancholy almost to madness. When
he entered, I observed he looked sad; but I did
not discern any thing in his conduct that showed
his condition. Dr. P saw it, and tried to cheer
him with lively conversation, but Mr. Glassman
shook his head, and said
`No! P it won't do. Come, Jane, sing to
me, sing Burns's song to Mary in Heaven. You
are the image of a woman I loved and love, who
loved me more even than you love P. I
wronged her. She is dead: if the grave would
but give her back to life again, what a different
man should I be. Remorse! remorse! I cannot
drown it. Lethe is but a fable stream, or I would
make a pilgrimage to the world's end to find it, if,
but to take one draught of its oblivious waters.
Come, Jane, sing to mesing to me.'
I, accordingly, sang for him. After struggling
with emotions that shook his soul, he became
calmer
,
and spoke of his past life. While he told how
wildly he had erred, and how, in the violence of
his passion, he had crushed his better nature, he
conveyed a moral to us, which he meant to convey,
no doubt, and which was not the less effective
from the unobtrusive manner in which it was drawn
not in bold relief, at the end of the narrative,
but woven in every word of it.
In the mean time, Dr. P's practice
became
so extensive that he had hardly a moment
he could call his own. When the cholera was here,
he was up and out night and day. I begged and
prayed with him, for my sake, for his child's sake,
to take care of himself, but he could not resist the
voice of distresshe often neglected the wealthiest
to visit the poorest. His humanity became known,
and in the middle of the night, there would come for
him some child or wife, and beg him to go and see
a father or husband. When he has asked the place
of their residence, I've shuddered to hear some
miserable
lane or alley mentioned, where vice,
poverty
and disease were struggling for supremacy. I
became so much alarmed one night, brooding over
my fears, that, when the doctor, who had been out
twice since midnight, got up to attend to one of
these wretched calls, I threw my arms round him,
and begged him not to leave me, feigning sickness
myself. `Jane,' said he, kindly, `don't be
frightened
for me. I could not rest with the
consciousness
that a poor wretch was ill whose life I might
save. Think, think a momentyour heart will
tell you I should not. You know I am a sinner,'
continued he, smiling, `and I must do something to
wash away my sins. Boerhaave says that the poor
are the best patients; for God is their paymaster:
so, come, let me go; and the first rich man who
sends for me may go somewhere else for a
doctor
,
and I will stay with you.' He kissed me,
and went. Near daybreak he returned, and
complained
of being somewhat unwell, and asked to
see Glassman. I sent for him; and Mr. Glassman
and he were alone for half an hour. When
Glassman came out of the room, he said, the
doctor
was quite unwell; that he had given himself
medicine, but that some of the profession must be
with him; he, accordingly, hastened after them.
Vol. II. 7
When I went into the doctor's room, he looked
wretchedly. He asked me to sit by him and hold
his hand, in a voice scarcely audible, so rapid had
been the advance of the disease. I summoned all
my energies, called the servants and told them to
get hot water, and all the other appliances, for I
was satisfied he had the cholera. But he beckoned
to me, and said, `No! no! only weak: I want rest
sit by me.' I had no doubt of his own
knowledge
of his case, and sat down by him. Alas! he
who had so much sagacity in others' ills, knew not
his own.
Here, Jane Durham folded her arms closely, and,
by a strong effort, continued to speak, but each
word seemed to choke her.
He diedthe next day, he diedI need not
dwell upon itwe were leftmy child and I
to(here she burst into a flood of tears, that choked
her utterance.)
Did you know Dr. P, Mr. Bradshaw? she
said, at last.
Slightly, said Bradshaw. He deserved all
the regard you gave him, I have no doubt, Jane;
for every one reveres his memory.
Yes, yes! I stole into his room, when they had
laid him in his grave-clothes, and gazed upon his
manly face, that had so often smiled on me, till I
thought he could not be deadand I spoke to him
in a low voice, as if to wake him. I know no more
I had a kind of dream. I thought I was buried
by my mother, and a flower that Dr. P had
planted on my grave, was rooted in my heart and
nurtured there, and watered by my tearsOh! the
gladness, when those tears flowed freelyand then,
I thought, Adams stood over me, with that man
beside him, and that they were bartering for my
body. I started up with a terrible scream. I had
been two weeks delirious. Oh! the agony of
returning
consciousness. I looked around me with
a stony eye, that was as dry as an arid desert, and
I thought, if I only could weep, the fountains of life
would flow healthier, and cool the fiery fever in
my veins. I wept, at last, long and bitterly, and I
felt a sensation at my heart's core, as if some one
had done me the deepest injury, and I was
learning
to forgive them. I know not why I should
have had this feeling, but so it was; and whenever
it returns upon me, though I cannot help it, I
shudder
frequently at my own dark brooding, with a
superstitious dread that such repinings bode no
good.
After my recovery, Mr. Glassman told me there
was a house of the doctor's which I had better
occupy
.
Accordingly, I moved into the one in which
you saw me. `The doctor,' he said, `had left
money
in his hands for me.'
When I came to reflect upon it, I hardly
thought it could be so: but what could I do?and
how generous in Mr. Glassman so to cover his
kindness
!
Mr. Glassman frequently comes to see me
very frequently; but he treats me with the same
respect and kindness that he ever did. I know the
world would not believe it, but, sir, we are as we
were.
Mr. Glassman told me he had been more
regular
in his habits, latterly. Sometimes he would
come to see me, excited, and ask me to sing to him.
Once, since the doctor's death, he was very ill, for
some time, from a fit of excess. I had him brought
to the house, and waited on him. As he recovered,
I would sing for him, and read to him, hour by
hour. Since then, until lately, I did not know of any
thing of the kind in his habits: but he's a strange
man; yet, I would lay down my life for himfor,
whatever he may be to others, he is every thing
that is kind and gentlemanly to me.
Week before last, when the carpets wanted
shaking, and the windows washing, Mr. Glassman
told me that he would send a man, who had been
hanging about his office, to do it. The man,
accordingly
,
came. I did not observe him
particularly
,
but gave him directions what to do, told Phbe to
assist, and thought no more of him. Several times
he came and asked me to look at the window or
carpet, and see if he was doing them to please me.
I thought the man was anxious to please; and, that
I might not wound his feelings, I looked over his
work, and told him it was all right. After he had
done the work, he called several times, to know if
there was any thing more to do. Phbe saw him
when he came, and I frequently heard him in the
kitchen, in conversation with herbut I thought
nothing of it. One evening,the night you
rescued
me in the lane,I was sitting, thinking of Mr.
Glassman: for I had not seen him for two days, and
I felt alarmed. I was wondering why he had not
been to see me, as I generally saw him twice or
thrice, daily; when, nearly nine o'clock, a hack
drove up to the door, and this man, whom Mr.
Glassman had sent to clean the carpets, came in
and told me that Glassman was intoxicated and
crazy at a tavern; and that he was in a private
room, and kept calling for me. The man said, he
himself was doing an odd job there, and happened
to see Mr. Glassman in that state; and when Mr.
Glassman was put in a room, the tavern-keeper told
him to wait upon him. `Glassman was quiet,' he
said, `a moment, and asked if I hadn't been there,
and if I was not coming.' My feelingsmy many
obligations to Mr. Glassman did not allow me to
hesitate
.
I asked the man if he could take me to the
place: he answered, quickly, `yes,' and said he had
brought a hack for that purpose. I determined to
go, not having the least suspicion, and being
anxious
to do what I could to restore Mr. Glassman to
himself. Accordingly, I hurried on my cloak and
bonnet, and entered the hack with him. We drove
rapidly, I knew not whither. The man spoke not,
and I sat absorbed in my own reflections. After
driving a considerable distance, and, I thought,
turning many corners, we at last stopped in a
narrow
lane. It was dark, and I could see objects
very indistinctly; for, you remember, it was a gusty
night. The man stepped out and tried to open the
door of the houseknocked repeatedly: no answer
was given. He then entered the hack, and told
the hackman to drive to Dean's. I asked him, as
we drove away, if Dean's was the tavern where
Mr. Glassman was? He said `yes.' `Why did
you not drive there, at once?' I asked. He
hesitated
a moment, and then replied, `that he had
come there for a nurse for him. The
tavern-keeper
7*
said he'd better get one, and directed him here.'
It seemed to me strange; but I reflected the man
was, perhaps, not very bright, and said no more.
We soon stopped at another house. I heard the
sound of a violin. Around the door was a crowd
of men and boys, whose conversation shocked me.
The man who rode with me, asked a boy he called
Fritz, if he had seen old Moll. The boy replied,
`No.' The man then came to me, and said we had
better go in. He was evidently perplexed. I asked
him if Mr. Glassman was in there. He replied that
he wasbut that we'd have to go through a
ball-room
,
that, perhaps, I wouldn't like. I still had no
suspicion of the truth of what the man had told;
but I thought he must be stupid or drunk. I
entered
the house with him.
I have seen little of the varieties of life, but I
immediately discovered from the persons around the
door, that this was a ball of the very lowest
description
of people,every moment the profanest
and most shocking language saluted my ears. Can
it be possible, I thought, that Mr. Glassman is
here?The man preceded me, leading the way
into the room where the dancing was; saying that
we must pass through it, to get into Mr. Glassman's
room. The company in the room I cannot
describe
they
were wretched men and women;
almost
all of them were intoxicated, and many were
drinking at a counter that stood in one corner
covered with decanters. I told the man I would
turn back, and he must come in the morning, and
take me to Mr. Glassman. `Just come on,' said he,
`to the other end of the room, and take a seat a
moment, and I will see the landlord, and we will
find Mr. Glassman.' I followed after him, and took
a seatthe men and women, as I passed along,
stared at me, particularly the women, and
addressed
me in a language, much of which I did not
understand, but what I did made me shudder
they called my companion, familiarly, `Parsnips,'
and asked him what game he was after now, and
who I was. He gave some answer I did not
understand
,
and pointing to a seat, told me he would
be back in a moment. I heard him ask, as he left
me, of some one who stood staring at me, if he had
seen old Moll`Yes,' said the person, `she is at
the other end of the room.' Left alone, I scarcely
had time to think, before a number of men and
women
gathered round me, and asked me who I was.
The men attempted to seize me and take off my
bonnet, and the women stood by cursing me. One
person, who was quite a lad, told them to let me
alonethat I was nothing to them.
`Yes,' said a woman, pushing a man towards
me, who looked like a countryman, `put her and
this new chap together.
`Hands off!' said the one they called new chap;
I can't stand every thing.' Here a terrible
confusion
and quarrelling occurred: knives were drawn,
and lives threatened. I know not what happened;
I buried my head in my cloak to hide the sight.
I heard the cry of `murder!' `don't kill me!' and
`Johnson, you'd no business to hit that man!' amidst
many others! but I dared not look up. A crowd
appeared to pass out the door, and descend the
steps tumultuously. I looked round the roomthere
were very few persons in it, and they were
drinking
and laughing at the counter. I did not know
what to doI feared to address them, and I
thought, at first, that I would go out and try to find
my way home, but the quarrelling, noise, and
imprecations
without, in the street, determined me
to stay where I was until the tumult had
subsided
I
sat still in the most painful anxiety; it
appeared to me a lifetime. I kept my head
buried
in my cloak and bonnet. As two persons passed
me, I heard one say to the other`There's a gal
sowed up; let's see who she is?' `Oh! no matter,'
said the other, and they passed on. After, what
I thought a very long time, the man who took
me there came to me, and saidHe thought I
had gone home, or he would have been with me
before. `The larks are waiting,' he continued;
`you had better let me take you homeMr.
Glassman's
not here.' I followed him out with alacrity:
there was not a single person at the door; we
entered a hack, and away it drove. I asked him
if there was any one killed, he said, `yes, there was.'
`Killed!' exclaimed a woman's voice, beside him,
that made me start. `I guess there was more 'an
one done forJohnson, the watchman, I reckon,
could tell about ithe treated me, to find out if I
knew, but I guess old Moll's not exactly a young
onebut he must keep a look out when the court
sits. I'm pretty much slewed. Who's this gal
you've got here?
No matter; I'll show you before long, said he,
in a voice that startled meit sounded so like one
of old. I hoped for the best, but I said not a word.
Why was I so situated? What did it mean? I knew
not, yet I feared to speak. The night was so dark
and gusty, that I looked out in vain to observe the
place. We stopped at length, but I could not
discover
where. The woman got out first, and tried
to open a door; she could not, and called to the
man to assist her. Wait a moment, said he, as
he went to her. He opened the door for her,
returned
to the hack, caught me in his arms, lifted
me out, and told the hackman to drive on. I called
out to the driver, and entreated him not to leave
me; but he laughed, cracked his whip and
redoubled
his speed. The man bore me into the house
where you rescued me, Mr. Bradshaw. Not until
the moment he discovered himself, had I the least
supposition that the man was Adams. I thought
myself safe from him at least for ten years.
He escaped from the penitentiary two months
since, said Bradshaw; he came here under an
assumed name, and remained unsuspected until he
stabbed a man in a row; he was then arrested, and
discovered to be the notorious Adams who robbed
Jemmy Swartzand who was well known for
other delinquencies before that affair!
Oh! Mr. Bradshaw; how shall I express my
gratitude! In that lonely horrid place I thought no
help could come. Those women, gracious heaven!
to think that they should delight in the ruin of one
of their own sexthat old Moll, I never did her
any harmyet she appeared to entertain the most
demoniac hate towards meher laugh!I thought
myself among demons(here Bradshaw and Jane
Durham arose from the bench against the jail
under the window on which they were seated, as
we have described.) What will become of
Adams?though he is in these prison walls, I do
not feel safe.
Your oath! take that, exclaimed a voice
behind
them through the prison window. At the same
moment, Jane Durham said, faintly, Gracious
heavens
!
Adams, he has stabbed me!and would have
fallen, but for Bradshaw, who caught her in his
arms, lifted her from beneath the window and
looked up at it. A sinewy arm, bare to the shoulder,
was thrust through the bars; in the hand of which
the blade of a large Spanish knife gleamed bright
in the moonlight. Between two bars above it
protruded the head of Adamsthe countenance
was livid with ragehe made two or three
desperate
plunges at Jane Durham as Bradshaw bore
her beyond the reach of the instrumentand then
something was heard to fall within the prisonhis
face became death-likehis hand dropped the
knifehis features were horribly convulsed, while,
in choked accents, he exclaimed, The chair has
fallenI'm hanging by the headsave mehell
Oh! He made repeated convulsive efforts to catch
the bars with the hand that was thrust between
them; but he had either lost his self-possession, or
he was so situated as not to be able to bend his
arm to reach them, for he strove in vain.
Support yourself with your other hand,
exclaimed
Bradshaw, who comprehended his
situation
in a moment, and whose humanity merged
every other feeling, and I will get you
assistance
from Job. As he spoke, he bore Jane
Durham
towards the jailer's apartment.
I am not hurt much, I believe, sir, said she,
as they reached Job's door. I was not near
enough for him to strike a deadly blow. For
Mercy's sake, Mr. Bradshaw, leave me, and get
him released from his awful situationhe will
die, and it will be my fault.
Job was smoking his pipe, cozily, in his room,
talking with his wife and Lucy. Bradshaw
hastily
informed him of the situation of Adams,
looking, as he spoke, at Jane Durham's wound.
It was on the top of the shoulder, bled profusely,
but did not appear deep or dangerous.
The devil, said Job, as he jumped up to get
the keys, his thought occupied not upon Adams's
danger, but in wonderment how the ruffian could
have contrived to hide the knife from him. The
devil, I didn't think the scamp could circumvent
me that waya large Spanish knife, hey! How
could he a got it?I'll take my Bible oath he
hadn't it when I put him innor when I took
the irons off of him. (Job and Bradshaw were
proceeding to the cell of Adams, as the jailer
continued
.)
I took the irons off, you see, Mr.
Bradshaw
,
because the scamp was in a poor way. Yes,
he must have clum up to the window with the
chair. The irons hurt his leg, for that's badly
swelled. I don't see how he could have got his
head between the barsit's rather of the biggest.
(Here Job opened the first door that led to a
range of cells, in one of which was Adams.)
This lock turns as slick as grease, and the door
opens without creakingit ought toall's well
greased. I like to get in an' out, Mr. Bradshaw,
without making a noise that every rascal can
hear.
Job, you tread as light as a ladyit's only
my step that sounds.
Yes, Squire, I tread light, though I be heavy.
You see I'm used to it; and, at night, I
commonly
puts on a pair of Indian rubbers, so that I can
take the rounds, and hear and not be heard.
As Job spoke, they reached the cell of Adams.
The cells, as we have observed, were partly
under
ground. The window was high up, so that
Adams, when he overheard the conversation, was
compelled to put the chair against the wall, and
stand on the back of it to discover who were
without
.
The jail wall was very thick, the windows
small, and the bars nearer the outside. The
horizontal
bars were closer than the upright ones;
so that Adams, when he mounted on the back of
the chair, (and it was a precarious foothold,) to
see the individuals immediately under his
window
,
had to protrude his head out sideways, and
then turn it to look down. Enraged by Jane
Durham's narrative of his conduct, and
determined
to take her life; yet, being unable to reach
her as she sat, he had to await the moment of her
rising, to strike with the probability of satiating
his vengeance. By the movement of his person,
in the desperate effort to inflict a deadly wound,
he had pushed down the chair; and being unable,
in that situation, to turn his head and withdraw
it, he hung, of course, suspended by it. He could
not relieve himself, as we have stated, with the
hand that held the knife; and the other, not yet
having recovered from the blow which Bradshaw
gave him on the shoulder at old Moll's was
useless
:
consequently, when Job and Bradshaw
entered
his cell, they found him hanging by the
head, with his back towards them. A slight,
jerking motion was made by his legs. Bradshaw
caught hold of them, so as to relieve him, and
called out to Job to put the chair against the wall,
and get his head loose.
Wait one moment, Squire, said the
imperturbable
Job, till I fasten the door. No tricks
upon travellers. Ha! continued he, as he placed
the chair against the wall; look at that, now
one of his shoes is off; he had his knife sewed in
the sole of it. (Mounting the chair, and feeling
his head.) He's dead, Squiregonedied upon,
I may say, a nateral gallows for such a jail-bird.
He wasn't born to be drownedthough he didn't
expect such a hanging as this. I can't get his
head loosehe's as cold as them leg-irons. Well,
among his other robberies, he's robbed the
penitentiary
of more 'an five years of services,
adjudged
;
and of many more debts of the kind, on
which, if I may speak according to law, the state
might have got judgment, but not
execution
ha!
ha! (All this time, Job was trying to get the
head out.) It can't be done, Squirewe'll have
to get help, and slant his body round, and get
him out that way. Let go his legs, Squire. You
needn't to hold him uphe's as dead as though
he was hung according to law: and that would
have been a more honourable death, and a better
one, to a certainty, than going this gatefor he'd
Vol. II. 8
had time to repent, and a priest with him to pray
and time to think about his sins, and not gone
out of the world trying to commit murder. It's
awful, continued Job, standing on the floor with
folded arms, looking at the bodyit's awful!
You can't help feeling, though you oughtn't to
feel for such creaturs. It's his own fault, and
he's nobody to blame but himself. You see;
Squire, I let him have the chair, because he said
his leg pained him, when he lay down with it, all
the timeand he couldn't walk on itand he
wanted to set up a little. It's wrong to be kind
to these prisonersthey always pervert it to
harm themselves. Well, said Job, as they left
the cell, I must get help, and get him down
and send off for the crowner and have a 'quest
over him. Every prisoner in this 'ere jail shall
know his end; and let it be a warning to 'em not
to try to escape, or cut shines through the bars.
Job went for help, and Bradshaw to learn if
Jane Durham needed a physician. The knife of
the ruffian had penetrated her shoulder about two
inches. The wound had bled freely, but the blood
was now stopped by the appliances of Mrs.
Presley
,
who thought that nothing serious was to be
apprehended.
Jane Durham here stepped into her room for a
moment, and Bradshaw followed her.
Miss Durham, said he, the only time I had
the pleasure of seeing Dr. P, he attended me
professionally: his death was so sudden that I never
remunerated himyou must allow me to cancel
my indebtedness, and he handed her his
pocket-book
.
No, no! Mr. Bradshaw, I am indebted to you
for more than life, and you cannot owe
Nay, my beautiful, brave ally, you will deeply
wound my feelings, if you do not take it. When
you leave here, look over Dr. P's books, and
you will find that I am indebted to him this amount
if you do not, you can return it. Come, pretty
Jane, my old schoolmate, you must take itdo you
not remember how I used to pluck the wild flower
for you, when you sang me a sweet songthat
was a boy's gift, for the pleasure you had given;
this is no gift at all; it is offered only because it is
your due.
She stretched forth her hand; Bradshaw pressed
it, and left in it the pocket-book.
Jane, you told me once, after I had given you
a rose, that you kept the stem when every leaf had
gone. Now, to please an old schoolmate, just keep
the book when its leaves are gone, in memory of
auld lang syne. Remember, I give it to you as a
knight of old would give his glovea gage that
I will be your champion, let who will enter the
lists against you.
Mr. Bradshaw, you press me to the earth with
gratitude, said Jane Durham, while a blush glowed
over her cheek, neck, brow, and bosom so vividly
that she hid her face in her hands.
Gratitude! I should be the grateful one, Jane:
why, for the little service I did for you the other
night, I have been greeted with shouts, huzzas,
and praises from hundredsfor knocking down
Adams, and for the mere circumstance at the fire.
Take care of your wound, Janeyou must cure it
without a scaryou must not have the least
memorial
of that ruffian near you. Good night.
Lucy, said Bradshaw, as he entered the
adjoining
room, do you know whether your father
has got down the body of Adams yet?
Yes, sir, said Lucy, who was putting on her
bonnet and cloak, they've got it down. Good
gracious, ain't it terrible? Daddy says that his neck
is broken and twisted, and his under jaw is broken,
and many of his teeth are pushed outbut he was
a bad man.
Yes, Lucy, very. Where are you going?
I'm going sir, to stay with Mrs. Mulvany: her
old man, Josey, is not very well, and she wants
company.
Who goes with you?
My daddy, sir.
I can save him the walk, Lucy. I go directly
by Nancy's; and you must let me be your beau.
Lucy blushed; and on the instant, her father
entered
.
Ah, squire! exclaimed Job, I've just been to
hunt the knife; here it is. It's pretty much knife,
I can tell ye. Well, he'll never see it again, that's
sartin. His head's mashed all to pieces, sir. We've
got him ready for the crowner. Squire, I'll send
you word when they meet, that you may depose.
Come, Lucy.
Job, I'll save you the troubleI go right by
Mrs. Mulvany's, and I'll see that Lucy gets there
safe.
Why, squire, I can't think of giving you such
a trouble.
No trouble, Job, at all; it's right in my way,
man. Job, you know you told me that there were
no boards in the jail yard, and you defied me to
get out, said Bradshaw, laughing.
Well, so I did, squire, and so I do, exclaimed
Job: you don't think you could ha' got over this
high jail wall with the bench that was under
Adams's cell window, do you?
Not exactly; but, if I were a prisoner in your
jail, Job, and I were to break jail, and get into the
yard, don't you think, with the steps of the
gallows
,
and the rest of it, I might contrive to scale
the wall?
Furies! squire, that's true bill; and I never
thought of it beforeain't that wonderful? You
see, boards that's left about the jail yard's my fault,
but it's the sheriff's fault, if the gallows is left
standing
I'll
tell him, though.
Why, Job, it's not natural that a jailer should
think a malefactor would mount the gallows, to
make his escape, hey!
As Bradshaw and Lucy left the jail, Job walked
round to the gallows, and shook the steps and planks
of itthen, after taking keen looks over the jail,
he proceeded to his apartments, ruminating upon
what had happened, muttering, as he went
It won't do to take the gallows down now; we
shall need it.
8*
CHAPTER III.
Lucy
, those are pretty flowers of yours, said
Bradshaw to the jailer's daughter, as they passed
them; she tripping
along by his side.
Yes, sir; but sometimes I think I'll never touch
them againthe soil is so poor, and then the
prisoners
,
who have the yard, take them, or tread
over them so often.
What beaux have you at the jail, Lucy?
Not many, sirand, indeed, Mr. Bradshaw,
there come so many bad men to jail, young men,
too, who look as if they should be good, that though
I don't suspect people, it seems to me I ought.
And, Lucy, have you never been in love?
I have had likings, sir, but
But what, Lucy?
I thought they would not please daddy, sir, and
I tried to forget them.
And you have not altogether succeeded?
Not altogether, sir.
Lucy, I'm too young to give you advice. I may
stand in need of it myself, but
Daddy says, sir, he thinks your advice is better
than any of the lawyers'.
Ah! does he, Lucy? Well, as your daddy
thinks so well of me, if ever I can be of any
service
to you in any way, you must not forget to ask
it, will you?
No, sir, I will not.
Lucy, you have behaved so kindly to Jane
Durham that you deserve to do well. I'll lay my
life on it, you are the best girl that ever was in a
jail. But beware of those persons about the jail:
bad men love the fair flower, but they do not care
to nurse iteven before it fades they neglect it;
and when it withers, they rudely trample it in the
dustyou have heard Jane Durham's story?
Yes, sir, and a hard life, indeed, she has had
of it. Adams is the worst man, I think, I ever
heard of.
True, Lucy; but any one would shrink from
such a wretch as Adams, by a kind of instinct; his
roughness, his ferocity are not relieved by a single
virtue that I can discover, and his countenance
tells the tale on him at oncebut there are others
that are good-looking and fair-spoken, who are as
bad as Adams.
Lucy held down her head, and sighed.
Lucy, let me give you this advice. Do not
listen to any of these men, who have the liberty of
the yard, if they speak to you of liking you. And
when your good heart leads you to ask some sick
prisoner through his prison windows, how he is;
do not let your gentle, girlish sympathies too
quickly
believe the tale he tells you of his innocence.
Receive his gratitude as your mother or your
father
would receive it. Do not think too much of
the pretty words he tells it inhe may be very
bad and seem to be very good. Some one of them
may tell you, he has reformed for love of you; but
it will be much harder, may be, to keep good
feeling
alive in him, even though he has, than it is to
cultivate your little bed of flowers, by the jail wall.
How careful you have to be of that! The soil
is so bad, and the prisoners who have the yard,
take them, after you have so kindly tended them.
Thus will it be with the gentle virtueswith love
even of you, Lucy, in such a man's hearthis
rude companions will tear them up after you have
planted them, and nursed them with so much care,
and you'll have so often to water them with your
tears. What kind of man is Johnson, the
watchman
,
Lucy?
Oh! sir, from what came out to-day, he must
be a very bad man. But I have always heard he
was a very bad man. He got a good salary as a
watchmanand he owned the house he lived in.
His wife and daughter took in sewing, and every
cent they made, he spent; and he treated them
very badlyso folks say.
They here reached Nancy's door, and Bradshaw
told Lucy to remember him to Nancy, and bid her
good night.
Bradshaw, exclaimed Nancy, who was coming
out of a gate by her house. Come in, and let
me see ye yerself, and I'll remember ye the better,
man.
How's Josey, Nancy?
Better, honey, betterhe's had a bad
rheumatiz
,
but he's better. That's Lucy with ye; she's
come to stay with me, is it? Come in a minute.
I've just been in the yard to get a brick to heat
for Josey's feetit's better than a flat-iron, ye see,
because that won't hold the heat so long, and the
handle's in the wayit's very grateful to the
rheumatiz
.
Come in.
Bradshaw and Lucy entered. Bradshaw sat a
few moments, talking with Nancy, and then bid
them good night.
Lucy, dear, said Nancy, when Bradshaw had
gonewhere did ye see Bradshaw?
At the jail, ma'am.
Hand me that black bottle, Lucy, dear, in the
corner of the cup-board. My hussy, Beck, ye see,
runs about of errands so much through the day,
that I let her go to bed. And niggers being, as
they hain't got the sense of white people, require
more sleep, like dumb animals. And what did
Bradshaw say to ye, honeyhow come he to come
with ye, dear? proceeded Nancy, while she
busied
herself in making a little hot toddy for Josey;
tasting frequently, to ascertain that the ingredients
were properly mixed, adding now a little brandy,
now a little sugar, and, occasionally, a little water.
What did he say to ye, dear.
He gave me good advice, said Lucy,
innocenty
.
About what, honey, asked Nancy, glancing
over her shoulder, at Lucy.
Not to trust the people at the jailany of the
men who have the yard, if they should speak to
me of liking me, said Lucy, blushing.
Good advice, said Nancy, pausing in the act
of raising the glass to her lip, which she affected
just to sipBradshaw's a young one to give it,
thoughand he's not a professor of religion; but
he's a good heart. He said nothing to ye but
good advice, Lucy?
And he asked me of Johnson, the watchman,
and his family.
That's an awful business, to-day, Lucythat
Johnson is as black-hearted as the evil one
himself
he
deserves hanging. I don't know when
I felt for a human creatur more than for that
poor thing to-day. I wonder how she come to
be at Dean'sit's a low place;she's pretty, and
she's been awfully tempted. We're sinners all.
Lucy, dear, just tread lightly into the back room,
and bring me the Bible that's open, on the foot
of Josey's bed. How did you leave Jane
Durham
?
She's happier than she was; she's been
walking
in the jail-yard with Mr. Bradshaw, all the
evening.
Walking in the jail-yard with her, said
Nancy to herself, with a half humorous doubting
smile, as Lucy left the room. Good advice agin,
I wonder! The poor thing likes Bradshaw; I
just see where it'll endthere be a fuss 'atween him
and Glassman. Lucy here returned, and Nancy
said to her:There, Lucy, that's a good girl.
Take a seat, and trim the candle, dear; I'll do
some knitting. We are weak creatures, all. That
was a most excellent sarmunt we had last Sabbath
morn, honey, from Mr. Gowler; there was real
unction in it. `Lead us not into temptation,' was
the text. Temptation is an awful trial, Lucy,
and hard to resist. This is a wicked world; the
natur of man is as prone to evil, as the sparks to
fly upward, and for that matter, woman's too. I
sometimes, honey, set and thinkbetween whiles,
when I'm not selling at the court, and Beck's away,
and I'm not talking to no body, I have an awful
time to thinkI set and think of the snares, and
pitfalls, and trials, and temptations, and
backslidings
backslidings
is a common sin, Lucy,
that besets the whole of us. I sometimes wonder
to myself, how the world gits on so well,
considering
all thingsthe vanities, and wickedness, and
tribulations, and besetments that's around about us.
But, we must buckle on our armour, as good Mr.
Gowler says, and fight the wicked one. Read out,
Lucy; read outyour voice sounds to me like as if
it was meant to read the word.
Mean while, Bradshaw proceeded to his office.
On his way he met Fritz.
Fritz, he exclaimed, why did not you return
to the court to-day, with the witness, who, you
told me, was with you when you saw Johnson
murder the man?
Why, Mr. Bradshaw, I've been hunting him
all day, and I'm after him now. I'll bring him
round to your office, to-morrow.
Well, do. How did you get away from
Johnson
,
that night, FritzI never asked you?
Two of the boys came up, sir, and hustled
him while I run.
What was the reason the lane was so still that
night?
Why, sir, the fuss sent some of the boys to
covey, after the ball broke upthey were afraid
of being brought inand others were prowling
about slily to catch some steamboat characters,
who had been in the lane, just after dark, and had
a fight with some of the boys. We had mustered
strength, and expected to pay 'em up. I was
looking round for them, when Johnson caught me.
I expect he thought I knew something of the
murder
,
and he wanted to put me in jail, and keep me
safe from telling.
Did not you pass me in the lane, that night,
just before you get to old Moll's.
Yes, sir, one of the boys, who was with you,
came a-head and met me. He told me who you
was, and that they were a going to see you through
the lane. I thought I'd go on; for the watchman, I
expected, would be after me.
Well, Fritz, take care of yourself, and bring
big Bob round to my office as soon as you find
him. Oh, why do they call Adams Parsnips?
Because, he said, sir, 'twas the first thing he
ever stole.
Bradshaw had scarcely left Fritz, while he
walked along leisurely, enjoying the calm moonlight,
when he was overtaken by Willoughby and
Cavendish
,
arm in arm.
Bradshaw, said the Kentuckian, what girl
was that you were walking with past the theatre,
on the
dark
side of the street?
Where were you? asked Bradshaw.
At the corner, by the magistrate's office, said
the Judge, your tongue was running like a
steamer's
wheels. Who was she?
Job's daughter.
What Job? asked the Judge.
The jailer's daughter, Lucy.
Bradshaw you're a pretty fellow! Quite
appropriate
,
thoughand in charactera thief-taker,
one night, and the gallant of a jailer's daughter
anotherI suppose you have the laudable intention
of doing your best to make old Job as great a
sufferer as was his namesake, said Cavendish.
Judge, we must get you a tub, by Joveit's
all you want to be the Diogenes of our modern
Athens.
Well, I can tell you this, Bradshaw, in earnest,
said the Judge; that, if you have any intention of
playing the gay Lothario with this poor girl, who,
I am told, is as good as she is pretty, that when I
light my lamp to find an honest man, I'll not walk
round by your office for the purpose.
Judge, you'll finish your days in the pulpit, I've
no doubtand, like too many of the cloth, you'll
think that all virtue is confined to your class. No,
sir; your Roman friendship estimates my
honourable
feelings rather lowly. I'll flirt with her who
likes flirtationI'll go as far as I am ledI'll meet,
perchance, more than half way, the proffered
blandishment that courts solicitation. Nay, I may
pass the Rubicon, but not o'er the ruins of a
broken
heart, a violated friendship, or a betrayed
confidence.
I'm glad to hear you say that, Bradshaw, said
the Judge. I know you are something of a Csar
in ambition; and I did not know but what your
morality also resembled his.
The Judge lectures you like a very Cato,
Bradshaw, said Kentuck; and I hope you'll lay
it to heart: for he's a righteous judge.
Vol. II. 9
You're marvellous godly men, upon my word!
exclaimed Bradshaw, laughing. You've been to
the theatrehey! The Judge here would enact
the Hypocrite to perfection, and Kentuck, I think
I hear you as Maw-worm, exclaiming, `He's a
saint.'
Then you don't think you'll ever play the
character of Joseph, said Kentuck to Bradshaw.
Joseph! exclaimed Bradshawwhat, Mrs.
Potiphar's Joseph?never, if from no other
consideration
than a respect for my garment. The
Judge now enacts another Joseph, Joseph Surface,
admirablyhe has such `excellent sentiments!'
This all may be very witty, Bradshaw, said
the Judge; but I'm sorry to hear you express
yourself soI hope it is the ambition of saying
witty things, and not your notions of morality that
dictates to you. And, to speak upon a matter of
companyjailers' daughters and frail ones in allies,
you had better confined your republicanism to
your politics.
Bah! said Bradshaw. My republicanism
teaches me self-respect in all respects.Don't you
know that the great poet says you must not
have too much respect unto the world
They lose it that do court it with much care.
Yes, sir; this world is like a coquettewoo
devotedly
,
and you're jiltedtreated as Garrick
treated
his friends
He let off his friends as a huntsman his pack;
For he knew, when he chose, he could whistle them back.
But stand upon your reserved rights, as a man,
which you did not part with, when you became a
party to the compact of societyand society will
respect you. Who lives in that splendid mansion?
continued Bradshaw, pointing to one near them.
G, exclaimed the Judge.
Wellhis father was a Scotchman, and was
sold, on his arrival in this country, as an `indented
servant,' to pay his passage money. He applied
himself, after his time was out, to commercemade
a fortune; and there his son lives, a very clever
fellow. The servant who will come to his door,
when you pull the bell, is an `indented servant'
sold to pay his passage from the
ould
country: no
more and no less than what G's father was.
Lucy Presley is the daughter of old Job Presley,
the jailer, whose father fought in the good fight of
our revolution, and held the respectable station
of lieutenant in the continental army. He had not
a sixpence when the army was disbanded, and he
married the daughter of a tavern-keeper, and died
a short time afterwards of strong waters. Job was
born after his father's death; and, in due time, ran
about his grandfather's tavern, no doubt, a curly
headed ragamuffin, who held a traveller's horse for
a copper, and consorted with stable boys, whose
greatest envy was a well-appointed horse jockey.
Lucy is of a good familyhey, Judge! Yet, the
Miss Gs might think it strange to meet Lucy
Presley in society;nevertheless, Lucy has more
beauty and more intellect than all the Miss Gs
put together: and I am not saying that they are
not very clever girlsgood, honest, true-and-true
descendants from old G, an `indented servant,'
who was no less a personage than their grandfather.
Now, I think no more of the Miss Gs
because
they have wealthnor should I think less of
them, if they wanted it; and it is perfectly
indifferent
to me who their grandfather was so long as
they are ladies, and behave as such. But should
it ever so happenand such things often happen
that Lucy, humble as she now is, should be invited
into society, and I should hear the Miss Gs
speak of the distinctions of `their set,' and the sin of
admitting a jailer's daughter among the aristocracy,
I should, with the coolest voice in the world, mention
who Lucy washer family,and ask if one
generation
could make or break titles to aristocracy;
and upon what aristocracy was founded?whether
the grand-daughter of a soldier of the revolution,
who was beautiful and good, had not as high claims
upon the attention of society, as the
grand-daughters
of an honest old Scotchman, who was a
freeman
,
or, rather, a
freedman
because he worked
out his freedom, but not in the battle-field.
Why, Bradshaw, I thought you liked the Miss
Gs, said Cavendish.
So I doand I like them because they have
much less assumption than persons generally, who
have acquired wealth as they did;and so long as
they are as they are, God speed them, and continue
with them all the blessings that wealth bestows.
But the moment they claim peculiar privileges and
immunities, on the score of wealth,I would give
the honour to whom it is due,I would blazon the
grandad's indentures on their front door, and do all
I could to promote a match between one of the
Miss Gs and their `indented servant,' because
I should be for keeping their wealth in their
peculiar
line of aristocracyto which society I would
confine them.
Dn the Gs! exclaimed the Judge, who
was full of family pride, for he claimed descent from
one of the first, wealthiest, and foremost families in
the revolutiona family that had possessed an
immense entailed estate, which, under our
republican
government, as estates tail are not known,
passed out of their hands, by a prodigality which
knew how to spend, but not to earn. Bradshaw,
every body says you write those lampoons that are
making such a fuss in Jekyl's paper. Why don't
you lampoon these upstarts?
Now, Judge, there you're wrong. I should
begin
my lampoon on family pride, if I lampooned
any such follies. I wish Selman were here; I'd
make a whole host of such quotations on the
subject
:
from Burns, about rank being but the `
guineas'
stamp,' and a man being the `gold, for aye
that'yes, and the ploughman-poet might have
said, that there is less alloy in the unstamped gold
than in the guineafrom Pope, on the `blood of
the Howards;' from Tom Jefferson; from Burke,
who, though he was the great champion of
aristocracy
,
did not respect it much in the person of the
duke of Bedford, when defending himself and son
from the duke's attackfrom, in fact, all the great
names of modern and ancient times. It's well enough
for him who has no other distinction but his wealth,
to boast of thatit's all he has to boast of. He who
has nothing but family pride can have pride, of
course, in nothing else. We who carry our stock
9*
in trade upon our shoulders mustay, you laugh
you think we may not have enough to speak of
no, we never should have enough to speak of
ourselves; let others speak of itthat's the kind of
pride that I pride myself in. Self-sustainment is my
theory, blow high or blow low, and I'll practise it.
You're right, Bradshaw; only I'd have this
self-sustainment, as the true Kentuck spirits have
it, from the heart, from impulse, from nature, said
Willoughby.
So would I, said Bradshaw, have it from the
heart, but I'd call the head in as a co-operator. I
tell you what it is, we must always call the head
in to the help of that same fluttering, palpitating,
trembling, impulsive agent. Why, though you are
lion-hearted, yet, if the net is round youyou
remember
the fableyou are confined by cords that
you cannot break, unless the little mouse cuts
through them, and lets you out! Your heart may
be ever so big and so valiant, but when it gets you
into a scrape, Judge, when the net's around you,
you have, after all, to set that mouse of a head of
yours to work.
Mr. Bradshaw, what do you mean by that?
asked Cavendish, petulantly; I don't understand
you, sir.
No harm, Judge, no harm, replied Bradshaw,
laughing. I think too well of your heart to
disparage
your head.
There were few persons stirring at this hour.
This conversation commenced in a fashionable and
much-frequented street, and before it had continued
long, the young men came to a halt, at a corner,
where there had been a great fire, and where
nothing
stood around them but its ruins. Here they
parted: Bradshaw strolled on, for he wished to be
alone, and the excitement of the day had banished
sleep.
Standing, at last, upon a hill that overlooked
the city, for he had rambled to a favourite spot,
ruminating upon the thoughts which the
conversation
had called up, he said, in soliloquy, almost
aloudBah! what can the few wealthy men in
that city do for me; leave me their fortunes they
won't, though I were ever so much their humble
servant; give me a daughter one of them might, if
the lady fair were willing, and if willing she were
Though mammy and daddy, and all should be sad,
Whistle, and I will come to you my lad.
I must remember that quotation for Selman's
benefitwho couldn't reconcile mammy or daddy
afterwards. But I can earn wealth sufficient,
without any such proceedings. The vote of him
who lives in the largest mansion in that full city,
is no better than his vote who tumbles with a
dozen others out of a shanty. Ay, and it is often
given, with not half so much disinterestedness
the great mass of the people mean to do right
they seek no office and expect none. Give me old
Job's vote and influence in preference to G's
any day. And as for family prideif that counts
have I not the proud imperial purple of the
commonwealth
of kings, the Pilgrims in my veins
made hotter by this southern sun, which my
fathers
preferred to a colder beam? No, let these
men dive and dig, and delve and toil on to make
wealth, and be aristocratsheaven save such
aristocracy
nothing
else can save it, beyond one
generation
in our country. Truly, has some one
said, that here the children of the rich are the
parents of the poor. Let them get wealth
they'll spend the more some day to do honour, may
be, to their humble servant. Let them get wealth,
and bring their sons up in sloth; 'twill keep them
out of my path. If Talbot were poor, he might
do something; but now, bah! he will be spurred
into an occasional feeble effort, and fail. And his
wealth will give him all the leisure to canker and
fester over it. But Ithe stern necessity is on
me to labourto do head workand if the sweat
of the brain is like other sweat, a plebeian
offering
to the goddess industry, may be I may pluck,
in my rough road, a certain leaf or two, and hide
the sweltering stain upon my brow, as Csar hid
his baldness. `Impossible,' said Mirabeau`that
word is not in my vocabulary,' nor shall it be in
mine.
CHAPTER IV.
Scrags
had so far eluded justice. When he
left the court-house he forged a check upon one of
the banks for ten thousand dollars, obtained the
money, and left the city in a steamboat before his
absence from the court was observed. It was
thought he had gone to one of the new states in
the far West. As Mr. Shaffer had not yet
returned
,
the court appointed Bradshaw to attend
to his duties; in their fulfilment, the case of
Johnson
,
the watchman, was presented to the grand
jury. They found an indictment against him for
murder in the first degree.
Johnson sent his wife and daughter to Bradshaw,
to implore his tenderness. Of course, he resisted;
but not without being deeply moved by their
tearful
solicitations. A by-stander, to have heard them,
would have supposed that Johnson was one of the
best husbands and fathers in the world. In such
cases, lawyers are often placed in situations that
probe their feelings to the core; but as Erskine
said, on a memorable occasion, they should do
their duty, and leave the consequence to God.
What lawyer has not observed this difference
between the sexes, namely: If a woman is indicted
for an offence, who attends her in the awful
presence
of justice, to console and cheer her, braving
the stare of the gaping crowd, the humiliation of
such companionship and such a connexion?a
mother or a sister. How seldom a father, a
brother
,
or a husband! If a man is placed in the bar,
who is most solicitous for him?always his aged
mother, his broken-hearted wife, or his sorrowing
daughter. Shame, sorrow, degradation, contempt,
are all forgotten in the strength of a woman's love.
How seldom in a man's! If he attendsand when
does he?his look towards the prisoner at the bar,
though his nearest relative, is often dark and
scowling
a
sense of the shame that attaches to himself
weighing on him at the very crisis of the prisoner's
fate. A woman's look is that of compassion and
sympathy. She thinks not of her own situation, or
of the opinion of the crowd around her, as regards
herself: if she glances at them, it is only when some
part of the testimony makes for or against
him
, or
the judge or the lawyer speaks upon some strong
point, that she may discern their opinions of his
fate. She watches his every movement: if she is
near him, she anticipates his every wantshe hands
him the glass of water to quench the fever that
anxiety has producedshe walks by his side from
the court to the prison, and from the prison to the
courtshe sits as near to him in the court as
possible
she
would sit in the bar with him, would
they allow hershe waits, for hours, to exchange
one word with him through the grated doorshe
rakes and scrapes all she can to make him decent
at his trial, that his appearance may produce a
favourable
impression. If the awful verdict is against
him, she forsakes him not, though all the world have
forsaken him. In the last extremity, she is by his
side with a love that, like a noble arch, pressure
strengthens. She attends him to the very foot of
the gallowshis ignominy, his ill-treatment of her
are not thought of. Whose wail was that, which,
when the fatal drop fell, pierced every ear and every
heart with the conviction that there was one whose
pang was keener even than the dying convict's?
'twas hers. And she will beg his body, and
compose
decently the distorted limbs, and bury him
with care. The spot where he is laid, though
known as the murderer's grave,which the world
points to with horror, and where superstition says
no grass will ever grow,is, nevertheless, a
hallowed
spot to her, where she will even plant the
flower and nurture the grass, to induce the belief
that, if superstition is correct, the sleeper is
innocent
.
What the poet makes her say is true
I know not, I ask not, if guilt's in that heart,
I but know that I love thee, whatever thou art!
Johnson made a desperate struggle for his life.
He employed, as his counsel, the celebrated Mr.
Wt.
In this city, where our narrative is laid,which,
as we have before told our readers, for good and
sufficient
reasons, we may not name, there being, may
be, more truth in our story, than is necessary to
make a novel,in this city it was customary for
the ladies, (the very fashionable ones,) to attend
important trials, when it was understood that there
would be nothing said that a delicate ear might
not hear. The ladies were very anxious to attend
this trial. First of all, perhaps, they wished to see
Jane Durham, of whom they had heard a great
deal; and, secondly, they were desirous of hearing
the speech of Mr. Wt, who was esteemed, by
many of the best judges, the best advocate of our
country, and that of Bradshaw, whose rising
reputation
,
and marked character, were becoming, daily,
a subject of more interest; and, lastly, if we were
scandalous, or even disposed to attribute to the sex
some of those characteristics, which certain cynics
have attributed to them so often, that the common
ear has been abused, we should say, some personal
considerations of the array they would make
mingled
with their curiosity. Certain it is, that, at
the house of Mrs. Grey, the day before the trial,
several of the fair fashionables, among whom she
was the leader, after debating the matter among
themselves, whether there would be any
impropriety
in attending the trial, resolved, unanimously,
that there was none. And Willoughby, Cavendish,
and several other gentlemen, were advised that
their services, as beaux, were expected on the
occasion
.
They should have called us into the council,
said Cavendish to Willoughby, before they
determined
to poke themselves into the court-house, and
push us out of our seats, to witness a trial for
murder
!
This is worse than yours and Bradshaw's
mania for thief-catching. They'd better commence
the practice of the law, at once. They've got to
wearing the breeches,at least, so their ankles
indicate
,and,
by and by, they'll throw off their
own apparel, and stand revealed in ours. But,
Kentuck, we must take the girls, Miss Carlton and
Miss Bradshaw: they want to hear Wt and
Bradshawa proper curiosity in them. I'll wait
on Miss Bradshaw.
You'll miss the figure, there, said Kentuck. I
have engaged to attend her and Miss Carlton,
myself
.
I'll resign Miss C. to you, if you say so.
Ah! jumps the cat that way? I thought you
told me once, you `looked to the west when you
went to your rest'quoting Burns.
So I do; and I may tell you that the Purchase
lies directly west from the citybut I'm
Bradshaw's
friend, as well as yourself. And as I am a
broad-shouldered Kentuckian, I can push my way
through the crowd better than you; and I want
Miss Bradshaw to have a good seat, that she may
hear her brother.
Very
friendly
, exclaimed Cavendish. Well,
from the same friendly motive, I'll escort Miss
Carlton, and follow in the wake of your broad
shouldersshe takes an interest in Bradshaw, too,
I take it.
The night before the trial, Bradshaw, an hour
after dark, closed the book which he was reading
in his office, and, rising, said to himself
To-morrow comes on the trial of Johnson.
Wt will make a great speech. He ought to;
he is gray in greatness, with the experience of fifty
winters on his headwith an intellect ripened,
matured, in its fullest vigour. Like certain rare
Vol. I. 10
trees, it bears fruits and flowersthe imagination
of the poet and the subtlety of the logician at the
same time. Well, I've been studying hard all day;
I can't know the case better if I study it till it comes
on. I'll slip on my best bib and tucker; wear a
careless
miena smooth browand go to the party:
but
`Saddle White Surrey for the field to-morrow.'
When Bradshaw entered the court-room the
next morning, he found Nancy seated at her usual
place, within the door of the large area, from which
passages lead to the clerk's office, the civil court,
the criminal court, &c., eyeing sharply over her
specks the motley crowdanticipating, no doubt,
a rich harvest, for she had a more than usual
supply
upon her table, temptingly arranged.
Beck, you hussy, stand close to me. Two for
a fip, honeythem apples are two for a fip. The
frost killed 'em all last springand, remember,
this is spring again. Ah! Bradshaw, is that ye
no news of Scrags yet.
No, Nancy, not a word.
Ye may depend he's gone for good, Bradshaw;
he was the meanest white man goinghe was jist
like one of them apples I've pitched away there
rotten to the core;
he'll be overtaken yet in his
iniquity
,
ye may depend. Ther's a judgment agin
him.
Bradshaw passed on.
Beck, exclaimed Nancy, to her girl, pick up
yer spelling-book; don't ye see it's drapped in the
dust. Though I'm none of yer abolitions, as ye call
'em, continued Nancy, addressing an acquaintance
who was buying some apples; for I believe niggers
were meant for slavesyet they ought to have
learning enough to read God's word. Beck can
spell now. In her book ther's some reading besides
spelling; and I like to look over it myself
sometimes
it's
as good as a sarmont.
Ah, dears, continued Nancy, as she turned
and beheld Miss Bradshaw and her companions;
ye've come to hear the trial, hey? Well, it
ain't often such sweet girls as ye come to court
and I wish all that come could have such happy
facesbut that can't be. Miss Emily, your
brother
has brought this murder to light, bravely;
he kept dark till the nick o' time.
The ladies stopped and spoke with Nancy.
She pressed nuts and apples on them. Kentuck
put his hand in his pocket to pay for them.
Kentuck! exclaimed Nancy, (she gave him
the appellation his friends generally gave him,)
wait till I ask ye, will ye? Dears, get good
seats. Jist on them chairs, behind the jury-box,
is a good place. Josey Mulvany!I was jist
calling to Josey to get ye chairsbut the poor
man's got the rheumatiz.
The ladies entered the court room, and were
so fortunate as to obtain the seats recommended
by Nancy.
Who is that beautiful creature that Mr.
Bradshaw
is talking with? asked Mary Carlton, of
Willoughby, a few minutes after they were
seated.
Where?Ah! to the left of the box
opposite
;that's
the fair lady for whom he played
knight errant.
What a sweet face that girl has beside her!
She's the jailer's daughter. Bradshaw calls
her his jaileress of hearts.
Ah! exclaimed Mrs. Grey. Why, Mr.
Bradshaw is as republican as democratic in his
gallantry, as he is in his politics.
We must give him credit for sincerity, at
least, said Miss Carlton; for, unlike many
politicians
,
he practises what he preaches.
Bradshaw here discovered them, and made his
way through the crowd to the side of Mrs. Grey.
The lady laughed, and repeated to him what she
had said.
Lucy, lady, said he, in reply, is what
Halleck
,
our American poet, calls one of `Nature's
Aristocracy.' The flower that blooms in a jail yard,
is as beautiful, to me, as that which grows upon
the castle walls,more so, if in itself it is
beautiful
;
because it must have rare virtues to win the
respect of the inmates of such a placeand Lucy
has won it. Flowers, lady, cannot choose their
birth-place, any more than the fair beings of
whom poesy makes them the type.
Here the O! yesO! yesof the crier rang
through the court-house. Bradshaw took his seat
at the trial-table. Johnson was brought in, and
placed at the bar. The prisoner made an effort
to look frank and unembarrassed. When the
indictment
was read to him, he said, not guilty, in a
husky voice. His weeping wife and daughter
followed
him, and took their seats touching the
railing
which encircled him. They looked around
anxiouslyat the judgesat the lawyersat the
crowdwhere, seemingly finding nothing in the
expression of their countenances favourable to
their relative, they turned, with imploring eye,
to the glittering throng of their own sex, who, in
the pride of beauty and wealth, occupied nearly
half the place allotted to the lawyers, and all the
space behind the jury-box,there, indeed, they
met sympathetic looks.
What detains us, Mr. Bradshaw? asked the
judge.
May it please your honour, we wait the
coming of Mr. Wt. The clerk had better
call the witnesses; in the mean time Mr. Wt
will, no doubt, arrive.
While the names of the witnesses were being
called, Mr. Wt entered. Mr. Wt was
a tall, thick-set man, dressed well, may be, with
a little dash of dandyism; for, knowing the
interest
the cause had excited, he was not unmindful
either of the physical or mental man. He had a
full face, rather cadaverous complexion, which
proceeded partly from intense study, and partly
from excesses, that had impaired his constitution
in early life, though now he was a model of all
that might become a man. From complete
obscurity, and doubtful parentage, he had forced
his own way; and not only reformed the
indiscretions
to
use no harsher terminto which an
acute sensibility, contemplating his friendless
condition
,
in his start in life, had plunged him, but
10*
he had won a reputation, which, for forensic
eloquence
and legal acumen, was not surpassed by
any of his countrymen. He had devoted himself
exclusively to his profession, what so few
American
lawyers of commanding talents do. His eye
was bluenose hookedforehead compact, and
broad. His manners were those of a finished
gentleman
.
Mr. Bradshaw, said Mr. Wt, I see I
shall have to gird on my best armour. I am
rather
rusty in criminal lawit is some time since
I have practised itthough we often gather our
greenest laurel in this field.
Bradshaw bowed, and, smiling, said, he came
not to gather laurels, but to accustom himself to
the field in which they were won.
Wt smiled, shrewdly, and shook his head.
The testimony given on Jane Durham's trial
against Johnson was now presented to the jury
in
extenso
. We need not recapitulate it. Job Presley,
the Rev. Mr. Norris, and the person who had
overheard
the conversation by his cell door, between
Johnson and old Moll, were, of course, examined,
and cross-examined by Mr. Wt, but all his
skill could not detect them in a contradiction, nor
lead them into one. The next witness called to
the stand was Fritz. He corroborated all that
Jane Durham had stated of the events at the ball.
It was he who told the crowd around her, in the
ball room, to let her alone. He stated, that the
quarrel arose between the stranger, Carpenter,
who was killed, and some of the frequenters of
Dean's, about a girl who lived with old Moll, called
Sal, and because of his intrusion among them, he
not being, as they said, of their set. The girl had
brought him to the ball, and quarrelled with him
after he got there; and when some of the company
took it up, she gave one of them a dirk, and told
him to stab Carpenter. Carpenter was stabbed,
but not seriously, when, in the midst of the riot,
Johnson, the watchman came in. The company
gave way to him, and did his bidding, all but
Carpenter
,
who, not knowing he was a watchman,
used ill language to him, at which Johnson struck
him repeatedly with his pantoon, and led him by
the collar out of the house. Johnson treated him
so roughly, that some of them called out not to kill
him. Fritz and another followed Johnson out; the
watchman led Carpenter by the collar some way
from the house, when the crowd returned to it.
Carpenter asked Johnson where he was going to
take him, just as they got by the lamp, and Johnson
knocked him down: he fell with his head against
the curb-stone. While he was down, Johnson
kicked and beat him, telling him to get up. Finding
he could not rise, the watchman stooped down, and
tried to lift him, muttered something to himself,
and walked up to old Moll, who was standing in
the shade, against the house, not far off. They
spoke in a low tone; Fritz and his friend not wishing
Johnson to know that they observed his conduct,
returned to the ball. Fritz was followed by Big
Bob, the person who was with him, and saw
Johnson
assault Carpenterhis testimony was the same.
Jane Durham, also, was examined. When she
told of Johnson's manner by the dead body, Mr.
Wt inquired how she came there. In
answer
,
she narrated how Bradshaw had rescued her,
in a way that interested the whole courtwhile
every one was impressed with her beauty, her
friendless condition, and her modesty. All eyes
were alternately fixed upon Bradshaw and her.
Bradshaw is really blushing, whispered Talbot,
(the gentleman, our readers remember, who
reproached
Jekyl for being a blacksmith, at the
debating
society, for which Bradshaw commented
severely
on him)to Mrs. Grey: this is the first time
I ever saw the soft suffusion in his cheek.
When for such a cause shall we see the soft
suffusion
in your cheek? asked Miss Carlton, who
overheard him.
Never, I fear, Miss Carlton, if I have to
frequent
such places as this young woman has
described
,
to show my chivalry.
I hope you may never frequent them for any
other purpose, said Mrs. Gray, who liked not
Talbot's implication, and who was one of your
ladies who cared not what she said. Mary
Carlton
turned, and affected to attend to the trialbut
her thoughts wandered, and were troubled.
The physicians who examined the dead body were
sworn: they testified, unanimously, that there were
two wounds on the head, either of which was
sufficient
,
to have caused his death, as the skull was
fractured
terribly in both places. One wound was on the
top of the headit had completely mashed in the
skullthe other was over the eye; and it was
thought was produced by Carpenter's falling against
the curb-stone, when he was knocked down. His
body was found a considerable distance from the
lamps; and, from marks upon the clothes, it
evidently
had been dragged there. A witness stated, that
he knew Johnson well; and when he left the hall,
he overtook him dragging a man along. He asked
Johnson what was the matter, and he replied, he
was taking a drunken man home: witness asked if
he should help him, and Johnson replied, that he
could manage himwitness thought it strange, but
passed on.
The prisoner had a Mrs. Beazeley called in on
his behalfa young widow of rather doubtful
character
,
who kept as her sign, (probably for fear of
mistake,) emphatically said, A
genteel
Boardinghouse
.
She was dressed very gaudily. Prinky
sharp features, and a shrewish eye, which she tried
hard to subdue into an expression of amiability,
and which was almost hid in the abundance of
her curls, appeared under her bonnet, as she
timidly
removed her veil.
The judge was at times a very stern man, and
having seen a good deal of the worst of human
nature
,
his tones were, when he thought he had a
bad specimen before him in the shape of a witness,
keenly peremptory.
After trying in vain, with the assistance of his
half closed hand applied to his ear, to hear the
lady, he exclaimed
The court can't hear one word you say,
madam
;
you
must
take off your bonnet.
The widow thought the judge had as full
authority
in all matters in the court house as she had in
her household, and, therefore, dreamed not of
disobeying
.
She started, drew a long breath, and,
with trembling hands, took off her bonnetwhen,
lo! all her curls, being fastened to the side of it,
were removed, of course, and the widow stood
before
the audience with her hair gathered up on the
top of her head as tight as it could be drawnso
tight that the bit of red list that bound it, actually
drew up her eyebrows, and, as her hair was very
short, it stood out from the top of her head, like
the scalp lock of a Mohawk. An irresistible burst
of laughter broke from every one in the court room;
in which the judge could not refrain from joining,
while, above the uproar, Nancy, who liked not the
widow, was heard to exclaim,
The Lord love us! the vanity of that woman
saw ever a body the like of that? she looks for
all the world like the sign of the Ingin, at old
Broadbelt's
.
The widow glanced round the court, with an eye
from which all amiability had fledit literally
flashed fire. When she heard the exclamation of
Nancy, her concentrated rage found an object.
Shaking her fist at Nancy, while her top-knot
shook in unison, she called out, in a voice almost
choked with rage,
Yes, you hussyyou hagI've got as good a
head of hair as 'ary lady in this here room. Don't
they wear false curlsyouyouyou've got no
more hair under your old hypocritical, methodist
cap, than there is on the back of my hand, and you
may thank your sins for it.
Nancy, who was standing on an elevation,
within
the railing, that extended on each side of the
prisoner's box, had tossed up her spectacles to the
top of her heador, as the eloquent biographer of
Patrick Henry says, speaking of that orator, when
about to say his severest things, she had given
them the war cant, and placed her arms
a-kimbo
,
in the attitude of making an annihilating reply,
when the authoritative voice of the judge instantly
restored order, though the eyes of the respective
parties still flashed the defiance and retort they
dared not utter.
The widow replaced her bonnet, and, with a
voice tremulous, not with modesty, but with
passion
,
and loud enough, in all conscience, gave in her
testimony; which was of an immaterial character.
Mr. Wt took two positions, in the defence
of the prisoner. First. That, in entering the
ball-room
,
and in arresting any one who was disturbing
the peace, the watchman was in the fulfilment of
a duty which he was bound to perform; that
Carpenter
,
the deceased, was guilty of a breach of the
peace, and that the watchman was bound to take
him to the watch-house; that Carpenter resisted
his authority, and the watchman had a right to use
force; and, if death was the consequence, the act
could not be felonious homicide, but was excusable,
if not justifiable. Secondly. That, if Johnson had
committed any offence, it was not murder, but
manslaughter
.
Mr. Wt dwelt upon these positions with
unusual
eloquence. Knowing the deep excitement
prevailing against the prisoner, he addressed the
jury like one under no feeling, one way or the
other; but merely as a calm reviewer of the
circumstances
.
It was done with consummate skill.
He ridiculed, with great tact, the eves-dropping, as
he called it, of Joband he quoted Scripture
against the chaplain. Now and then, a stroke of
pathos was thrown in, that touched every heart.
While Mr. Wt spoke, Bradshaw's eye was
on the jury, with an occasional glance at the
audience
,
then on the jury. Without seeming
particularly
to observe, he marked every wrinkle on their
browseach compression of the lip. When a
juryman
altered his position, moved an arm, rubbed
his hand through his hair, he noticed whether it
was emotion, or the want of it.
Notwithstanding Bradshaw's frequent speaking,
his practice in public, his schooling in private, his
power of self-control, and his perfect knowledge
of the case, he felt a tremor in every fibre of his
body, when he rose to reply. He saw and
understood
the impression produced by Mr. Wt, and
he was painfully anxious for himself. The idea
that he might fail, for a moment swallowed up all
his other ideas, like Aaron's serpent. At this
instant
,
he caught the eye of Talbot: an expression
lurked in it which he liked not. In a moment, he
was the most self-possessed man in the court-house.
How much our foes help us on in this world! What
they say against us, makes us achieve more than
all our friends can say for us. In another moment,
Bradshaw forgot every thing but the case.
Without
any attempt at rhetoric or displaywith a
bosom
almost bursting with the burning thoughts he
wished to utter, he calmly and clearly
recapitulated
the arguments, and examined the positions
taken by Mr. Wt.
It is not often that the possessor even of great
oratorical talents can produce a great effect. He
must have a great subject, or have his feelings so
interested as to make it great to him. Bradshaw
had many motives to exertion, and they all pressed
on him with their united weight; but, a few moments
after, he forgot them all in the causeand then his
great powers began to develop themselves. Now
and then, when he observed the agitation of the
prisonerthe gratitude that beamed in the
lustrous
darkness of Jane Durham's eyehis sister's
deep and proudly affectionate regard
Willoughby's
and Cavendish's friendlinessTalbot's envy
Mary Carlton's look of delight, her almost tearful
joyand last, though not least, when he marked
the fixed, and somewhat agitated, attention of
Wt, he thought of himself, of Clinton
Bradshaw
,
and his brow wore the proud consciousness,
that Csar's might have worn, the black-eyed
Roman, with the eagle's beak, when, in the forum,
he first successfully opposed the veterans who had
Wielded, at will, the fierce democracy;
Or that Chatham's wore, when, notwithstanding
the atrocious crime of being a young man, he
vanquished the veteran debaters. But these
feelings
were momentary; and, towards the close of
his speech, they were merged, lost, overwhelmed,
in the cause. Then, every look, tone, gesture,
every winged word, breathed, burned with
eloquence
every
Vol. II. 11
eye was on himevery heart was
unconscious of any thing but the emotions which
he called up. He described Johnson refusing to
get the lightshrinking away from the dead body
in such a manner, that every one was startled
with the fear of guilt in his own heart. He
denounced
his attempt to fix the crime upon Jane
Durham, because she had no friends, in a voice
that swelled, and rolled, and echoed through the
court-room, mingling itself with the feelings of the
audience, like a trumpet-call to vengeance, in a
righteous cause. It sounded like the denouncing
spirit's pouring forth the vials of wrath. A wild,
unnatural excitement ran through the courtthe
prisoner started and glared horribly around, as if
he thought they meant to seize him. At this
moment
,
Bradshaw exclaimed, in his boldest tone
What say youguilty or not guilty? Guilty!
guilty! involuntarily burst from the lips of many
of the audience, and several of the jury.
Bradshaw took his seat.
After the lapse of some moments of profound
silence, Mr. Wt arose and made a speech on
a prayer of instructions, which he offered to the
court; not with any hope of having the prayer
granted, but for the purpose of giving the jury
time to cool from the effects of Bradshaw's
eloquence
.
The judge, in charging the jury, advised
them not to make up their minds
now
, but to retire
to their room, and deliberate upon the subject. He
defined to them the different degrees of murder,
according to the statutory provisions of the state;
(the second degree being unknown to the common
law,) and he appeared to incline to the opinion
that the prisoner's guilt was of the second degree.
The jury here retired, and the court adjourned.
After the crowd had left the court-room, as Judge
Price was passing out, he said to Nancy, with a
quiet humour lurking in his mind, but with a face
as grave as though he were on the judgment-seat,
Nancy, you literally astonished me to-day. I
thought, considering you have been so long about
the court-houseacquainted with all the lawyers;
going in and out, even of the bar, whenever you
chosea privilege which no other woman is
admitted
;
supplying us all with fruit, and having
known us so long, I really thought you felt as high
a concernment in the dignity and becoming gravity
of the court as though you sat upon the benchI
need not say how much I was mortified to-day!
This was touching Nancy on a tender point:
she had been so long a kind of appendage to the
court, that she actually deemed herself necessary
to the administration of justiceand though she
held herself authorized to say of court and bar
what she chose, yet no one could speak
disrespectfully
of them in her presence, except of Scrags,
without being reprimandedfor the judge she had
the highest respect, and she therefore replied in
the greatest confusion,
The Lord love ye, Judge Price, I never thought
at all about it till I said it. I was like the weak old
woman that spoke in churchand as soon as she
heard herself speak, she called out`O! I've spoke
in churchthere, I've spoke agin in church.
And next to speaking in church, is speaking, for a
body like me, in the court. Every part and particle
that concerns this here court, I feel as if it was my
own character; but, the Lord love ye, judge, and
be merciful to all of usthis Mistress Beazely, with
her Dunstable bonnet and curlsbless mewhy she
lived with me once; and a pretty trollop she was
ye may swear to itnot worth half as much as my
blackey, Beck, if proper conductions is the thing.
The trouble I had with her, when she was a girl, was
a sinshe flirted about with the fellowsthe
trollop
,
jist as bare-faced as she stood in the court
to-day
,
when her bonnet was off; and what modesty she
put on was all sham, like her curls, that o'rights
belong
to some poor dead body. She's an ungrateful
cretur, judge. My Beck told me, this very morn,
that she heard her tell old Katethe hussythat
pertends to sell good clean fruit, when she's as
dirty as she can bethat she ought to move her
table up here to the court, and have a stand by
the other door. That's her gratitude, to hurt me
in this style. Think of it!my Beck told me of
it this morn, as true as ye're standing there, judge,
jist after Mistress Beazely went into court; and
she smirked and smiled at me, and talked her
prittiestthe varmint'afore she went in. Who
would have thought of her conception? This is a
wicked conceptious world! But let old Kate bring
her apple-table here! if there ain't a sally, as my
first husband used to say, when he talked about
the wars, my name's not Nancy.
Nancy, you've the true spirit of the war in
you, said the judge, laughing; but remember, you
and your husband fought on the wrong side.
'Till we come over to the right, judge! When
he left the British, I left them, and we jined the
Continentals. They maintained their rights, and so
will I, for lawyer Bradshaw; and ye know,
yerself
,
Judge Price, (for I've hearn ye say it,) that
no man at this bar has a better head than
Bradshaw
.
He tells me that I'm intitled to sell here,
by myself, by a prior rightthe right, I think he
called it, of description(
prescription
.)
The Judge passed on, sayingYes, Nancy, he
can give you as good advice as any one. He has
managed this case admirably, to-day; but you know
I must not say a word about it, as I may have to
decide the question of
description
.
11*
CHAPTER V.
At
night we find Bradshaw alone in his office.
I will not go out and see the ladies, thought he, for
they may think I came for compliments.
Compliments
,
said he, aloud to himself, as he looked through
his window, at the court-house opposite, and saw a
light shining through the window of the jury-room,
notwithstanding the law to the contrarythis
long deliberation looks as if they would be
unmerited
,
if given. Surely, they will not let that
scoundrel off. If they do, he may, indeed, consider
himself Scot free, at liberty to commit murder and
perjury, whenever it pleases him. If he is
acquitted
,
he will be terribly revenged upon Fritz
and Jane Durham, in some way or other. He
would make a bold blow at me, if he dare; but that
he won't dare, unless he could take a bond of fate.
No! no! I indulge no ill feelings against such as he,
but he ought to be convictedsomething must be
done for his wife and family, if he isyes, and he
ought to be convicted on the first count. Our juries,
here, are so tender in these cases, that they scarcely
ever bring in the verdict that justice requires. If
he escapes, he may thank Mr. Wt for it. By
Jove! he's every inch a lawyer and an orator. The
blues! the blues!I have the blues, like all wrath,
as Kentuck would say.
Here he heard a rap at his door, which he had
locked. He descended the steps, (both the rooms
were occupied by himthe lawyer who formerly
occupied the room below having taken another
office
,)
opened the door, and Selman entered.
Ah! Selman, is it you? Come in? I hav'n't seen
you for some days.
I saw you in the court to-day, but not to speak
to you, said Selman.
They were soon seated in Bradshaw's office, the
same in which we had the pleasure of introducing
them to our readers. Selman's face was
considerably
elongated beyond its wont, and, after seating
himself, he gazed abstractedly at the lamps.
Bradshaw, he at length said, I am used up,
a gone case, tetotally gone.
What's the matter, my dear fellow?
The public dinner to Clinton Bradshaw, Esq.,
has knocked me into a cocked hatinto the
middle
of next week.
How so?
How so. I've been round here several times
to see you, Bradshaw, and ask your advice, but
you were out. You're the only man that I can
confide to on this subject. Why, Cavendish is such
an odd fish, and so cynical, and so little calculated
to give advice, that I wouldn't dream of speaking
to him; he thinks so little about women, that I
do believe he holds every fellow a born fool that
is troubled about them. And there's Kentuckhe's
a first rate fellow; but he'd laugh outright if I
were to tell him of the infernal fix I've got into;
so I've just kept it until I saw you.
Why, what's the matter?
I've got my walking papers, with a
vengeance
!
The devil! How did that happen? I
remember
when I saw you at the ballyou were
carrying
every thing before you, said Bradshaw, with
a look that he had hard work to keep in proper
sympathy with Selman's.
The day of the dinner, I got high, you know,
very highdirn it. Well, after you left, I staid
there with the Judge and Kentuck till after dark
and then, as the devil would have it; when wine's
in, wit's outas the devil would have it, I went
round to Mr. Perry's. There was Miss Penelope
with Bates: the fool sticks to her as if he had a
right to her. The family were all out but she. I
took a seat, and being in high glee, I ran on like
a mill-clappertold all about the dinnera whole
rigmarole about Miss Durham and youand about
you, Willoughby, and Adams. I don't know what
I didn't say, hardly, or what I did. After telling
all this, and cutting at Bates, (for I wanted to
drive him off, or out set him,) I felt a little sobered
down, that's a fact, but still high. I didn't get to
the corner of the street, above Perry's, before
Bates past me. He left just after mehe had
determined
to set me out, you see. I walked slow,
and when Bates got out of sight, I turned round
and walked back towards the house. I thought it
would be a first rate chance to see Miss Penelope,
and speak right out to her on the subject.
What subject, Selman?
Why of my attachmentwhat other subject
had I to speak to her upon. When I drew near
the door, I thought it wouldn't do, and I determined
that I'd just pass by,but, as bad luck would have
it,you know it was a beautiful nightMiss
Penelope
was standing at her door. As soon as she
saw me advancing towards her, she turned to go
in; I was by her side in a moment; handed her
into the room. She looked serious, but I didn't
think of it at the time. To make a long story
short, I let the cat out of the bag; made a plump
declaration, and she plumply rejected me with the
dignity of a tragedy queen. Think of that,
Bradshaw
,
and of your penetration. You told me, a
long time ago, you thought she liked me.
What did she say to you?
Say to me!why, I told her of my
attachment
,
and asked her if I might dare hope for a
return
,
and she told me I could not, and that my
conduct on that evening was sufficient to
determine
her, even though she had previously
entertained
other sentiments towards me; she up and
told me, that she didn't think I was aware of my
situation, and she advised me the next time I dined
out, to stay out. Her very words, by Jove!
Did you leave, then?
Leave then; no! I did my best to apologize,
and told her that I might be a little excited, but
no more. `No more!' said she; `why, Mr. Bates
observed it the moment you left here.' Bradshaw,
oughtn't I to give Bates a kicking?
What else said Miss Penelope?
Why, I did all I could to get her to retract;
but she wouldn't. She said, at last, though she
could not receive me as a suiter, she would always
be glad to see me as a friend. As a friendthink
of that, Bradshaw, that's always the word when a
fellow gets his walking papers. The fact is, in
these times of saving girls in alleys, men at fires,
and making great speeches, a man of only
reasonable
sense is a mere circumstance with the women.
Did you ever know a fellow to be in just such a
fix as I am?
Oftenit's one of the commonest things in the
world.
Bradshaw, you know my condition at the
dinner
.
I was not very high, was I?
You were elevated a little.
Well, I believe I was. When I was running
on before Bates, I thought I had the world in a
slingbut I was about the soberest man you ever
saw when I left there the second time. I was
sobered instanterI came round here to have a
talk with you about it; but you were not in. What
do you think of it, Bradshaw?
Selman, you don't believe in poetry, and hate
quotations, yet I think Mazeppa's remarkthe
hero whose wild ride Byron so gloriously describes
applies to your case:
`Who listens once, will listen twice,
Her heart, besure, is not of ice,
And one refusal's no rebuff.'
Don't be cast down, Selman; Rome was not built
in a day. Miss Penelope likes you, my dear fellow.
She was provoked that Bates should have seen you
excited, for you know she has a high notion of
womanly
propriety, and of the respect due from a
lover. If Bates, now, had been tipsy, she would
probably have laughed at him.
Bradshaw, that's a fact,he did go home with
her high from a party; and I heard her telling
your sister and Miss Carlton of it; and she
ridiculed
him without mercy. I wonder if she told of
my being tipsy.
I hav'n't heard that she did.
Bradshaw, I wish you would see her, and speak
to her on the subject. You know I wasn't very
high at the dinnerand I swear to you I didn't
drink one drop after I left there. I determined to
see Bates, and kick him like thunder; but when I
came to think upon it, it occurred to me every
body would inquire into the fuss, and it would go
all over town, that I was as drunk as a fool, and
kicked Bates for telling; and it might bring Miss
Penelope's name in it.
What shall I say to Miss Penelope?
Just what you would say for yourself, if you
were in such a fix.
Well, I will do so, if you think it will be of any
service to you; but don't be too much in the dumps.
Come, let us go into the Restaurateur, and have
some Champagne and oysters.
I've sworn off from drinking, said Selman,
but I'll take some oysters.
Bradshaw smiled
You think it's shutting the stable, after the
horse is gonedo you?
I think you will be able to catch the filly yet.
I will drink to your success in sparkling
Champagne
.
`The spring dew of the spirit, the heart's rain;'
and you shall pledge me in cool water, or hot
coffee
,
and I'll tell Miss Penelope of the sternness of
your resolutions. Ah! there they are hanging at
it yet, said Bradshaw, looking up at the jury-room,
as they passed out of his office.
They entered the oyster house, and were soon
comfortably seated in one of the boxes, with the
curtains drawn, discussing their oysters. In a few
minutes, two persons entered the oyster house, in
conversation. Bradshaw's love of approbation
became
more active than his alimentiveness, to speak
phrenologically, when he heard a person whom he
knew, by his voice, to be Bates, ask,
Mr. Talbot, how did you like the speeches, sir?
Mr. Wt's was a great effort, said Talbot;
and I wonder how the jury can deliberate so
longhe made out a plain case of excusable
homicide
:
his compliment to Bradshaw was rather
poetical
very
poetical; poets deal best in fiction:
and as for Bradshaw's reply, I do assure you, Mr.
Bates, I have heard him and others make a better
speech at our debating society. That long
compliment
to Wt, though it may all be true, was
very fulsome to a man's face; but, I suppose, as
Mr. Wt had condescended to tickle Mr.
Bradshaw
,
Mr. Bradshaw was, in duty, bound to do his
best to tickle Mr. Wt. Did you ever hear
any thing like that long puff upon woman? I
thought he would never get through with it (ha!
ha! ha! laughed Mr. Bates.) Now, that was
outrageous
,
in a court of justice, in a case of such
interest
to a fellow being.
A man hears truth from his enemies,
whispered
Bradshaw to Selman.
Don't you think so? continued Talbot to
Bates.
Decidedly so, sir; decidedly so, said Mr. Bates.
Did you observe how Bradshaw acted the
interesting
,
when he commenced his speech? His
blood's as cold as an iceberghe has more stage
trick in him than any man I ever knewhe does
every thing for effect. It was all done to please
the ladies.
I was surprised to hear Wt speak so highly
of his speech, said Bates.
O! he's bound, in gratitude, to do soand the
dear creatures will puff it, too, no doubt. He
showed so much chivalry, in rescuing the girl from
her paramour! I wonder what could have taken
him to  lane at such an hour? I had no idea
he frequented such places. What did Mr. Wt
say of him?
High compliments: that his sagacitythat was
the word he usedstruck him as much as his
eloquence
;
and that he must have studied hard, and
practised speaking a great deal: he praised his
gentlemanly
manners, too.
Manners! it's all manners with him, exclaimed
Talbot.
Mr. Talbot, said Bates, I wish you had been
at Mr. Perry's the other evening, the day of the
dinner to Bradshaw. Selman, who assumes to be
Vol. II. 12
a suiter to Miss Penelope, came there gloriously
drunk, and behaved in a manner worthy of the
company in which he became inebriated.
I'll make him eat his words, whispered
Selman
to Bradshaw, rising.
Wait a moment, whispered Bradshaw, till
they get deep into the narrow passagewe'll make
them back out, as a drayman makes his horse back
out of a narrow alley, with one hand on their throats
and the rod
in terrorem
.
I don't think much, between ourselves, said
Talbot to Bates, of the sobriety or morality of
either the orator or his friend.
The next moment, Bradshaw, who had taken
the whole bottle of Champagne, and Selman stood
before them. Bradshaw, with folded arms,
endeavouring
to suppress his passion, faced Talbot,
without
saying a word.
Listeners hear no good of themselves, Mr.
Bradshaw, said Talbot, in much confusion.
But sir, they have power to redress the evil,
said Bradshaw, with an ominous calmness.
Help me! help me! Mr. Talbot, called out
Bates, in a smothered voice,for Selman had
knocked him down;and, while one hand grasped
his collar, he was doing his best with the other, in
the shape of a clenched fist, to revenge not only his
wrongs of this night; but, also, all he had suffered
from Miss Penelope's frown. Selman! Selman!
exclaimed Bradshaw, taking hold of him, you are
stronger than Mr. Bates. At this moment, while
Bradshaw stooped to take Selman from Bates,
Talbot, who stood over them, aimed a dastardly
kick at the head of Selman, which might have
spoilt for ever, the good looks of the lover of Miss
Penelope, had not Bradshaw, who had his eye on
Talbot, caught his leg in such a manner as to
throw him on the floor. Talbot's head struck a
chair as he fell. Starting up, nearly maddened with
mortification and pain, he seized a poker from the
stove; and made at Bradshaw, with a fell
determination
.
Bradshaw, since the affair in the lane
with Adams, had gone armed, suspecting that he
might be assaulted by some of Adams's gang, at
night: as Talbot advanced, he drew a pistol, and
aiming it directly at him, said
Keep cool, Mr. Talbot; this is a business, sir,
not to be settled with the weapon of Baillie Nicol
Jarvieyou had better put down your poker
you are the aggressor, remember.
As Bradshaw spoke, he returned the pistol to
his pocket, and Talbot threw down the poker.
In the mean time, Bates had escaped from the
clutches of Selman, and rushed to the stove:
though the temperature without was warm, that
within required a fire. Unmindful of this, Bates
in his rage seized from the top of the stove,
a hot brick, with the intention of hurling it at the
head of Selman, but he dropped it instantly,
parting
at the same time with all the skin from the
palm of his hand. He danced about in agony,
blowing and shaking the afflicted member.
Selman
,
whose good humour returned the moment he
saw the discomfiture of his rival, advised him to
bathe it in brandy.
During the fracas, the proprietor of the
restaureteur
was not silent, Gentlemen! gentlemen! do
keep the peace, he exclaimed, while, like a
fawning publican, he took care to say or do
nothing
to offend any body.
Mr. Talbot, said Bradshaw, you are aware,
sir, that we were no eaves-dropperswe
unintentionally
heard what you said. You seemed
disregardless
who heard you, for you pronounced your
opinions in a public bar-room. I am not
quarrelling
with what opinions you may be pleased to
entertain
of my abilities; but, sir, those which you
expressed of my `sobriety and morality,' involve
my characterand, sir, I must have satisfaction.
I did not speak for you to hear, said Talbot;
and I did not speak publiclyfor there were
none in the room, but Mr. Bates and myself, that
I knew of.
This is trifling, sir. I expect you to say that
you have no foundation whatever for the remarks
you made, concerning my characterthat you
acted improperly in
I shall say no such thing, sir, said Talbot.
Then, sir,
now
is as good a time as any. Mr.
Bates will, I have no doubt, act as your friend:
Mr. Selman will be mine. Let me prevent
interruption
,
sir.
So saying, Bradshaw walked to the front door,
which was of glass, to which five or six steps
descended
from the street, and fastened it.
The landlord here remonstrated.
Don't be alarmed, Joe, said Bradshaw to him,
for he knew him very well. If I should be hit,
you can take me to my office, which is only a
few doors off and it is at Mr. Talbot's service.
You may consider me the challenger, (he continued,
addressing Talbot.) Here are weapons, sir, (
laying
a pair of pistols before him on a table)how
shall we fire?
Why, gentlemen, you are not a going to
murder
each other in my house, are you? exclaimed
the astonished landlord.
Keep cool, Joe; no murder, man, said
Bradshaw
.
Here the efforts of some one trying to open the
door, through the glass of which, the parties could
be distinctly seen, though not without descending
the steps, was heard, and a voice exclaimed
Halloo! what are you after? Bradshaw let
me in.
Talbot, holding one of the pistols in his hand,
saidMr. Bradshaw, you are a better shot
than I.
Not at all, sir, said Bradshaw. I'm told
you can snuff a candle. I never yet performed
that fete. Wait a moment, Kentuck, (addressing
the person at the door, who was Willoughby, and
who was calling on them to open the door,) wait
a moment, and I'll let you in.
Willoughby here broke a pane of glass, and
thrusting his head through, exclaimedWhat
are you after; are you going to fight? Bradshaw,
what's got into you?
Mr. Bradshaw, said Talbot, open the door,
sir, and let Mr. Willoughby inhe is a gentleman,
and if you are agreed, we will abide by what he
advises in this case.
12*
With all my heart, sir, said Bradshaw.
Bradshaw turned and proceeded to the door: as
he undid it, the report of the pistol in Talbot's
hand was heard, and the ball shattered a pane of
glass above his head, and so near to it that the
ball grazed his hair.
Mr. Talbot did you fire, sir? exclaimed
Willoughby
in astonishment, as he hurried into the
room.
II, fire, sir, certainly not, the pistol went
off accidentally as I was putting it down. It did
not go off in your direction, did it?
Rather in Bradshaw's; it hit just over his
head as you may see, said Willoughby, pointing
to the shattered glass.
It went off entirely accidentally, I assure you.
Were you observing me, sir?to the landlord.
The publican protested he was looking at
Bradshaw
.
Were you, Mr. Selman?
No, sir, said Selman, when Bradshaw turned
to go to the door, I turned to look at Mr. Bates's
hand.
Mr. Bates vowed that he looked only at his hand.
Bradshaw observed Talbot steadily, for a
moment
,
and then said,Mr. Talbot, will you state
the history of this business to Mr. Willoughby?
Several persons passingattracted by the
report
of the pistolhad entered the house, and the
young men retired to a private room; where
Talbot
made an ample apology to Bradshaw and
Selman
;
the latter would have forgotten to require
one from Bates, had not a private hint from
Talbot
reminded him of it. All having professed
themselves satisfied, wine was ordered, and after
they had pledged each other, Bates and Talbot
withdrew.
Let's have some more wine, exclaimed
Willoughby
,
after Talbot and Bates had left.
Bradshaw
,
you were for doing things in Kentuck style,
hey! And Selman went old Kentuck, too.
Selman
,
you've made Bates's eyes look like the bow of
promiseof all colours. He'll not be able to make
his appearance for three or four weeks; his hand
may be said to be branded by the precipitancy of
his valour. I would commend the painter to his
phiz, for the expression of unutterable wo. I wish
the Judge had been here; he has missed a
circumstance
.
Though I had my dander up when Bates called
for help, I could not but smile to see the tireless,
rapid energy with which Selman pounded him.
He seemed like a man working by the job, who
was trying his best to see how much he could
accomplish
in the shortest possible time, said
Bradshaw
.
Ha! ha! said Kentuck, goodand then you
tell me the moment he burnt his hand, Selman
played the good Samaritan, and offered to pour
oil on the wound, in the shape of brandy. Selman,
I like you for that, my old boythat's the true
gritcome, here's to you. May Miss Penelope
Perrywhy don't you fill up your glass?
Thank you, KentuckI've a bad headach.
But you'll like the toast, Selman.
I believe I'll treat resolution, whispered
Selman
to Bradshaw; and forthwith, with a merry
eye, he drank Willoughby's sentiment, that
expressed
the hope nearest to his heart. All at once,
recollecting that he had a particular appointment,
which he should have kept an hour before, with
much reluctance, Selman departed.
Bradshaw, said Kentuck, when they were left
alone, keep your eye on Talbot. It's no use,
perhaps
,
to blab a mere suspicion of a man; but that
pistol went off because the trigger was pulled. It's a
damning thing to say of any man; and of a man of
such respectable connexions it ought not to be said
for their sakes, if it could be helped. There's no
proof of itbut, keep your eye on him. I was in
the act of seizing him by the throat, and charging
him with the intention of shooting you; but it is
too much, too much to say of any man who is
respectable
,
unless you have strong proof of it.
I'm satisfied, said Bradshaw, he meant to
shoot. There was guilt in his eyehe would not
look at me. As you say, there is no use to say any
thing about it. I saw that Bates, Selman, and Joe
all suspected himlet him runI determined not
to speak of it until you spoke. He's much less
pluck than I thought he had, Kentuck.
I thought once he had pluck; but, whew! it
was rather tough to hear him tell over all he had
said behind your back, as he thought, and then to
make that humble apologybut a man who will
fire at another's back will do any thing to avoid
facing him.
Come, let's go to my office and smoke a cigar;
I have some very superior ones, presented to me by
old Broadbelt.
They accordingly left the oyster-house. When
they got opposite the court-house door, Bradshaw
saw Nancy, by the light of a dark lantern which
she held, in the act of fastening a large tin kettle
to a string which was lowered from the window of
the jury-room, where the jury were still locked up,
unable to agree on their verdict. In an instant
the kettle rapidly ascended, and the window was
let down.
Ah, Nancy, is that you, said Bradshaw.
Nancy spoke not until she reached them; when,
holding the light to their faces, she exclaimed
Ah, is it ye, honies? Ye see, Bradshaw, the
jury must have the creature comforts. I never
could make out the sense of the law that keeps
them there without foodbut I suppose they'll
make their minds up quicker.
Nancy, what will be the verdict of the jury,
do you think?
Why, honey, said Nancy, whispering, do ye
see, I jist a little after dark, in sweeping out the
passage by the jury-roomJosey, ye know, has
the rheumatiz, and can't attendin sweeping out
by their door I heard 'em counting how they stood.
There was one for letting him off; three for
manslaughter
,
and eight for murder. I could tell by
their talk, Bradshaw, that his treatment of the
poor thing, Jane Durham, and his trying to get old
Moll to parjure herselfand his parjuring himself,
was the thing that made again him. Ye may
depend
,
honey, ye spoke jist right on them pints
you made the people feel that Johnson deserved
hangingand, honey, he'll hang, ye may depend.
Nancy here went on her way, and the young
men were soon seated in Bradshaw's office.
Talbot's enmity to me, said Bradshaw,
musingly
,
arose, I suspect, from that little affair in
our debating society, when I defended Jekyl from
his sarcastic allusions to his trade. Jekyl is
getting
on well with his paper, Kentuck. He has
been editing it for some time, and he improves
very much. He is decidedly a man of talents,
and has quite a turn for politics.
Yes, said Willoughby, he is a man of strong
mind, and a heart true in every beat.
I took tea with him the other day, and spent
all the evening with him. There he was, when
I called, seated in a neat but plain room, at a
table
,
not with his papers scattered about every
way, as you would suppose from his former
slovenly
habits, but folded up neatly. His chin was
new-reaped, his hair tastefully combed, his shirt
collar clean,his strong, iron features never
looked so well. By his side was his wife, one of
the neatest little women you ever saw; not what
you would call handsome, but prettyand with
an intelligent expression, that makes her look,
when animated and pleased, really fascinating.
She's proud of him, and he's proud of her. I
left there, and, at the fashionable hour, entered
Mr. Jones's fashionable party, and grew at outs
with the gay world, and all thereunto belonging.
I have the blues, to-night, as badly as a
moonstruck
poet.
No wonder!a man who has been through
so much excitement as you have lately; and,
continued Willoughby, smiling, a man who
keeps all his passions down with the rein and
bit, except his ambition, must expect the blues,
as you call themparticularly, if he has such
strong passions, in other respects, as a certain
friend of mine, they will get the bit between
their teeth, sometimes, and bound away.
Bradshaw
,
I hold the heart is a democracy of many
passionsand they must rule together, and upon
republican principles, to make a man happy. If
one passion obtains the mastery, it becomes a
tyrant
;
and the rest, though kept down for awhile,
will become turbulent and disorderlywhile the
frame, like the country in which the invader has
been resisted, is wasted and worn. Don't you
think so?
It's not a bad notion; and I suppose, therefore,
Cassius was `lean and hungry.'
CHAPTER VI.
The
next morning, near eleven o'clock, the
jury having agreed upon their verdict, left their
rooms, and pronounced Johnson guilty of the
murder. By the exertions of Bradshaw, a
considerable
sum of money was raised, by
subscription
,
for his wife and daughter, with which they
opened a shop. The profits arising therefrom,
together
with what they received for the sewing
they took in, enabled them to live much more
comfortably than they ever had beforefor they
not only had more means, but they were relieved
from the brutality of the watchman.
Bradshaw had frequently called to inquire
how Mr. Glassman was, and learned he was
getting
better, slowly; but his physicians deemed it
unadvisable for him to see his friends, as yet. At
last, Jane Durham, who had left the prison, and
was living in her house, near Glassman's, told
Bradshaw Mr. Glassman wished to see him so
much, his physicians had consented.
Bradshaw found Glassman, wan and weak,
sitting
up in bed.
Give me your hand, Bradshaw, said
Glassman
.
I have heard all that has happened, since
I have been ill, from Miss Durham. Fortune
seems determined I shall be indebted to you, my
friend. Let me say it, Bradshaw, there lives not
the man to whom I would rather be under
obligations
.
I have but a poor return to make, but
`I will wear you in my heart of hearts,' as
Hamlet
did Horatio, with more even than a woman's
disinterestedness. I have been like the navigator
who approaches the whirlpool, and who feels too
full a confidence in his skill, duly to weigh the
difficulties that encompass him. You see me
what I amno mattermy race is ending; and
I cannot retrace it, and start again. Come, take
a seata fig for this sentimentality. Drop me a
few drops of laudanum. You look a little
thinner
than when I saw you last. The stir,
excitement
,
and, particularly, the intellectual strife of
life, don't fatten a man.
Bradshaw soon left Glassman, fearing that
conversation
would debilitate him. As the spring
advanced
,
Bradshaw frequently rode out with his
friend, and they often visited the Purchase, where
Glassman would remain, sometimes, for several
days. The healthy situation and the quiet scene
did much to recruit him. The inmates of the
Purchase
could not but feel deeply interested in him,
and he felt he breathed a healthier moral as well
as physical atmosphere with them. Bradshaw was
now admitted to practise in the civil court, and he
commenced, not like other young men who have
the practice to learn after they have become
practitioners; but with a knowledge of it, which
he had acquired by great attention in the office
Vol. II. 13
where he was a student, and by frequent
attendance
in court. He did not visit the court, like
many other students, to while away the hour in
careless conversation, but to learn his profession.
He jested and talked as gaily as any of them, when
nothing particular occupied the attention of the bar,
and when he did there was generally a group
around him; but as soon as a case of importance
was called up, he would quietly steal away from
his companions, take a favourable position, and
hear and see every thing relative to it. After he
had heard the speeches of counsel, he would often
shut himself up in his office, and make a speech,
first on one side, and then the other. He would
try to present the facts in a more striking light,
and illustrate the law with better analogies. In a
lovely dell, not far from the Purchase, through
which the stream, of which we have spoken, passed,
in the quiet summer, Bradshaw would frequently
wander, and build an argument upon any subject
that occurred to him. A passionate lover of poetry,
he would recite the best passages from his favourite
authors, with as much attention to the emphasis
and gesture as if he were preparing himself for the
stage. As the fourth of July drew near, the
committee
selected by the citizens to make
arrangements
for celebrating the day, appointed Bradshaw
the orator, and Talbot to read the Declaration of
Independence.
Talbot, who was a man of talents, and both
emulous and envious, with more reasons than one
for disliking Bradshaw, determined to forestall his
oration, by making one himself in the nature of
prefatory remarks to the Declaration of
Independence
.
What he said was well said, and well
written; but, Talbot, though his manner was
insinuating
and distinct, had not the power of speech
to stir men's blood. Bradshaw possessed it, and
he had prepared himself with great care. His
oration
was all before him, and he had it in his heart,
as well as head. Just before he arose, the martial
music filled every cranny of the immense church
in which they were celebrating the day, and gave
him that enthusiastic excitement so necessary for
one to produce an effect on such an occasion, and
which one of his temperament would be likely to
feel, under such circumstances; the more
particularly
,
when in the great crowd, he not only
recognised
many of his acquaintances of both sexes, but
also, in the soldierly array, many veterans who had
distinguished themselves in the late war. Some of
the banners so tastefully arranged, had not always
floated on a holiday; they bore plainly, perceptible
to all, the marks of stern encounters. Bradshaw
alluded to the veterans, to the well fought field,
in which they had triumphed, to the banners that
then waved over them in glorious war, and now
waved over them in glorious peace, so eloquently,
that the whole audience, by one impulse arose,
and gave three cheers of enthusiastic approbation.
It's no use, said Talbot to himself, for any
one to attempt to compete with Bradshaw, in
producing
a mere theatrical effect, he's always tickling
the ears of the groundlings.
In the afternoon, a large party of gentlemen,
among whom were Bradshaw, Willoughby, &c.,
accompanied by the ladies, made an excursion on
the river, (we will say, if our readers please.) They
glided delightfully along. Halleck has beautifully
described similar scenery
Tall spire, and glittering roof, and battlement,
And banners floating in the sunny air,
And white sails o'er the calm blue waters bent;
Green isles, and circling shores, are blended there
In wild reality!
They had a fine band of music on board; and
beholding such scenes, in such company, on such a
day, it may be supposed there was general
pleasure
.
I like this scene, said Willoughby, with
enthusiasm
,
to Bradshaw, his sister, and Miss Carlton.
One of the prettiest scenes I know of,
approaching
this character, strange as it may seem to you,
is in the west. Stand in Cincinnati, on the landing,
in a clear summer's sun-set, and look over the river
on Newport, opposite. The Licking river flows
into the Ohio, dividing Newport and Covington. In
the angle formed on the Newport side, stands the
arsenal, one of the earliest brick buildings in all
that region. A tall flag-staff, immediately on the
bank of the river, on the point, bears our banner
the stars and stripes. A hill, covered with trees,
lays behind Newport, and gradually slopes down to
the plain, on which the little town stands. The
houses are, mostly, white, and they have many trees
beside them; and you see very few persons
walking
about. It appears so still, and contrasts so
strangely with the landing on which you stand, full
of bustle and business! Your eye glances from the
busy scene around you, from the river which
darkly
rolls,for it lies in shadow,to the sleeping flag,
with its ample folds hanging calmly down, (`a
metaphor
of peace,' as Shelley says,) the arsenal, the
town, the trees, the hillall lit up with the golden
splendour of the setting sun. It gives a tint of poetry
to every thing, and flings a rainbow radiance on the
clouds. Perhaps a hawk circles over all, and you
hear the evening drum-beat of the soldiers. As
the sun sinks behind Cincinnati, the shadow from
the river lengthens, gradually moving up the bank,
with insidious progress, until the golden tints pass
away from the houses and trees of Newport; and,
after lingering a moment among the foliage, on the
hill-top, fade into twilight. I have often thought,
continued Willoughby, turning to Miss Bradshaw,
when I've looked upon the scene, that the time
would come when it would be celebrated in songs
of love and chivalry. Why not? It is beautiful,
too, by moonlight. Those rivers, between the
towns, will make them, not exactly a Venice, a city
of the sea, but they may make them a city of the
rivers; and, then, with the addition of a few canals,
many a gondolier may `softly wake the tide.' Let
me seewould it be better for a lady to live down
or up the river, from her lover?
Up, said Bradshaw; because to row to her
would be considered no painbut who would like
to row from her, when the interview was over? It
would be struggling, not only against your own
inclinations
,
but against the streamstrong, both,
against you. Leander leaped, no doubt, with an
exulting bound, into the Hellespont, when he went
13*
to meet Hiero: but the returning, Kentuck, the
returning
!
I should think, unless the wave bore him
from the shore, he would often let it bear him
back.
O! no, Mr. Clinton, said Mary Carltonshe
had better live down the stream, because, going
up, the oars would be heard; and, remember the
song
`So softly wake the tide,
That not an ear on earth may hear,
But hers, to whom we glide.'
True, Mary; you are right. I suppose the
lady might have a double motive for living down,
not only that he might `wake the tide' softly, in
going, but that the tide might keep him.
I suppose such a wish might glance across her
mind, replied Miss Carlton, archly, if he were a
favourite lover.
Then, if I were a favourite lover, said
Bradshaw
,
that tide in the affairs of men, I would take
at the flood.
Because it leads on to
fortune
, whispered the
Judge, who was in one of his cynical moods, to
Willoughby
.
They landed at a place celebrated in the late
war, where the captain of the boat had an
excellent
collation spread for them. After partaking of
it, they sang, recited, and enjoyed themselves in
various ways.
Selman and Miss Penelope were of the party. The
former took Bradshaw by the arm, and they walked
aside: when they were out of hearing of the rest,
Selman said,
Bradshaw, I wish my dear friend, if you get a
chance, you would just take a walk with Miss
Penelope
,
and speak to her on that subject.
Where were you, Selman, all the way on the
boat?
Why, said Selman, since that affair with
Bates, Miss Penelope has treated me very well,
considering: and I was to call, and escort her to the
steamboat. Bradshaw, to tell the truth, that blue
coat of mine was too informal shabby. I went, last
week, to Jemmy Dobsonhe's a lying rascal; I'll
never get another coat from him as long as I live
and got measured for a coat and pants, upon the
promise that he would let me have them early this
morning, without fail. After he promised me, I
just wore my blue one any where; and yesterday
afternoon, near dark, going down the court house
lane, Kentuck passed me; I threw a rotten apple,
that Nancy had thrown out, after him, and heI
hate such jokesseized a bunch of those little
yellow
candles from a fellow's pole, who was passing
such roughness is just like a Kentuckianand
took me right in the back. I never thought of
sending my coat to have it taken out. This
morning
Dobson
didn't send home my coatI had
nothing
to wear to hear the oration. I had to slip
round to his shop: I found him going out, and I
insisted
upon his finishing my coat. I'd have knocked
him down, if he hadn't. I was at his infernal shop
for three hoursand I was too late to see Miss
Penelope
to the boat. It's a ridiculous business, any
how; but, you know, Bradshaw, serious things often
grow out of such affairs. When I came on board,
Miss Penelope spoke to me, and that's all. I
thought, at first, she meant to cut me dead. I
couldn't rally my spirits, so I laid down in one of
the berths.
That coat fits well, Selman. Jemmy Dobson
is a good fit.
Do you think it fits me well? said Selman,
with a pleased smile, eyeing the garment.
Yes; very. Brummel himself would pronounce
it the thing.
I hoped it would fit me. The coat itself cost
me thirty-five dollars, and I gave fifteen for the
pants. Jemmy is a good cut, that's a fact, but,
Bradshaw, he's the greatest liar living. I felt like
the devil, though, when I got to the boatshe was
just starting: I was all of a perspiration, and I had
to make pretty much of a jump, to reach her.
I didn't see you come on board.
No! I saw you, and Willoughby, and Cavendish
standing together; and I thought Willoughby would
blow me about the candles. Cavendish would harp
at it for ever. You know, Bradshaw, this ridicule
knocks a fellow all into a cocked hat with the
women
.
Since I blacked Bates' eyes, I tell you, he's
a case. Dern it, just as I think I've got every
thing right, something or other happens, and uses
me upthe way I've been bedeviled is a caution.
Do you think she likes me, Bradshaw?
Yes, I do.
By gracious! I don't know what to think of it.
The women have all got crazy with you and
Willoughby
,
latelyparticularly with you, this girl,
the fire, and your speeches. I wish I could get a
chance of achieving somethingI'd risk my life to
do it. I'm actually tired with hearing Miss
Penelope
dwell, dwell, dwell upon these things all the
timeit strikes me, sometimes, she's talking at me.
Have you spoken to Miss Penelope since we've
been here?
YesI asked her if I should help her, at the
table. Bradshaw, if you get a chance, do take a
walk, and speak to her on the subject. Don't go
out of sight, Bradshaw; and, if it's favourable, just
take off your hat, and I'll join you.
Well, there's Miss Penelope now. I'll ask her
to take a walk with meif she does, you must
keep your eye on us, Selmanand join us, if I
take off my hat. Miss Penelope, said Bradshaw,
addressing the lady, will you walk in the woods?
I'll show you the marks of the bullets in the trees:
allow me to cut one of them out for you. It is
appropriate
,
on this day, to obtain a memorial of the
battle.
The lady took Bradshaw's arm, and they walked
through the woods.
How changed is this scene, said Bradshaw,
from that when the two contending armies were
here fighting for victory or death.
Yes, said Penelope, I've been thinking of it
ever since we've been here. I never see Mrs.
Glover
,
but I think of the battle and her husband, who
was killed in it.
Colonel Glover? Yes, I've heard of him
though she looks care-worn, and is not young, she
is still beautiful.'
Yes, very. Don't you know it was a
love-match
?
She really mourns for him.
Yes, there's every thing to hallow such an
attachment
.
He was so young, so kind-hearted, so
brave. Not very far from here, in an open space,
beneath
a tree, is a beautiful little monument erected
on the spot where he fell, and where they buried him.
There are many like himI'm told he was one of
the most sensitive lovers you ever heard ofa
frown from
her
moved him more than the front of
battle. It's always so with such natures. There
was a great deal of artlessness in his character.
She, I dare swear, caused him many an anxious
hournay, many an anxious week, or month,
perhaps
,
or year, before she said yes to him.
It's a lady's privilege, Mr. Bradshawthey
have to yield in every thing afterwards, and for
my part, continued Miss Penelope, laughingI
think, while we have the power, we ought to
exercise
it.
To inflict a wound, Miss Penelope?
Oh! but it is so delightful to cure it.
But, do not ladies inflict such wounds, sometimes
merely to show their skill in love's archeryand,
though they mean to be mercifulremember, a
deep wound never closes without a scar.
Deep wounds! Mr. Bradshaw, you don't think
such wounds are deep, do you?
Yes, Miss Penelope, in a sensitive nature
deeper than you imagine. A man who really
loves, is always painfully sensitiveand the
exhibition
of such sensitiveness is always a proof of
attachment. A man of the world, who woos a
lady merely for the worldly advantages that such
a connexion would give him, never shows any
sensitiveness
.
He courts as he gambles; he looks
upon both as a game in which the loss of
self-possession
would endanger his success. No! no!
sensitiveness
is a proof of attachment. You ladies,
laugh in the plenitude of your power, and say,
you would inflict the wound; but I know
you
would not, Miss Penelopeyour gentle nature
would not let you.
Miss Penelope made no reply, but walked on,
musingly.
Colonel Glover fell near here, I believe, said
Bradshaw. Well, we have all to dieand dying
on the battle-field is a death to be coveted. In
these times of peace, a man, however brave, may
whistle for glory. There is many a man whose
courage is only known in his resenting a private
indignitya falsehood; who, in the hour of battle,
would have won the laurel. Come, Miss
Penelope
,
will you rest upon this moss? How
beautiful
!
How velvet-like! at the foot of this old oak.
It was a witness of the battle, and there is glory
in its shade.
Bradshaw spread his handkerchief for Miss
Penelope
,
and threw himself at her feet. He was
getting matters in a favourable train for
discovering
the real state of her feelings towards her lover,
without awakening her suspicion of his intentions.
He had no doubt of her partiality for Selman, but
he wished to discover its extent before he spoke to
her of his infernal fix, to use her lover's own
expression. But poor Selman, who had been on
the rack all the time they were walking,which
seemed to him an hour,when he beheld
Bradshaw
with his hat on his head, as tight as if it were
nailed there, throw himself at the lady's feet
beneath
the oak with an easy air, and with a
proximity
which he himself would not have dared to
assume
,
could stand it no longer. The green-eyed
monster in his bosom gave himself, like the lap
dog in the Rape of the Lock, on a momentous
occasion
,
the rousing shake. He advanced
towards
them with a hesitating step and an
embarrassed
look, affecting not to know they were there,
but his spirit failed him when he drew near them,
and he stopped and turned his ear in their
direction
,
with the vain hope of hearing what they said,
while he pretended to be engaged in
contemplating
the party he had left.
Miss Penelope, said Bradshaw, there's
Selman
he's
brave, generous, intelligent, and he loves
the very ground you tread uponshall I call him.
Sel
No, no, I insist you do not, Mr. Bradshaw,
said the lady, in a low voice, deeply blushing. O!
where did you buy that summer hat?it's made
of strange straw; let me look at it.
Miss Penelope, Selman loves you with a
devotion
that has never been surpassedhe has loved
you for years, unchangeablyhe made me his
confidant, and requested me to speak to you on the
subjectI have no skill in the gentle art, lady;
but I smiled, and told him that if I thought his suit
propitious, I would take off my hat!
Bradshaw handed his hat to Miss Penelope. As
she was studying the plats of the straw with great
diligence he called out to Selman
Selman, lend me your knife, will you? I want
to cut a bullet from the tree.
Selman turned, and with no slight degree of
alacrity, hastened to give his knife to Bradshaw.
Confound it! said Bradshaw, I thought that
knot was a bullet markthere are a great many
in the woods. Miss Penelope, I am determined
you shall have a testimonial of the battle;and
leaving his hat in her hand, and Selman by her
side, he walked away as if in search of one.
When Bradshaw had advanced some little
distance
in the wood, he turned round, and with a
peculiar smile observed the pair he had left.
Selman
had taken his place at Miss Penelope's feet,
but at a more awful distance than he himself had
occupiedthe lady still held his hat, from which
he judged, by the turn of her head, she cast
frequent
sly looks at Selman.
Selman's a man of good sense, said Bradshaw
to himself; but who hearing him discourse of his
passion, and his tribulations, would suspect him of
it? Well, it's no great shame for any one to play
the fool in love, for it has made fools of the wisest
and such fools! If Selman knew the passage, he
might rant with Castalio against the sex. How he
hates quotations!he's no verbal memory, and I
suspect has worried himself not a little in
attempting
to commit the tender beauties of the poets. It's
wrong to tease him; for though this love does make
a fool of him, he suffers none the less,the more
rather, as he has an inkling of the fact himself.
He has less tact than any biped I ever saw:that
tact's a marvellous proper thing in a man. Talent
without it is a glorious vessel without a stearsman
and tact without talent is a canoe with a good one
such sculling and sculking to save a miserable
Vol. II. 14
cargo not worth saving!combine the two, and you
have a glorious bark, and a gallant armament ready
to go forth upon the waters at all seasons,blow
high or blow low. With them you may not
discover
worlds like Columbus, because there are none to
discover, but you may conquer and control them
and, above all worlds, the world of the heart.
Indulging such reflections, Bradshaw advanced
until he trod on a natural meadow, begirt with the
woods. A rich long grass covered the field, with
here and there a clump of wild wood, or a solitary
oak standing in its pride alone, or a knot of wild
flowers, all redolent with the richness of summer.
Beneath a majestic oak, that was full of bullets,
stood the monument of which he spoke, erected to
the memory of the gallant Colonel Glover, who fell
there in our late war with Great Britain; in an
engagement in which he led the bravest corps on
the field. He was buried where he fell, by his
soldiers, who, disheartened, retreated after they had
performed the hasty rite. They rallied, however;
and, after a hard conflict, forced their foes to take
to their boats. Bradshaw stood beside the
monument
,
and with a quickening pulse, read as follows:
To the Memory of
THE GALLANT
COLONEL WILLIAM GLOVER,
who fell on this spot
IN DEFENCE OF THE LIBERTIES OF HIS COUNTRY,
this Memorial was erected
BY HIS COMPANIONS IN ARMS.
Glory to the battle-field, and to the sleeper!
exclaimed Bradshaw, with enthusiasm. What,
though there is blood upon thy laurel, Glover! it
is the blood of those who came to enslave the free.
There let it be; a jewel in the cap of liberty, that
crowns thy monument. How beautiful the sky
above! how beautiful the earth beneath! how
tranquil all around! yet here the foot of battle
trod with thundering sound. On this spot was the
thick of the fight, and 'twas on such a day as this.
Through the woods therethrough that opening
that leads to the river, came the marshalled host.
And over this field to meet them, came Glover and
his little band. How I should like to be a
captain
in such a cause, with brave men round me
It would be better than making speeches to their
memoryit would be earning the tribute.
Bradshaw threw himself at the foot of the
monument
,
and leaning his head upon his hand, gave
himself up to ambitious reveries.
In a few minutes he heard the sound of music,
and, looking through the opening in the woods,
saw the party whom he had left, coming in the
direction of the monument, doubtless with the
intention
of visiting it, preceded by the band of
music
.
He lay delighted with the martial sound for
a moment, and then with a sense of the ridiculous,
which the present scene inspired, in contrast with
the one on which he had been musing, he arose,
smiling to himself, and commenced cutting a bullet
from the tree. They soon reached the spot where
he stood, Miss Penelope leaning on Selman's arm,
while he held Bradshaw's hat in his hand.
Why, Mr. Bradshaw, is that you! exclaimed
Miss Penelope: you're a pretty runaway, sir.
These bullets are difficult to extract, Miss
Penelope
Selman,
your knife is qualified now to be
put in the painting of the end of all things. Miss
Penelope, how much this oak is like a gentleman's
breast! Some of these bullets, when they struck,
were nearly spent, and just lodged within the
bark, skin-deep; others have gone deeper, and
some have doubtless pierced the heart. Yet it is
a remarkable fact, that, notwithstanding these
heart wounds, the tree, as you see, is green and
flourishing.
Selman looked at Bradshaw, and shook his head
imploringly.
Miss Penelope, Bradshaw continued, how
forcibly this scene reminds one of Byron's lament
for young Howard, in Childe Harold,
`When showered
The death-bolts deadliest, the thinned files along,
Even where the thickest of war's tempests lowered,
They reached no nobler breast than thine, young gallant
Howard
.'
Selman, what's the next verse? Don't you
recollect
it?
Affecting to put on a look of memory, while
chagrin prevailed, Selman said
No, I don't remember it.
Ah! I have it, said Bradshaw, and he recited
with feeling
`There have been tears and breaking hearts for thee,
And mine were nothing, had I such to give;
But when I stood beneath the fresh green tree,
Which, living, waves where thou did'st cease to live,
And saw around me the wide field revive,
With fruits and fertile promise, and the spring
Came forth her work of gladness to contrive,
With all her reckless birds upon the wing,
I turned from all she brought, to those she could not bring.'
Oh! Mr. Bradshaw, how beautiful and how
appropriate! exclaimed Miss Penelope.
And, Miss Penelope, said Bradshaw, you were
speaking of Mrs. Glover to-day, you remember,
and her mournful beauty; farther on, Byron
expresses
the sentiment you uttered
`Though the sound of fame
May for a moment sooth, it cannot slake
The fever of vain longing, and the name
So honoured, but assumes a stronger, bitterer claim.'
Bradshaw! exclaimed Selman, petulantly, you
had better mount the monument, and give us the
whole poem.
If I were to begin, said Bradshaw, I should
certainly go on as long as Miss Penelope approved;
but, Selman, too much of a good thing, you know,
even of love, [this was said in a whisper, which
only Selman heard,] is good for nothing.
About night-fall, the party returned to the city.
Bradshaw, said Kentuck, it's a beautiful
night. The ladies propose going out to Mr.
Carlton's
:
it will be a delightful ride in the moonlight.
Come, let's to Sy, and take a luxuriant bath,
and then for a merry ride.
I'm for a bath, said Bradshaw, but not for
the country.
When they parted, Bradshaw repaired to Jane
Durham's.
Well, Jane, my old school-mate and fair ally,
how did you spend the fourth?
14*
With the undistinguished throng, said she; I
repaired to the church this morning, sir, and heard
the oration.
Ah! I
felt
your presence. Let me seeyes,
you sat to the extreme left, and kept your veil
over your face. I thought I caught an eye I
knew through ityou sat then just before Miss
Carlton.
Yes, but you did not look at me, Mr.
Bradshaw
;
you looked beyond me, as the mariner looks
beyond the poor wreck, upon the waters, to his
home. Well, my life, ignoble as it has been, has
not been useless; I can say I have been the cause,
in some measure, of the development of genius. I
see the account of your speech, which Mr. Jekyl
published, is going the rounds of the papersit
gives me notoriety. Mr. Jekyl's wife will be
jealous
of the praises which he lavishes upon my good
looks. I saw the ladies look at me to-day as if
they did not know what to make of me. Oh, your
sister has a sweet face!and what a beautiful blue
eye Miss Carlton hasshe is lovely, indeed. I
should say she was proud, but frank and
independent
.
I don't know that she is proudshe certainly
is frank and independent.
I like her stepthere is something bewitching
in her, independent of her beauty. I have been
melancholy to-day; I know not whysadsad. I
have escaped a most horrible fate; and I ought to
feel thankful and gratefuland I do; but why,
why will mournful thoughts intrude? No, no! no
one can err and be happy.
CHAPTER VII.
One
bright summer's day, Bradshaw called on
Miss Carlton, at Mrs. Holliday's, and found her
alone, looking over the prints in a costly and
beautiful
album, which her father had given her.
Clinton, she exclaimed, as he entered the room,
you have just come in time. Now you shall not
refuse. I had just rung the bell to send John to your
office with a peremptory note, sir, requiringa
lady has a right to requirethat you would write
in my album; it is a high honour, sir. I wish
you to write in it the first. Come, though I've
heard you say that you never would write in an
albumthey were such namby pamby things
yet this is not a namby pamby one; and I did not
buy it for the vanity of receiving compliments in
it; it was given me by my father.
It is a beautiful one, said Bradshaw, taking a
seat by her side, and looking over it; these
pictures
are in fine taste. See that one, Mary; how
devotedly that lover holds his lady's hand. Have
there not been moments in your life when you
wished you could be like that picture, for ever to
remain as you were, when
now
should be for ever.
There may come such moments, said Miss
Carlton, slightly blushing, and laughing, as she
threw back her curls, but remember,
now
I'm
fancy free.
Ah! those are beautiful lines of Moore's, written
in a lady's album, in which he hoped that in her
heart he could find an unwritten place, as in her
book. He says:
`Oh, it would be my sweetest care
To write my name for ever there.'
Your heart, then, is unwritten upon, Maryand
who may write there?
It must be done with sympathetic ink, sir, said
she, archly; the name on my heart can only be
read by the light of the flame from another's.
Good! good!report says that Mr. Bates, and
Turnbull, and Talbot, have all been at your shrine.
Have neither of those gentlemen kindled flame
enough to make the ink visible?
Oh! I don't know; they hav'n't tried yet.
Talbot has been trying, I'm told, for some
time.
He has not tried hard enough, thenthere
must be more fuel on the flame.
He goes with
you
to the Springs, does he not?
No, he does not go with
us
to the Springs.
He goes, I believe, as others go.
And Mary, I suppose, this is to be the first of
your going formally into company, as the
fashionable
phrase it?
I don't care about going to the springs. I
would rather stay at home; but father wishes it.
Well! Talbot will have many opportunities.
You had better say yes to him, Mary, at once.
Yes to him, at once! exclaimed Miss Carlton,
angrily. Clinton, don't you persuade me too
much; recollect, you have an eloquence that is
irresistible
,
folks say.
Ah! Mary, if I had, I would not plead Talbot's
cause for the wealth of the Indies, I would
Here the servant entered, and announced
visiters
.
Bradshaw sat a few moments after their
announcement
,
and then withdrew, taking with him
the album. He went to his office, and after
walking
up and down the floor, five or ten minutes,
he wrote in it the following
LINES.
Mary, the gay and glittering world,
With many a dream to gladness given,
With many a fairy hope unfurl'd,
Like gorgeous clouds in summer ev'n.
With many a pleasure, whose bright hue
Is woven from a poet's dreams;
With many a joy, that seems all true,
In whate'er fond shape it seems.
Like a bright bird in beauty glancing,
O'er a smooth, yet unknown sea;
Thus, Mary, thus, thy steps advancing;
Thus, the gay world is wooing thee.
And thou: O! never yet the gay
Have wooed a fairer to their throng;
Though from them has the poet's lay,
Chosen the very soul of song.
Thou, with a step as light as Love's,
E'er a rude breath has touch'd his wing;
When on he sports through moonlit groves,
To taste the balmy breath of spring
When all around to joy is given,
And the fair stars, love-list'ners, true,
Have met, as if to hear of heav'n,
In some fond lover's interview:
Thou, thus art entering 'mid the gay;
And Mary, like that love boy, thou
Wilt make o'er wounded hearts thy way,
E'en with his own laughing brow.
How often in the mazy dance,
How often, wilt thou, Mary, move;
Unconscious that each passing glance,
Awakes so many dreams of love.
How often in the moonlit eve,
With some one happy by thy side;
The fairy web of hope thou'lt weave,
Forgetting all the world beside.
Alas! dull care so much deforms!
These sunny moments come between,
Like sun-shine in the time of storms,
Gilding a darkly coloured scene.
Mary, there is a cloud for all
A speck in summer's brightest day;
In autumn, how the sear'd flow'rs fall!
In winter, where, alas! are they?
Enough! I must not speak of sorrow,
Beautiful, gay girl to thee;
If it must come, it shall not borrow
Anticipation's frown from me.
Mary, I may not tell thee more,
Like a gay bark, thy step is free;
I stand upon the lonely shore,
A left one, looking after thee.
Bradshaw had scarcely written the lines, when
he saw, passing by his window, Mrs. Holliday's
servant: he called him in, and after wrapping the
album up, carefully, desired him to give it to Miss
Carlton.
The next Sabbath was a beautiful day.
Bradshaw
,
who had been up late the previous evening
at his studies, did not arise until the first church
bells disturbed his reveries; when, looking out upon
the beauty of the morning, he determined to visit
the Purchase.
He mounted his horse, and, turning from the
turnpike, entered an old county road, now scarcely
ever used, that wound round by Mr. Carlton's,
leading
,
by the foot of his garden, to the Purchase.
The sounds of the church-bells grew fainter and
fainter, as, with a free rein, he dashed along. The
road was unpaved, narrow, and winding. He often
had to bow his head, to avoid the branches of the
trees, which hung over it, from either side. The
bright day infused its gladness into his spirit, and
merrily, merrily, he went. As he passed by Mr.
Carlton's garden, he saw Mary Carlton standing by
the door of the summer-house, and he called out to
her
What! Mary,not at church?
No; they're all gone. They called round for
me: I was to gobut, being, like the rest of my
sex, capricious, I all at once determined to remain.
They return here, and dine. Are you going to
church?
Not unless
you
go. Are you all alone?
There is nobody but the servants about the
house, and the house-keeper. You had better go
to church.
I think not, Mary. I will put my horse up,
and be by your side in a moment, fair lady; and
if you convince me I ought to go to church, by the
same argument I'll convince you, and we'll go
together
.
Bradshaw rode to the house, gave his horse to a
servant, and entered the garden.
There, Mr. Clinton Bradshaw, is one of the
prettiest roses you ever saw. Let me put it in the
button-hole of your vest: no! in your coatit will
look prettier. Why have you such a Byronian
propensity for wearing black? I declare, if Sully
were to paint your portrait, and it was ever so
good a likeness, I should not know it, unless he put
you in sables.
Why, Mary, you have on black, too.
But I don't always wear black.
No!you look well in any thing. That's a
beautiful silk, and then it fits you so well; and that
pearl buckle. Why, you're a lady of taste.
You've too many pretty speeches lately,
Clinton
.
Come, I want you to find fault with me.
Find fault with you! I can do that easily.
How?
By indulging my imagination.
There it is again! Clinton, you are an
abominable
flatterer; and you've no conscience about
ityou flatter all alike, and, I expect, commit your
pretty things to memory, beforehand.
Yes, I always have them
by heart
.
So Miss Penelope Perry says. Upon my word,
sir, you paid a great compliment to the rest of the
ladies, on the fourth of July, to leave them all, and
wander away in the woods, for heaven knows how
long, with Miss Penelope. Mr. Selman is
convinced
,
no doubt, that you take a deep interest in
his suit.
Yes, he is thoroughly convinced of it, I hope.
No doubt; and of what is Miss Penelope
convinced
?
Has your eloquence persuaded her to
accept
Mr. Selman?
I hope Mr. Selman's eloquence has had that
effect, without my aid.
You were the junior counsel, I suppose, then,
Squire Bradshaw, and opened the casejust made
a statement of it. Miss Penelope came out to the
Purchase last night, and has gone to church with
Mr. Selman. She said she expected you out; and,
from her manner, one might think she wished you
to continue the pleadingor, perhaps, you intend
to
file a declaration
in another case.
I shall have no opportunity. Miss Penelope
goes with you to the Springs, does she not?
Yes, sir.
Does she go with you to Washington?
NoI believe she returns. Did she not tell
you?
No. Mary, you will be away a long time, if
you go from the Springs to Washington, and stay
there until congress adjourns.
They had, during this conversation, entered the
summer-house and seated themselves by a table,
on which were books, fancy baskets, and a
number
of other articles; among them, Miss Carlton's
album. Bradshaw turned over the leaves of the
album while he spoke, and, in doing so, he
discovered
Vol. II. 15
that the lines he had written in it were cut
out.
Mary, he askedwhat has become of my
scribbling?
I cut it out, said she, blushing.
Ah, Marythen you thought them
unworthy
of your book?
No, sir.
Then you did not like the sentiments? asked
he, his brow slightly flushing.
Perhaps, Mr. Clinton, I may like the
sentiments
so much, as to have cut them out to keep
them all to myself,liking them above even the
vanity of showing them. But here, sir, said
she, rising from his side, and plucking a flower,
here's a sprig of heart's ease for you,I must
run to the house to give some directions about
dinner, that I had forgotten,and, Mr. Clinton,
by the time I return, do you write me some verses
on it. I take so much care of your verses, that
you can't refuse. And she, laughing, left him.
Bradshaw gazed fondly after her; and, as she
entered
the house, he wrote on the blank sheet of a
novel, the following
IMPROMPTU.
How easy 'tis to give the flower,
That emblem's careless ease of heart;
Yet give the very gift the power
To bid that careless ease depart.
For if forth from its budding leaves,
Young, nestling Hope should breathe her sigh,
Too soon the trusting lover grieves
To find the flower, and hope must die.
Then, Mary, ere again we part,
Oh give me back the priceless dower
The careless, happy ease of heart,
That cheered me ere you gave the flower.
Here! exclaimed Miss Carlton, as she
returned
,
and entered the summer-househere's
the squirrel you gave me: I've made him quite
tame; but I still have to keep a chain round him.
Let me see what you have written. Ah!what
a Byronian hand you write. Give you back your
heart. I doubt, Mr. Clinton, if you ever had a
heart. A wretched handa wretched hand, you
write, sir. You'll have to make your declaration
by word of mouth to Miss Penelope. If you
write it, the only passion you'll awaken, will be
downright anger at your abominable scrawl. Look
yonder!there they come from church. How
well your sister rides. Mr. Willoughby is by
her side: he's one of the handsomest men I ever
saw. And there's Miss Penelope and Mr.
Selman
:
just observe how Mr. Selman amuses
himself
with switching the leaves off of the trees.
Come, said she, putting the novel, in which the
verses were written, into a fancy basket which
she held in her hand, and throwing her
handkerchief
over itwe must not be found here
tte-tte
:
Miss Penelope will grow jealous. Come,
bring my squirrel.
No, Mary, let us remain here a moment.
How beautifully they wind along!Kentuck's a
glorious horseman.
Yes, sir. And what do you think of Miss
Penelope?This afternoon you may have an
opportunity
of
filing
your
declaration
.
Stay, Mary, and let me file it now, said
Bradshaw, seizing her hand, and speaking in a
trembling tone.
No! no!Come, Clinton, let's go to the
house, exclaimed Miss Carlton, trying to laugh
away a blush.
Bradshaw held her hand a prisoner, while he
said
Mary, you are on the eve of leaving for the
Springs, and then for Washington. You will be
absent a long time. I may not have another
opportunity
of speaking to you before you depart.
Hear me, Mary,and he gently drew her to a
seat.
She bowed her head till her rich curls covered
her cheek, as Bradshaw continued, in a voice that
had passion and eloquence in its every tone
Where you go, you will have many lovers,
Mary. I know itI
feel
it: the proudest, the
wealthiest, the greatest of the land. They will
gather around you in the beautiful and brilliant
scenes, where you will be loveliest. And II
will you sometimes remember me then?I will
look after you, and listen to hear of you, with
more passionate fondness than I can tell. Will
you sometimes think of me, then, Mary?
I will, murmured Mary.
Mary, I have sometimes hoped that you had
a regard for me; but, then, it seemed to me but
as a sister's. Shall it be more, Marysay, shall
it be more?
Mary whispered that it should.
Bless you, bless you, my beautiful, my own
Mary, for what you have said. Mary, you have
not been much in the world yet. In it, courted,
admired, loved, worshipped, idolized, as you will
be, this preference will be tried in a way that you
dream not of. I would not steal your heart. I
ask no pledge from you, which another may make
you repent you have given. But if, when you
return from the worldthen, when I am more in
it than I am now, for, by the spirit of the
Pilgrims
,
I will bethen, if I may thus hold your
hand, and learn from you that your feelings are
unchanged, I shall be happierno, no: there is a
passion beyond words. Mary, I have not had
one dream of ambition in which you were not the
guardian angel. I have not built one fairy castle
in which you were not the loved one. My
household
gods can never make me happy, unless you
are by my hearth. I struggle in the thick crowd
to deserve you. 'Tis not so much that my name
may sound in men's ears that I press on, but that
you may pronounce it, and deem it not unworthy
to be yours.
Bradshaw caught her in his arms, passionately,
as he spoke. At this moment, the garden gate was
heard to open, and Miss Carlton sprang away from
her lover, exclaiming, O! my squirrel, my
squirrel
,
he's gone. And she hastened out of the
summer-house
after him, and Bradshaw followed.
It was the party from church that entered the
garden.
Excellent! exclaimed Miss Penelope,
laughing
:
your
sudden
determination to stay at home
was to catch runaway squirrels, was it?
15*
Miss Carlton was very much confused; but
Bradshaw
stepped before her, so as to hide her
confusion
.
He had caught the squirrel, and he handed
it to Miss Penelope, saying,
You see, Miss Penelope, it is easy to catch
runaway
squirrels, when you have a chain round their
necks. No matter how far you go into the woods,
there is no danger of their escapingthey become
attachedthey'll always play about the place
where you areat any moment you may seize
the chain, and draw them to you.
Very well, Miss Mary Carlton, said Miss
Penelope
,
turning away from Bradshaw, with a
consciousness
of what he meant: so I suppose your
sudden determination kept Mr. Bradshaw from
going
to church.
Mary Carlton, who had recovered from her
confusion
,
said, archly, Do you think, Miss Penelope,
that I will let you run away with all the beaux?
No, indeed. Mr. Bradshaw was quite pious this
morningas anxious as Robinson Crusoe to see and
hear the church-going
belle
. He wanted another
tte--tte
, like that of the battle-ground, but
gallantry
forbade him to leave me; and I peremptorily
refused to go to church with himfor I have no
intentions of furthering your designs on two or three
gentlemen at once.
Selman, who was by the side of Miss Penelope,
complacently switching his boots with his
riding-whip
,
started and looked blank, when the latter
part of the sentence fell upon his ear, while Miss
Penelope exclaimed,
And so, Mr. Bradshaw, you would not come to
church, you're out of my books entirely, sir: I've
done with you.
Miss Penelope, said Bradshaw, you must not
pronounce judgment before you hear the cause.
I'll have to get Selman to plead it for me.
Yes, said Miss Penelope, you should; Mr.
Selman
is so admirable a pleader, no doubt, in his
own causes.
Dirn it, whispered Selman to Bradshaw,
don't begin your foolery, and knock every thing
into a cocked hat. While Mary Carlton said,
Penelope, we know you're a kind of female
Napoleon, in the world of the heartthat you go
on conquering and to conquer; but I'll rally all the
girls as my allies, and then look out for a Waterloo
defeat.
Even then, said Selman, Miss Penelope will
have the consolation of knowing that she has had
the crown.
Oh! certainly, Mr. Selman; and, that your
devotion
was to herself, and for herselfthat it had
nothing to do with the jewels and the diadem.
In the progress of the afternoon, Bradshaw left
the company, and sauntered out alone in a noble
grove, near the house. Selman, who surmised
there had been some tender passage in the
summer-house
,
between Bradshaw and Mary Carlton;
and who took, of course, a sympathetic interest in
such matters, joined him in his walk. Bradshaw
suspected his intentions, and was not long kept in
doubt; for Selman looked round cautiously, and
then, in a quick, but subdued, voice, he asked,
Bradshaw, hey! how did you come on in the
summer-house?
What, on
that subject
, Selman?
Yes! Your own subject, I mean. I thought,
probably, there might be something between Miss
Mary and you. She took me up pretty short about
jewels. I don't like such allusions.
This is a devil of a world, Selman, said
Bradshaw
,
with a most melancholy voice.
Hey! What! Thunder! Has she rejected
you?
The thing's pretty much fixed, I suspect.
Well! I never was more astonished in my life
never. I would not have believed it if you had
not told me. I always was satisfied she liked you.
Why, dirn it, she don't pretend to hide itshe
evidently prefers your company to all others.
Yesthat may be, Selman; but, you know,
she lived at the Purchase, and it may be only a
sisterly regard. When there's love in the business,
a lady is very apt to be shy, and, at least, affect to
like the society of othersparticularly, when her
lover is by.
I don't know but what that's a factfor you
say Miss Penelope likes me, and every body sees
she treats me just so.
It's hard to form a correct opinion of women,
Selman.
Hard! I consider it a matter of moral
impossibility
.
The more I think of it, the more I'm
perplexed
.
Just when you think you've fixed them,
continued Selman, shaking his head with the
gravity
of Lord Burleigh, in the Critic, by Jove, they
fix you. But, Bradshaw, I'd no idea of it. Miss
Penelope has said to me, in confidence, that she
was satisfied Miss Carlton was attached to you
her very words. She has refused Talbot, who's a
confounded good-looking fellow, and talented
refused
him, pint blank; and, as for Bates, she laughs
at him. Bradshaw, you stood it well; your
manner
did not betray it. She was confused when we
came up. It's just the reverse with me. I always
look like a fool, or, at least, feel like one; and Miss
Penelope laughs. Why, you seemed in as good
spirits as usual, all day.
How do you and Miss Penelope come on?
O! I hav'n't spoken to her on that subject since
that dirn night of the dinner. I want her to forget
it. She treats me very well, though. Don't you
think so?
Yes, very.
The fact is, Bradshaw, I think Bates is a gone
chicken:that whaling I gave him, did for him, at
any rate. Well! well! I thought you could get
any of the women: I did, upon my honour. I
begin
to believe that Talbot, since Miss Carlton has
refused him, is making up to Miss Penelopedon't
you think so?
I saw him escort her to church, last Sunday.
Did she take his arm?
Take his arm!no!did she? exclaimed
Selman
,
in great alarm. She never would take
mine. I kept at a distance behind them, from
churchbut I watched them. She didn't take his
armI'll swear to itgoing home. Did you ever
see her?
Never. I've seen her take Kentuck's.
Yes, I know it; and I don't know what to make
of Willoughby, either. I hav'n't the faith in him I
used to have.
Why not?
Why not! Why, I suspect him of having a
sly hankering after Miss Penelope; and I don't
think its very friendly on his part. He's a
confounded
fine-looking fellow, and he has a taking
way with the women. Have you heard him speak
of returning to Kentucky, lately?
No, I have not.'
Nor Inot one word now-a-days. Bradshaw,
I wish you would find out what his feelings are
with regard to Miss Penelope.
I will. But, to tell you the truth, I don't think
you have any thing to apprehend from him. He's
your friend: he knows of your attachment; and,
I am satisfied, he entertains no thought that way.
You must not say a word on this subject of mine,
to any one, Selman.
Not I!not a word!what are you going to
do, Bradshaw?
Leave matters just as they are, and go-ahead
at the law!
Well, I would have sworn that she liked you,
and I believe it now just as firmly as if she had
told you so!
During the latter part of this conversation, they
had left the grove, and were walking towards the
house. Bradshaw parted from Selman to visit the
stables. The latter, in profound and perplexed
rumination, on the subject of their conversation,
entered the porch, and met Miss Carlton leaving it.
Which way, Miss Mary, all alone?
For my fancy basket, sir, that I left in the
summer-house.
Let me save you the trouble.
Thank you, sir, I doubt if you could find the
one I want, there are several basketsbut come on.
Miss Mary how did you enjoy yourself on the
fourth?
Oh! very well, sir. How did you enjoy
yourself
,
Mr. Selman? I thought you seemed quite in a
philosophic mood for such an exciting and patriotic
occasion.
IOh! Miss Mary, I enjoyed myself very much
towards the latter part of the day; in the morning,
I had a bad headach. I was prevented hearing
the oration. How did you like it?
Very muchI like every thing Clinton says.
Ah!
every
thing.
Yes, sirevery thing I hear him say. Why
do you echo me?
Oh nothingI rejoice to know you're so
universally
pleased with himI wonder he don't get
married.
It may be, Mr. Selman, that Mr. Bradshaw,
like other gentlemen that you and I know of, don't
find the ladies so very consenting as your vanity
has led you to believe.
Selman gave his coat collar a twitch, as if it did
not set to please him. By Jove, thought he,
Bradshaw's
in a bad fix. He was in the act of
concocting
a remark, when Miss Penelope, who had
observed them from the window of the house,
moved by impulses which our readers may easily
imagine, entered the garden. Towards night Emily
Bradshaw returned to the Purchase, her brother
and Willoughby escorted her there, and then
proceeded
to town. Selman and Miss Penelope
remained
with Mary Carlton. After the ladies had
retired to their chamber, while Mary stood before
the glass, arranging her hair for her pillow, Miss
Penelope, who sat at the open window looking out
upon the garden, and thrumming with her pretty
fingers against her lips, broke a silence of some
moments, by saying
The truth is, Mary, we must yield to these
creatures, the men, after all.
Mary Carlton paused, in the act of confining a
stray curl under her cap, and, with an arch
expression
,
said
I know itI suppose, Miss Penelope Perry,
you have no insuperable objections to yielding, have
you?
Why, not insuperable, exactly; but one hates
to give up ones liberty, and the pleasure of
tormenting
It
won't do to torment a husband; as
soon as you begin it with him, my gentleman will
pick up his hat with such a provoking quietness,
and wend his way to his office or counting-room,
to the theatre, or on a fishing or gunning party,
with the indifference of a grand Mogul. I declare
to you, Mary, I hate the thought of it. I wonder
now if Henry Selman could bring me to consent to
have him, if he ever would take on such airs
afterwards
.
Its more than probable he would, unless you
abate the airs you put on now.
I wish I was a queenQueen Elizabeth, as
Scott describes her, with Raleigh, Essex, Leicester,
all at her feet; wouldn't you like it?
Yes, for the pleasure of giving a princely hand
to such a princely fellow as Essex.
I don't believe I'd be merciful, as Mr. Bradshaw
says, to any of them. But then the misfortune is,
Mary, that we can't commence a flirtation,
however
much in jest, without getting the heart touched
after awhilethis sentimentality is my abhorrence!
What a love-sick swain Mr. Henry Selman would
be, should he get involved in the tender passion.
What a love-sick swain he is you mean! And
the truth is, Penelope, you have not a proper
regard
for his feelings.
Ho, ho, you're getting sentimentalquite a
sign, Miss Mary. You don't pretend to deny, now,
that there was some tender passages between you
and Mr. Bradshaw, to-day, in the summer-house,
do you?
Penelope, you seem to think, because Mr.
Selman
has made a `tender of his affections to you,'
that every body else has received similar tenders.
You can't hide it from me, Mary. Mr.
Bradshaw
was cunning enough to hide your confusion,
and try to confuse me; but I saw through it, and
I shrewdly suspect, from his manner and yours,
that his eloquence prevailed.
Ah! indeed, what makes you think so? asked
Mary Carlton, affecting to put her question in an
indifferent tone.
Oh, I've some experience Miss Mary, as well
as you. When a lady tries to hide a gentleman's
Vol. II. 16
confusion, on such an occasion, it showsbut, come,
what do you think it shows?
It shows, said Miss Carlton, laughing, that
she has made a conquest, and is doubtful; rather
disposed to yieldbut she wants pressing, hey!
Penelope; such, for instance, as you may form some
idea of, if you remember what happened in the
garden, after I left you and Mr. Selman there,
to-day
.
Go on! exclaimed Miss Penelope.
Well, when the lady is anxious to exhibit the
gentleman's confusion, it proves that she is a
coquette
,
who only cares for conquestfor glory;
that she has no clemency, and would chain the
conquered to the wheels of her triumphal car.
Go on, Mary, and tell us what's the sign when
the gentleman hides the lady's confusion.
Oh, I know no morehere ends my catechism.
Well, I'll instruct you; when a gentleman tries
to hide a lady's confusion, on such a tender
occasion
,
it shows that she has been wooed and won
witness the summer-house this morning, when you
were catching runaway squirrels. You must keep
a tight chain round the neck of your squirrel, Mary,
I tell you. If you knew what was said to me on
the fourth, you would think there was some
probability
of my cutting you out.
Ah, well, you were determined I should not cut
you out this afternoon. But, joking aside, what are
you going to do with Mr. Selman?
Do with him what you're determined to do
with Mr. Bradshawhave him, I suppose; and I
declare to you I hate the thoughtbut as one
must settle down into matrimony, sooner or later,
the sooner the better.
A fair conclusion, Miss Penelope Perry.
Mary, Henry Selman is as blind as a beetle to
a smitation. Sometimes I really pity him; do you
think he didn't tell me, after you left us in the
garden
this afternoon, that he was afraid you had
acted
very coquettishly, and rejected Mr. Bradshaw.
Nullified the union! Poor fellowhe thought
Mr. Bradshaw's experience must tally with his
own. He did not know, that though you
sometimes
pretend to hoist the single star, you are,
nevertheless, like the rest of woman kind, for union
to a man, as the epigram says.
Mary, you should have heard my sister
Priscilla
,
the evening of the fourth of July. Such a
lecture she did inflict on me! Poor Prisy has had
her day with the dashing beaux, and she begins to
settle down into an idea of parsons and sober
sedate
gentlemen of a certain age. She has a
sisterly
regard for me, and, I expect, when about my
years, she was a complete flirt; she flirted herself
out of two or three lovers, and is now as
repentant
as any sinner you ever saw; she is so anxious
to make amends for it, that I have no doubt she
will accept the first staid, sober, discreet gentlemen
who offers. Indeed, she scolded so loudly, and
threatened such awful threats of telling mother
whom Mr. Bradshaw has talked into believing
Henry Selman the best young man in the world
of my improper conduct and total disregard of Mr.
Selman's feelings, as she called it, that I was forced
to promise her, that the next time the poor
creature
talked to me of love, I would just stop his
mouth at once, and for ever, on that subject, by
accepting
him. I suppose Mr. Bradshaw has
persuaded
you to make him the happiest man in the
worldis not that the way these lovers phrase it?
at such an early date, that it is too late for me, to
ask you to be my bridemaid, and I must be yours.
Long before their conversation ended, their
cheeks were upon their pillows. Selman, who
rested in the adjoining room, reported to Bradshaw,
that long after midnight, he heard the indistinct
hum of their voices, and though (shameful that he
should confess such a thing,) he tried his hardest
to hear, he could not distinguish one word of their
conversation. What was farther said, we may
not relate, for we fear our fair readers have
accused
us already of betraying secrets which
gentlemen
are not entitled to hear.
Not long after the above conversation, Miss
Penelope
and Selman were married. Mary and
Emily were her bridemaids, and Bradshaw and
Willoughby, his grooms'-men. In due time, Mary
Carlton went to the Springs. She corresponded
regularly with Emily Bradshaw, and gave her
piquant accounts of the motley crowd, among whom
she moved the most attractive belle. Frequent
reports reached Bradshaw of her conquests. These
reports not only told what gentlemen were wooing
her, but of engagements made, &c. &c. Talbot
was frequently mentioned as one of the best
received
of her admirers. All this Bradshaw heard
with feelings which required a stubborn effort to
command. Though he would not believe them,
they gave him a heart-chill often, but he banished
them from his reflections with a stern pride.
CHAPTER VIII.
As the time approached, when the candidates for
state legislature were generally announced,Jekyl,
who, as our readers are aware, had become the
editor of a weekly paper, called on Bradshaw,
and said
Mr. Bradshaw, they talk of bringing you out
for the legislature.
Ah! do they. What chance do you think I'd
stand?
I think you would be elected.
I'm told that Talbot intends being a candidate.
Is it a fact?
I have heard such a rumour, but I don't know
what credence to give it. Old Broadbelt and
yourself, I have no doubt, will be elected. Have
you been spoken to on the subject?
Yes, several of my friends have mentioned it
to me.
There will be a meeting of the wards of the
city where I liveof the mechanicsnext
Thursday
evening, and you will be nominated.
Jekyl, my friend, said Bradshaw, if I'm
nominated
,
of course, I wish to be elected; there are
several
very popular men spoken of as candidates, and
16*
as a number of important measures will be brought
before our legislature this winter, there will be a
deep interest felt in the election. I am obliged to
you for your friendly feeling towards me; but you
must give me time to think upon the business
before
the nomination is made.
The workies are determined to nominate you,
Bradshaw. It will be done. You can decline,
you know, if you choose, after the nomination is
made; but I really think you will be elected, and
it will be of service to you in your profession.
Here, a client entered, and Jekyl took his leave,
saying he would call again.
When his client left, Bradshaw walked to
Glassman's
,
with whom he had promised to sup, and go
to the theatre, determined to consult him on the
matter.
Why, Bradshaw, said Glassman, as Sir
Roger would say, much may be said on both sides.
You know, as I have told you, I've no turn for
politics
myself. The law is a jealous mistress, and
requires, I might almost say, exclusive devotion
from her votaries, if they would be successful: at
least from most of them. Those who have high
talents may wander, and yet advance in her good
graces, even facilitating their progress by a
knowledge
of politics: for politics is the philosophy of
lawbut the number is small. You know there
are many who can practise what they have only
learned by rote, as the mountebank, by the
aid of chemistry, can perform many tricks, though
he knows nothing of the properties of the science.
Thus practise too many lawyers. When a lawyer
would be great, a knowledge of politicsI do
not mean of party politics, but of the political
history of his countryis necessary to his success
in the high walks of his profession. But,
nowdays
,
alas! politician and trickster, statesman and
charlatan, are synonymous terms. Yet weyou
are not compelled to tread the road, in becoming
a politician, that others treadif I have read you
right, your nature will not let you. A man of your
character and talents, (I speak to you as a friend;
I use no flattery,) cannot avoid becoming a politician
You have every requisite for making a statesman;
ambition can be loftier than that of a successful a
patriotic oneand, as you will sooner or later
enter
the arena, be your resolutions now what they
may, I do not know but what you had better
commence
now: you can thus test the soundness of your
partiality for political life, and if you think
yourself
unfitted for it, which, if you do justice to
yourself
,
I believe you will not, you can quit it at once
and much easier than if you were to commence
politician after you had acquired an extensive
legal
reputation:
then
you would be more anxious to
succeed even than you are now, because you would
be aware, more would be expected from you, as
ambition grows; yet, to tell the truth, your
capability
might be less, for the fact is, few lawyers
who commence politicians late in life, do succeed.
The law, as Burke says, is the `Chinese shoe on
the mind,'and, to make a pun, if you put the shoe
on early, and wear it perpetually, you must
expect
to have a narrow
understanding
. To quote
Burke again `when a new and a troubled scene
is opened, and the file affords no precedent,' the
man who has been all his life acting from
precedent
,
and particularly from the technical
precedents
of the law, is in a situation that, whatever
may be his natural capacity, is an embarrassed
one, in which he is just as apt to go wrong as right.
Bradshaw, I do not know of any animal in the
natural history, who has so much unmitigated
dulness
about him, and upon him, as one of your mere
lawyers. Meet one of them where you will,
under
any circumstances, at a bridal, or burial, at
a play-house, or a prayer-meeting, and, if he can
possibly find, or make an opportunity, he will poke
some mooted tweedle dum tweedle dee point of law
at you. His brain is like his parchment, engrossed
with technicalities and quibbles: every thing else
is foreign to the record.
Yet, ours is a noble profession.
Certainly, a noble profession to a noble mind,
a mind that connects literature and general science
with it. But the fact is, Bradshaw, the mind must
be a great one, indeed, that the study of the law
does not `cabin, crib, confine.' In my intercourse
with men, who stand the highest in their profession, I
have been literally astonished with the extent of
their ignorance, and the audacity with which they
will proclaim it, like a states' witness recounting
his rascalities.
That was a pungent sarcasm of Burke on
Erskine
,
when he said, in combating Erskine's notions
of an impeachment, that a nisi prius' lawyer, giving
an opinion upon the duration of an impeachment,
was like a rabbit that breeds six times a year,
pretending
to know of the gestation of an elephant.
But it does not come under the definition that
some one gives of wit`a good thing well applied.'
It is a good thing mis-applied, in that instance,
though, no doubt, it applies generally to nisi prius'
lawyers. I think Erskine the model of a
constitutional
lawyer. Was it not Johnson who said, that
he who would write the English language correctly,
must devote his days and nights to Addison? I
should say, that the advocate who would utter
arguments that convince, and eloquence that warms
and persuades, must devote his days and nights to
Erskine. I know no forensic efforts, that, take
them all in all, compare with his. Read his
argument
in Hatfield's casewhat a profound
exposition
of the different species of insanity, of their
characteristics
,
and the legal responsibilities of each.
What a glorious constitutional argument is that, on
the trial by jury, in the Dean of St. Asaph's case.
His defence of Stockdale I have read over and over
againthat is a fine passage where he describes
the `striking spectacle daily exhibited' at
Hastings'
trial: and he well characterizes the efforts of
Burke and Sheridan, as `anathemas of superhuman
eloquence.' That is a fine passage, too, where he
describes the nature of British dominion in the east;
and what can be more eloquent than his
description
of the `savage, holding a bundle of sticks in
his hand, as the notes of his unlettered eloquence.'
His conclusion, where he says, that the benevolent
author of our being will judge us, as the jury should
judge the passages in the book of Logan, which
were indicted as libellous,`holding up the great
volume of our lives, and regarding the
general scope
of them
,' is not surpassed in appropriateness, and
in the combination of reason, eloquence, and sound
morality, in any forensic effort I know of, unless it
is by himself, in the defence of Bingham.
Erskine, Mr. Bradshaw, in his intercourse with
the bar and bench, was a model of what becomes
a lawyer. In his very first effort, when unknown,
and when judges are more apt to be courted than
opposed by a young aspirant, Erskine acted not
only fearlessly, but nobly. When Lord Mansfield,
from the bench, told him, in no very gentle manner,
that Lord Sandwich was not before the court,
Erskine exclaimed, he would bring him before the
court, and indignantly commented on his conduct.
Remember, that Sandwich was high in place and in
power, that Erskine was powerlesswas making
his first speech, and in a borrowed gown, for he
was too poor to buy onethat he had every thing
to lose, and nothing to gain. I am wrong, he
had
something to gain,the approval of his conscience
and his countrythe best rewards of honourable
exertion. This manly spirit guided and guarded
him through life. Erskine had his errorswho
has not? For my part, when I gaze upon the
diamond
I think of its brilliant qualities, and not of
the dirt that may sometimes partially obscure them.
But you know his speeches, Bradshaw, as well as
Ibetter, for you are fresh in them. Our
professional
men should devote themselves more to
literature
,
biography, poetry, and history.
It seems to me, said Bradshaw, that our
statesmenand most of them are, or have been,
lawyersare not surpassed by any in the world.
Certainly not, said Glassman. I was not
speaking particularly of our very foremost men,
though they, I think, do not enough cultivate
literature
:law
and politics (and, I fear, party, personal
politics) engross their attention, at least,
now-a-days
I
was speaking of the profession, generally.
In a country where there is so general a diffusion
of knowledge, as in ours, 'tis not he who knows the
most, that has the greatest influence, but he who
can make himself best understood, and who pleases
while he instructs. Who thinks of wading through
the interminable speeches of our congressmen?
Most of the speakers do not want information on
the subject on which they speak; but they deliver
it in a jumbled, discordant mass, often with as
little
attention to the construction of their arguments,
as their sentences. And, as for beauty of language,
historical citation, or literary adornment, except in
the speeches of two or three of our leading men, I
do not know where you can find it.
Did you know the late William Pinckney?
Ah! yes. You should have heard him speak
of Erskine. When Pinckney was minister at the
court of St. James, he became acquainted with him,
and heard him repeatedly. He entertained the
highest opinion of him. Pinckney was, perhaps, the
most thoroughly ambitious man I ever knew. He
laboured in his last cause harder than he did in
his first; and in every cause, as if his professional
reputation depended upon it. Pinckney's style was
too verbose and declamatory, and his manner
violent
beyond all description. Before he went to
England, I am told by those who often heard him,
his manner of speaking was mild and persuasive,
and his voice silvery: on his return, he adopted a
directly opposite oratory, which did not suit him.
He was an intense student. We have often met
in attendance on the supreme court, and I have
repeatedly occupied a room adjoining his; when, if
I had been a prisoner to my own, I could have told
when any case of great importance, that excited
public attention, and in which a distinguished man
was to oppose him, was before the court. He
would often walk his room all night; and not
unfrequently
,
as I lay in bed, did I hear the rehearsal
of the argument, which, the next day, I listened to
in court. His perseverance was tireless. He loved
his profession, devotedly; and, I doubt much, if, in
any other vocation, he could have won so high a
reputation. His mind was of an order that could
rather acquire than create. He could not have
succeeded in a work of the imaginationhe might
as an historian, if he had improved his style. But
with the law his mind was thoroughly imbuedhe
comprehended its broadest principles, while he
made a microscopic observation of the merest
technicalities
.
His mind was argumentative and subtle;
his figures of speech, his flights of fancy, cost him
more labour than his argument: he almost always
wrote them out, and committed them to memory.
His argument was perfect without his fancy-work;
and his fancy-work was perfect without his
argument
.
His fancy did not grow out of his subject,
like the leaf from the summer bough: it was
rather
stuck on it, like a flower in a cap, for display;
and a certain chillness reminded us that it was a
hot-house planta forced cultivation. Yet, as a
lawyer, I know not his superior; and no man could
do better than to confide his case to Mr. Pinckney
because he never neglected it, through indolence,
pleasure, or inattention; and, if he took it in hand,
he attended to it, not more for emolument, than for
success and fame. An anecdote is related of him,
which strikingly shows his character. When at
the court of St. James, he was dining in company
with Burke, Sheridan, Fox, and a host of great
names, when a discussion arose upon some line in
Virgil, I believe. All of them expressed their
opinions
but Mr. Pinckney; and, as he had said
nothing
,
pro
or
con
, they appealed to him as umpire.
He had to confess his ignorance of the Latin
language
;
but when he left the company, he sent
immediately
for a teacher, and commenced the study
of it. He became an accomplished Latin scholar.
While abroad, I am told, he was a hard student of
the law, and a regular attendant on the courts, so
that, when he returned, and again became a
practitioner
,
instead of his contemporaries finding him
rusty, as they expected, he entered the lists with
his armour bright, and armed at all points.
I like that in his character, exclaimed
Bradshaw
;
it shows
character
.
Bradshaw, said Glassman, musinglyyes,
you had better be a candidate for the legislature.
I think you will be elected. The Superior Court
will meet, you know, at , the same time as the
legislature. You ought to attend that court, and
Vol. II. 17
your election will send you to  in a double
capacity, as a legislator and a lawyer. But, come,
let us to the theatreMrs. Drake, the western
actress, makes her appearance to-night, for the
first time, I believe, on our boards. Your friend,
Willoughby, whom I like very much, who is just
such a man as you described him to be, promises
me great things in her performance.
The theatre was crowded. Mrs. Drake
appeared
in the Soldier's Daughter; and when the
curtain fell, Glassman, after the silent musing of a
moment, exclaimed,
I cannot remove the impression from my mind,
that it is impossible for Mrs. Drake to play any
other character than thisshe plays so naturally,
that, never having seen her before, it seems to me
it is her own character; and yet, you tell me, in
Bianca and in Julia, she is just as great. O! what
a gift is genius! and how fascinating in a woman!
CHAPTER IX.
It
is not our purpose to designate, in these idle
pages, either of the political parties that now distract,
or, if you please, divide our country. We are just
from the thick of the fight ourselves, and we turn,
with pleasure, from the stern reality to fancy;
happy
,
if experience has taught us to copy from the
great book of the world a not incorrect page or two.
When the anticipated meeting of which Jekyl
spoke convened, Bradshaw was unanimously
nominated
for the state legislature. The moment the
nomination
was made, a committee was appointed to
wait on him forthwith, and request his attendance
at the meeting. The committee found Bradshaw
at his office, and, in a few minutes, he stood among
his friends. They received him with enthusiastic
applause. From that evening to the day of
election
,
he attended meetings almost every evening,
in the different wardsmade speeches and friends.
Talbot had, also, been nominated by a number of
his friends, but he still loitered at the Springs, and
left those who nominated him to electioneer for
him. What is every body's business is nobody's
business. Old Broadbelt and two others were also
candidates. The city was only entitled to two
representatives.
Bradshaw was elected: he led the polls fifteen
hundred and five votes. Broadbelt stood next.
Talbot was within three hundred votes of
Broadbelt
.
He returned to the city only two weeks
before
the election. His reputation for talent was
high, and his family influence very extensive. If
he had used half the exertion of Bradshaw, he
would have been elected instead of Broadbelt.
In the winter, Bradshaw attended the legislature,
of course; and there he was thrown a great deal
with Glassman, who was in attendance on the
Superior
Court. Glassman and Bradshaw roomed
together. With his usual energy and perseverance,
Bradshaw devoted himself to his duties. He did
not show off in much speaking, and in making
sarcastic
remarks upon country members. He
guarded
the interests of his constituents, and conciliated
even those whom he was compelled to oppose.
Such was his popularity and tact, that persons
from every part of the state, having business at the
seat of government, would request his kind offices.
Glassman, with real friendliness, assisted him in
various
ways, and exerted himself to advance his
popularity
and influence.
Bradshaw, said Glassman to him, one night,
when they were seated together in their room,
you have made an impression here of the right
sort. Most young men go to the legislature to
speak; you came here to act, and you have acted
well. `Much speaking,' said John Randolph, in his
best daysa maxim which he afterwards forgot,
or, at least disregarded`much speaking, Mr.
Speaker, will cheapen abilities much greater than
mine.' You have done nothing to cheapen your
abilities in that line; in fact, you have done nothing
that gave a touch of their quality, except your
speech on the canal bill. Every body, the
generality
of persons, I mean, expected you to make
splendid declamations; you have done better, you
have shown yourself a thorough man of business.
This spirit of interminable speech-making is the
curse of our legislative halls. It is not only in bad
taste, but a man loses his object by it, if it be any
thing more than to make a speech which nobody
will read. Our members of congress appear to
think that their election gives them
`Full and eternal privilege of tongue,'
that they may measure out their speeches, as a
clothier measures out his cloth, and the poorer the
quality, the more they can afford to inflict for their
per diem
.
In enacting laws that cannot interest our
readers
,
the session of the legislature passed.
Bradshaw
and Broadbelt reached the city of their
constituents
at night; the former obtained a horse
from his colleague, sent word to the Rev. Mr.
Longshore to have his office opened in the
morning
,
and rode out to the Purchase. He found his
father and family well. Mary Carlton was still at
Washington; and he spent the evening in looking
over her letters to his sister, which gave an
interesting
account of the characters and scenes of
the capital. Not unfrequently his name occurred
17*
in the correspondence; and when it did, he would
pause and puzzle over the writing, and try to
divine
,
in the shape of the letters formed by her
delicate hand, the feelings which possessed her
bosom while she wrote. What slight and trivial
things are of interest to a loverno matter how
manly or determined his character. Bradshaw
inquired
for Willoughby, and learned he had not
been to the Purchase for three or four days. In
the morning, bright and early, he departed for
town. As Bradshaw left the house, he heard Pete's
mother, calling at the top of her voice, for her
runaway
assistant, who had left the churn just as the
butter was coming; and gone, she knew not
whither. When Bradshaw reached the gate, he
found the recreant functionary parading it open
with officious display, and holding in his hand what
had once been a hat.
Pete, don't you hear your mother?
Yes, Massa Clinton, but I want to shut the gate
after you.
And you want toll, hey?
Pete grinned, and dropped his hat to catch the
fip, as Massa Clinton put his hand in his pocket.
Bradshaw was glad to find himself once more
seated in his office. His reverend attendant had
put every thing to rights. He installed himself in
his great arm-chair, and looked around, musingly,
upon his books and papers, as we gaze upon the
faces of familiar friends after a long absence.
While thus engaged, a thin, peculiar-looking old
man entered his office; and, sans ceremonie, took
a seat. After a premonitory cough, and a rapid
glance around the room, the stranger asked,
Are you Mr. Bradshaw, sir, Mr. Clinton
Bradshaw
?
I am, sir.
Fine day, sir; we shall have summer on us
quickugh, ugh, ugh, (coughing,) you're just from
the legislature, I'm told?
Yes, sir; I returned last night.
At this moment Willoughby entered the office.
He was dressed in a full suit of black, with a broad
band of crape round his hat; his fine countenance
was unusually pale and troubled.
Bradshaw, my friend, how are you? said
Willoughby
,
you're welcome back.
Kentuck, my heart of heartsall hail to you!
exclaimed Bradshaw, jumping up and seizing him
by the hand, what's the matter!is your uncle
dead?
Yes, he's gone to his long account.
When did you hear it? I congratulate you
upon your immense possessions.
The day before yesterday. Bradshaw, my
immense
possessions are like the Irishman's fleaput
your finger on him, and he's not there. I am not
worth the boots I stand inmy uncle has not left
me one cent.
Not left you one cent! Is it possible! damn him!
Why did you put on black for him?
The old gentleman always treated me well:
his wealth was his own, I suppose. It's a hard
cut, Bradshaw. I expected to inherit the largest
fortune in the west, and here you see me,
penniless
,
and in debt. My uncle has been deceived, by
cringing scoundrels round him. No matterno
matter: I wear this black for the good points in
his character; he was peculiarhe had bad health
heno matter, let his errors sleep with himhe
was my father's brother.
Take a seat, my friend, said Bradshaw. Are
you sure there's no mistake in this?
None; the letter's from my uncle's intimate
friend. The old gentleman, like Swift, has
founded
a hospital for lunatics. A cool million gone to
support those who have lost their wits, while I
must live by mine; think of that, master Brook.
Here the stranger, who had arisen during the
conversation, and advanced to the door, passed out.
Bradshaw was so much interested in his friend, that
he did not notice him.
Kentuck, said Bradshaw, grasping his hand,
convulsively, my noble friend, you have that in
you which will surmount sterner obstacles than the
loss of fortuneyou have glorious talents: God's
best giftsyour uncle could not dispossess you of
them. Be admitted to the practice of the law,
when the court sits, and let us open shop together
hang out our shingle on the outer wall. You and
I, Kentuck, against the field.
The Kentuckian released his hand from
Bradshaw's
grasp, to dash a tear from his eye. This
is unmanly, he exclaimed, but, Bradshaw, I will
speak to you plainly: I am a beggarI meant to
return to Kentuck, and force my way,butbut
there's a strong spell binds me hereyour sister!
I am attached to herI have not told her of my
attachmentI don't know that she suspects it.
I will accept your offer. We will hoist our shingle
togetherI will struggle hard; and when I can
support her as she should be supported, I will tell
her of my attachment, and win her, if I can, if
your family has no objection.
Kentuck, I am the only worldly one of my
family. Rich or poor, I would rather call you
brother, than any man in this big city. It is a hope
I have nursed long: I suspected your feelings.
Come, continued Bradshaw, smiling, mount your
horse and ride out to the Purchase; see Emily
speak to her on `that subject,' as Selman would
say,now is the time to find out whether she loves
you, for yourself, Kentuck.
No, Bradshawno, not nownot now.
Yes,
now
, Kentuck,
now
!
Here a number of Bradshaw's political friends,
who had heard of his return, entered his office.
While he was welcoming them, Willoughby left
the room. In a moment afterwards, Bradshaw
hurried after him; but he could not discover in
what direction he had gone, and he was compelled
to return to his company.
In the meantime, Willoughby, internally
resolving
not to go to the Purchase, almost mechanically
proceeded to the livery stable, and mounted his
horse. He rode in a direction from the Purchase,
for some time, brooding on his altered fortunes. He
took from his pocket the letter informing him of
his uncle's death, and the disposition of his property,
and read it againthere was, alas! no mistake in
ithe knew the hand-writing well.
I could bear it without a murmur, said
Kentuck
,
to himself, were it not for my love of Emily
Bradshaw. But why should I be such a fool?I
have never told her of my attachment. What is
my loss of wealth to her?why should it prevent
me from going to the Purchase!there I have
always been treated with the greatest hospitality,
and there I ought to gobut merely as a visiter.
While Willoughby pursued these reflections, his
horse, that had been suffered to proceed without
guidance, turned his head towards the Purchase,
his accustomed route; and the rider having
convinced
himself that he ought to go there, but
merely as a visiter, now put spurs to his steed, as
if anxious to arrive before he altered his
determination
.
He had not ridden far, before he
checked the career of his horse, while he resolved
some doubts on the propriety of his resolution; and
in the midst of these conflicting feelings, he reached
Mr. Bradshaw's gate. His horse stopped, while
the rider, without attempting to open the gate, sat
deliberating upon what he should do. He was just
on the eve of determining to return to the city,
when he reflected that it was his
duty
to visit the
sister of his friend, and those who had always
treated him with so much hospitality; and, looking
through the fence, for he had, until this moment,
been inattentive to objects around him, he beheld
Mr. Bradshaw in the act of descending from his
chaise, in which sat Mrs. Bradshaw, to open the
gate.
Stay, Mr. Bradshaw, exclaimed Willoughby,
and let me open it for you.
Mr. Willoughby!good morning, sirif you
please. You are quite a stranger.
I have had some business that has kept me in
town, said Willoughby. Is Miss Emily at the
Purchase?
Yes, said Mrs. Bradshaw: ride up to the
house; you will find her there. We're going to
neighbour Bryant's, who is sick.
Willoughby found Emily alone. With a quicker
eye than her parents, she observed his
mourning-suit
,
the broad band round his hat, and asked him,
if he had lost a friend.
My only relative on earth, Miss Emily; my
uncle.
She inquired when he died, and then, to relieve
Willoughby's feelings, turned the conversation.
Mr. Willoughby, she said, I am obliged to
you for the song you sent me the other day. I
have been practising it, andshall I sing it for
you?
If you please, Miss Emily. I like it, I suppose,
because it was set to music by a professor whom I
became acquainted with in Louisville, and who is
now living in Cincinnati; he possesses fine musical
taste and talent.
Emily Bradshaw ran her hand over the keys,
thoughtfully, and then sang as follows.
ABSENCE.
'Tis said that absence conquers love,
But, O! believe it not;
I've tried, alas! its power to prove,
But thou art not forgot.
Lady, though fate has bid us part,
Yet still thou art as dear
As fixed in this devoted heart,
As when I clasped thee here.
I plunge into the busy crowd,
And smile to hear thy name
And yet, as if I thought aloud,
They know me still the same:
And when the wine-cup passes round,
I toast some other fair;
But when I ask my heart the sound,
Thy name is echoed there.
And when some other name I learn,
And try to whisper love,
Still will my heart to thee return,
Like the returning dove.
In vain! I never can forget,
And would not be forgot;
For I must bear the same regret,
Whate'er may be my lot.
E'en as the wounded bird will seek
Its favourite bower to die,
So, lady, I would hear thee speak,
And yield my parting sigh.
'Tis said that absence conquers love;
But, O! believe it not;
I've tried, alas! its power to prove,
But thou art not forgot.
After the song ceased, there was a silence for
some moments, which Miss Bradshaw interrupted,
by asking,
Then you return to Kentucky, Mr.
Willoughby
?
No, Miss Emily. I don't know what I shall do.
So saying, Willoughby rose to depart.
Do stay to dinner, Mr. Willoughby. Brother
will be out this afternoon, and he will be company
in for you.
Emily Bradshaw observed that Willoughby was
wrapped in a brooding, unquiet melancholyand
she exerted herself to dispel it. This gave a
tenderness
to her tone, always of the gentlest, that
won upon his feelings, and unmanned his
resolutions
in spite of himself.
He arose, advanced to the door as if to leave
and then returned to Emily's side, and told her all
of his uncle's will, of his poverty, and of his love.
I could have borne it for myself, said he,
Emily
I
beg pardon, Miss Bradshaw; but I had
hoped
I know what you would say, Mr. Willoughby,
said Emily Bradshaw, looking up into his face,
with a frankness worthy of her forefathers, with
an eye, such as one of the most gifted of her sex,
has ascribed to her race, on Plymouth rock, an
eye
Lit by her deep love's truth.
I know what you would say, Mr. Willoughby.
I should feel hurt with you, should you attribute
to me the least mercenary feeling; there is my
handyou never asked it till to-dayyou have
had my heart long ago: I gave it to you when you
were thought very rich, and I cannot take it away,
and I would not, continued she, smiling, though
you are very poor.In an altered tone, she
added, I care not what worldly advantage wealth
might give to me. I have been taught to consider
it a snare to the fallingbut, indeed, I am sorry
Vol. II. 18
forsorry that your uncle did not better know
youryourworth. She wept; Willoughby
pressed her to his heart, and dried her tears upon
his bosom.
Willoughby sat by Emily Bradshaw, and told
her of his intention of applying himself to his
studies
,
and of the proposal which her brother had
made to him of a partnership. He was certain,
he said, that his profession would soon yield him a
handsome income; and then talked over and over
again with her, the plan of his future life. How
susceptible a generous and brave nature is of the
gentlest and tenderest emotions! The Kentuckian,
as he thus conversed with Emily, thought of his loss
of fortune with a glow of pride; for he felt that he
was appreciated for himself, and he gazed on the
fair girl by his side, and pressed her to his heart,
with a passion amounting to enthusiasm. Emily
Bradshaw cared very little for the loss, except as
it affected her lover; and the manly manner in
which he bore it, only endeared him to her the
more.
Mr. Bradshaw did not return home until late in
the afternoon. Mrs. Bradshaw entered the house
while her husband drove the chaise to the
carriage-house
;
Willoughby followed after him
narrated
to him all that our readers are aware of, and
asked him if he had objections to his alliance.
Mr. Bradshaw listened to Willoughby with an
emotion which he in vain tried to suppress. He
took him by the hand, and, after a silence of some
moments, said
You are not a religious man, Mr. Willoughby,
but you have generous and noble impulsesand
they govern you. I hope and believe that you
will make the rule of action they dictate, a duty
a religious duty. Your uncle has done very wrong;
he has brought you up to expect a very large
fortune
,
and has cut you off, it seems, without any
alleged misdemeanor on your part, merely through
a whim, a caprice, or the improper influence of
those around him in his dying hour. He did not
know what effect it might have upon you. It
would plunge many a young man into
irreclaimable
dissipation. I honour you for the manliness you
have shown, and the resolutions you have made.
I did not wish Clinton to study law, for I feared
the vanities of the world would mislead him. He
has done well so far; and I hope the Lord will
forgive me if I have felt unbecoming pride in the
world's report of him. I hope Clinton does not set
too much store upon the honour of men. It is
more uncertain, even than the gifts of fortune. I
have enough of wealthit satisfies all my wants;
and why should it not satisfy my children. Emily
(Mrs. Bradshaw,) and I are getting old; it would
be hard for her and for me to part with our
daughterwe should be all alone. If you follow
your profession, you will have to live in town, and
our daughter and our son would then both be away
from us in the gay world. Why should you follow
the law. I have often heard you say, you loved
the simple pleasures of a country life; could not
you be happy here? Mr. Willoughby you have
my daughter's affectionpure and unsullied
affection
;
and you have, wrapped up in her, a father's
and a mother's deep, deep love. You will have,
under God, the happiness of more than one
committed
to your charge. My son, continued Mr.
Bradshaw, in a tremulous voice, think of what I
have saidand may God, of his infinite mercy,
bless you both.
Old Pete, who was taking the horse from the
chaise, was an unobserved hearer of this
conversation
.
He had more than once, with the pride of
a family servant, boasted (negroes are quick in
discovering such things) of the rich and
monstrous
brave-looking beau his young missus had,
to the neighbouring negroes, and he felt a deep
mortificationyour old family servants feel as
deeply as their masters, any thing that concerns
the familywhen he heard Willoughby tell Mr.
Bradshaw of his disinheritance. As they left the
carriage-house together, Mr. Bradshaw wrapped
in his own thoughts, piously ejaculated, The
Lord giveth, and the Lord taketh away, blessed be
the name of the Lord.
Now, did ever any nigger hear the like of old
Massa Bradshaw! exclaimed old Pete, petulantly
tossing the harness which he had just lifted from
the back of the horse into the bottom of the chaise.
The Lord didn't take away Massa Willoughby's
money at all, his mean uncle take it away, and I
hope old Satten 'll roast him for it.
CHAPTER X.
We
leave Willoughby with the lady of his love,
and return to Bradshaw. After his political friends
had left him, he sat alone in his office, musing on
the disinheritance of Willoughby, when the
peculiar-looking
personage, with the cough, of whom
we spoke in the last chapter, again entered.
Ugh, ugh! coughed he, much business doing
in the legislature, Mr. Bradshaw?
Yes, sir, said Bradshaw, offering him a chair,
considerable.
This is the first time you have been to the
legislature
,ugh,
ugh!is it? asked the stranger,
picking up a newspaper and casting his eye over it.
The first time, sir, answered Bradshaw, eyeing
the interrogator more closely. He was an attenuated,
dyspeptic person, with a suspicious glance, and a
hurried and abrupt manner. Bradshaw at once
discovered he was a
character
, and it struck him
that he wished to communicate something or other,
but did not well know how to begin. Half
musingly
and half attentively, Bradshaw answered him
as he continued his interrogatories.
18*
Much talent there, sir?
Not any marked individual talentthere's
rather
a democracy of itit's pretty nearly equally
distributed.
A democracy of talent!ugh, ugh!you go
in for democracy, do you?
For a democracy of rights, said Bradshaw,
smiling at the oddness of the stranger, but
Sir, exclaimed the stranger, you have the
notions of theugh!of the French revolutionists
sorry to know it, sirsorry to know it.
You didn't hear me out; I was going to say,
but I believed that nature was opposed to a
democracy
of talent,I'm not exactly a French
revolutionist
,
for I don't agree with him, who, when
some member of the national convention of France,
called Mirabeau, the `distinguished member,'
jumped up in a rage, and exclaimed`they had
no distinguished members there, they were all
equal!'
Ha! ha!ughI like that muchnever saw
that beforemust remember thatgood many
young men of your profession here, I suppose, Mr.
Bradshaw?
Yes, sir, any quantity of themif you have
professional business you can have your pick of
some dozens.
Some dozens, hey, ugh!Fine place, I suppose,
to study the law.
That's problematicalthere are too many
temptations here to allure one away from study.
Yes, I thought so. Most young men, who come
here from other states, disregard parents,
guardians
,
and every body else, hey,and take to
frolicking. Do you know, Mr. Bradshaw,ugh!
ugh!do you know
Halloo, Bradshaw, I'm glad to see you back
again! exclaimed Selman, throwing open the
office-door
.
Ah! Mr. Benedict, exclaimed Bradshaw
my respects to you. And they shook each
other cordially by the hand.
Bradshaw, you look a little thin. Have you
seen Kentuck? That's a pretty will, isn't it, of that
uncle of his. Bradshaw, what'll he do?
Do!why, practise his professionIt will
be better than vegetating upon a fortune! Don't
you think so, Judge? continued Bradshaw,
addressing
Cavendish, who, at this moment, called to
welcome him home.
Think what? asked the Judge.
Why, that Willoughby will do better without
a fortune, than with one.
Think!by Jove!I think the carcass of that
uncle should be hung as high as Haman's.
Willoughby
is of a most respectable familyhe is the
only living representative:the old fool, I have no
doubt, was crazy. Willoughby always represented
him as a man of sense, with peculiarities, but
possessed of a strong mind. I have no doubt he was
crack-brained from the firstthe will, I believe,
could be brokenI've a great mind just to slip out
to the west (I've long had a notion of going there
to see the country) and inquire into the business.
Willoughby says, the letter informing him of the
death, is from an intimate friend of his uncle, and
that there can be no mistake in it.But, I tell
you what, that intimate friend may have been too
intimate! Do you doubt, he has been left a large
legacy. It's preposterous to believe that any uncle,
having his senses, would disinherit such a nephew
as Willoughby, his only blood relation in the world
the only one of his familyan ancient family
to endow a hospital for lunatics. He must have
been a lunatic himself.
I believe you're half right, Judge, exclaimed
Selman. What do you think, Bradshaw?
The Judge may be near the truth, replied
Bradshawhis uncle's a poor devil. But if it be
as we fear, Willoughby has talents and energy;
and, making a fortune, and winning with it an
honourable
name, will be better than stagnating with
a dukedom.
Stagnating with a devildom! exclaimed
Cavendish
.
Willoughby ought to have the
inheritance
.
This poverty is no such easy matter, Mr.
Bradshaw.
Why, JudgeI know it, remarked
Bradshaw
;
and, after musing several minutes, he
continued
that
will ought to be looked into
you're rightI have nothing particular to
prevent
my taking a jaunt with you, if you go west
what I meant to imply was, that Kentuck's
situation is not so bad, after all. He has talents
and a profession; and while he and his friends
should use every exertion to recover his fortune,
he nor they should not mope on the loss of it.
Judge, continued Bradshaw, with a peculiar
smile, where is there a man with a large fortune
that the people delight to honour? Fortune does
not bear away the honours of our land: luxuries
and superfluities, of course, it gives, but not the
luxuries and superfluities of renownpublic
estimation
,
political power, or legal skill: these are the
luxuries of
mental
wealth. I have been cogitating,
ever since I saw Kentuck, upon his loss of fortune.
No man, that I have ever known, would do more
honour to a princely estate than Kentuck.
Without
being the least prodigal, or living in enervating
luxuries, he would devote his income to the
enjoyment
of those around himand, in this, find much
of his own; he would be public-spirited and
generous
,
and would improve his mental gifts, without
devoting them to acquire fame or power: thus, he
would pass through life, respected and beloved.
But, believing, as I do, that Kentuck has great
natural talents; forcing his own way, as he will now
have to force it, I have no doubt (at least, I hope
for Kentuck, to tell the truth, is not of a very
ambitious nature) that he will stand among the
first men in the country. I cherish these
reflections
when I think of the conduct of the heartless
old foolhis uncle. If Kentuck had been a cringing,
time-serving Blifil of a fellow, he would have got
every cent of that old rascal's money. Yes, if he
had truckled to him, and watched his humours, like
a slave, and eschewed frankness and honour, and
nobility of character, he would now be the possessor
of a cool million.
He'll find out his true friends now, said
Cavendish
.
How some of the old mothers, who
have been courting him for their dear daughters,
will cool off; and, notwithstanding Kentuck is such
a good-looking fellow, I fear the daughters will
cool
too.
Come, said Bradshaw, starting up; Lyons has
a branch of his firm at , in the west, and he
knows Kentuck's uncle. He can give us some
information
that will be of service, perhaps.
Kentuck
bears it like a man; he has such a sensitive
and high honour, and his feelings have been so
wounded, not by the loss of his fortune, but by the
neglect of his uncle, that he had better remain
here; for, were he to go, if there has been any
fraud in the will, the wrong-doers would be thrown
upon their guard by his presence, which might
defeat
the ends of justice;on the contrary, no one
would suspect any thing from our visit. I like
your thought, Judge; and we must put it in
execution
at once.
The young men had been so busied in Kentuck's
loss, that they did not remark the presence of the
stranger, who sat reading the newspaper.
Bradshaw, thinking of him for the first time since
the entrance of his friends, said:Keep your
seat, sir;the paper is at your service. I will
return
in a few minutes, and, if you have any business
with me, I will then attend to it. Come,
addressing
Cavendish, let's go and see Lyons; we may
learn something from him, and if there is any thing
to strengthen your suspicions, Judge, why,
Westward
Ho!
The young men left the office together. They
were no sooner gone, than the old gentleman
started
up, exclaimingPoor devil!ugh! ugh!of
an uncle, heybelieve I am. My nephew's the
only one that gives me a good character; put on
black for me, though he was disinherited! that hurt
me worseugh! ugh!than if he had cursed me.
Yes, I am a poor devil; and I have been deceived,
like a poor devil:but I'll make him amends. He's
popular, why, he's very popular; and this keen
eyed fellow thinks he has first rate talents,so they
all thought at home. I'll leave him every cent I
haveyes, I'll deed it. He putugh! ugh!on
black for me, though I did disinherit him: I'll deed
it, so that I can't alter my mind. I've been
deceived
by Dodridgethat greasy, godly, Christless,
rascal. I must speak to this Bradshaw, and tell
him every thingor he'll be out to the west, and
proclaim me a fool and a poor devil, through the
whole country.
The old gentleman was interrupted in his train
of reflections by the entrance of Nancy Mulvany,
the apple woman.
Where's Bradshaw? she exclaimed, resting
her apple basket on the edge of the table. I
thought he was in.
Be in presently, I expect, good woman. What's
the price of apples?
Two cents a-piece, and four for a fip. I'm
tired out! and she threw herself into a chair.
Two cents a-piece, and four for a fipthat's a
devil of a price!
Devil of a price!they were as dear agin this
time last year.
They were, hey! I can get them in Kentucky
for a fip a peck,what do you think of that, good
woman?
Don't good woman me; my name's Nancy
Mulvany. Ye're not in Kentucky now; and, if
you want apples at a fip a peck, ye must go to
Kentucky for 'em. I wouldn't, woman as I am,
carry 'em for that.
You wouldn't, hey!ugh! ugh!good woman
ugh!
Don't good woman me, I tell ye.
Well, bad woman, thenugh!
Man! said Nancy, starting up, I don't know
ye; and if ye want to pass an insult, say so. I
don't believe ye're from Kentucky, at all.
Why not, Mrs. Mulwhat's your name?
Because I never knew a Kentuck, but what
was a gentleman. Young WilloughbyKentuck
they call himwouldn't own ye.
May be I wouldn't own him, Mrs. Mul. What
kind of a man may he be?
The right kind of a man!true to the back
bone, and ginrous and just.
Let me have a fip's worth of your apples, if
you please, Mrs. Mulma'am.
I think ye'll like 'em, said Nancy, softening
down, as she handed him the basket; help
yerself
ye're
from the far away state of Kentucky.
Did ye know KentuckI mean young
Willoughby
?
Why, yesI believe, mayhap I didugh!
ugh!
Well, I hope to goodness gracious ye've come
to comfort him. His uncle, they say, what had a
large fortune, and was to leave it all to him, is
dead and gone, and not left him the first cent.
It's a sin and shame, that it should be soa sin
and shame. His uncle must ha' bin a
weak-minded
creatur.
Is young Willoughbywhat kind of a man is
young Willoughby, ma'amugh! ugh!
What, Kentuck! why him and Bradshaw is,
among men, like them two big pippins there,
among my apples, the best of the whole on 'em.
I've heard of Bradshaw.
Heard of Bradshaw! every body what has ears
has heard of himand may hear him, too, of a
court-day. It would do you goodhe can beat
the best at this bar; and it isn't me only that says
itevery body says it. These apples came off of
his father's farmand a fine farm it is; and they're
fine folks. His sister is the right kind of a young
lady, I tell ye. When two young men are thick,
and one has a sisterthere's the reasonmay
be, said Nancy, knowingly.
Ugh! ugh!what's that, what's that! good
woman
?
It may be, and it mayn't be, said Nancy,
lifting
up her basket, but I mus'n't stay on the gossip
all day. And ye're for seeing Bradshaw, are ye
he'll do your lawing for you as good as airy one,
any where, ye may depend. I wish I could see
him; I've missed him mightilybut he'll be in the
court in the day. Ye'll find them good applesI
mustthere's Beck, now, gaping along, the lazy
varmint. Beck, ye hussy, take this basket to the
court;and Nancy hurried outhanded the
basket
to her, and followed after.
As our readers have discovered, the letter to
Vol. II. 19
Willoughby, announcing the death of his uncle,
and his disinheritance, was an artifice practised by
the uncle himself. The uncle was a suspicious,
wayward man; full of odd notions and
inconsistencies
.
One of his strong suspicions (in which there
was much more truth than in many other of his
whimsicalities,) was, that the attentions he received
were for his wealth; and though the world showed
him a respect on that account, which they else
would not have shown, yet he was wrong in
attributing
the regard of his nephew to that score.
This, to do him justice, he was slow to do; and, if
his nephew had remained in Kentucky, the
suspicion
,
if awakened in his mind, would only have
passed over it, like a cloud over the sunny face of
nature, without making any impression; but
Dodridge
,
a canting hypocrite, who lived near him,
anxious to displace the nephew in the uncle's
regard
,
in the hopes of being his heir, and knowing
he could not succeed while the nephew was daily
with his uncle, persuaded the old gentleman to
send him to an eastern law-school. Willoughby,
desirous of visiting the eastern states, and wholly
unsuspicious of the design of Dodridge, was
delighted
with his uncle's proposition, and gladly
complied with his wishes. In his absence, the sly
and insidious knave, watchful of every favourable
opportunity in the gloomy and suspicious moods of
the uncle, undermined, by a process, too tedious
and contemptible to dwell upon, his belief in the
affection of his nephew. After he determined to
disinherit him, his conscience smote him; and he
got a friend to write the letter which the nephew
received; and went on by the same mail to learn
his character and conduct while away, and to
discover
,
in a disguise which he had assumed, the
state of his nephew's feelings towards him.
His name was Chesterton, (he was Willoughby's
maternal uncle,) and in the inquiries which he made,
on his arrival in the city, he heard Bradshaw
spoken of in the highest terms, and that he was
the most intimate friend of his nephew; his
purpose
,
therefore, in visiting him was to hear, by
indirect
means, of Willoughby; but he did not know
well how to break the ice; for being of a suspicious
nature, as we have said, he feared he might be
suspected himself. When Willoughby entered
Bradshaw's office, while Mr. Chesterton was there,
and communicated to his friend his supposed loss of
fortune, he did not notice his uncle at all, nor would
he, in all probability, have known him, if he had,
as he supposed him dead. Mr. Chesterton felt a
deep humiliation, when he heard his nephew speak
of him as he did, and saw him in mourning for his
disinheritor; and, but for a sense of shame in the
presence of Bradshaw, he would have made
himself
known to his nephew, and have explained to
him how he had been deceived by Dodridge; but,
as it was, he left the office, fearful that
Willoughby
might recognise him. He called on Bradshaw
again, anxious to hear more of his nephew, and
then he heard what Willoughby's friends said, as
we have recorded. It had been his purpose to
return
to Kentucky, without making himself known to
Willoughby, and, after deeding his property to him,
to explain the whole matter by letter; but when
he heard Cavendish and Bradshaw consulting on
going west, to inquire into the will, and saw them
leave the office in fartherance of that intention,
with many a cough, and much worriment of shame
for such characters are very sensitive to ridicule
he resolved to await the return of Bradshaw, and
confide in him. Accordingly, he remained until
Bradshaw returned, and narrated to him all of
what our readers have been informed. Bradshaw
listened in silent surprise: his first emotion was
heart-felt joy for Willoughby, and then he felt, in
no small degree provoked with himself, that his
sagacity should have been so completely asleep as
not in the least to have remarked the stranger,
except
for a nervous old fellow, who had some
molehill
of a matter to consult him upon, which, in his
own estimation, amounted to a mountain.
And so you think I am a poor devil!
exclaimed
Mr. Chesterton, snappishly, after waiting
some moments for a remark from Bradshaw.
O! no, Mr. Chesterton, said Bradshaw,
blandly: you remember you have not
disinherited
your nephewyou are not dead, sir. You
mean to make your nephew your heirand I hope
you may live long. I have no doubt you will
outlive
every shadow of suspicion of the regard of
your nephew. A man of wealth, sir, is too apt to
be courted for his wealth; and it is proper and
rational that he should endeavour to find out who
are his real friendswho have a true affection for
him. You have found out your nephew, and you
have found out Dodridge.
Found out Dodridge! exclaimed the old
gentleman, starting up with a flashing eye,
ugh! ugh!Yes, sir, I have found him out, and
he'll find me out with a vengeancethe
half-methodist
,
half-quaker, whole-hog knave. To make
me, his best friend, act so like a fool, like a poor
devilugh! ugh!Your phrase was proper, Mr.
Bradshawbut, sir, I'll fix him. The first time
I catch him on my farm, I'll make a will, and
prove it on his non-combatantugh!pious
back. I'll be witness, judge, and jurymy black
man Tom, shall be executioner. I'll inflict
thirty-nine
on him, or my name's not Chesterton
ugh!he shall give a receipt for itugh!that
it was well laid on. Let him go to law; I'll pay
the fineugh! ugh!it will be in place of the
property I meant to have left him: that'll be his
legacy, Mr. Bradshaw; and he'll have to leg it
off of my farm, in double quick time, orugh!
ugh! ugh!I'll double itugh! ugh! ugh.
Where's Willy, I wondermy nephew, Willy.
I want to see him, and I hate to see him, too.
The dog would put on mourning for me, though
I am a poor devil, and did disinherit himbut,
where is he?
I suspect he rode out to my father's, sir. If
you will ride with me'tis but a few milesI
have no doubt we will find him there.
Mr. Chesterton readily assented; for he was
very quick and impulsive in all his feelings, as
we have said. On their way to the Purchase, he
asked Bradshaw innumerable questions of his
family
,
&c., which, aware as Bradshaw was of
Willoughby's
attachment to his sister, he frankly
answered
,
19*
though without speaking of that. The
old gentleman was in raptures with his free, easy,
and courteous manners; and, before they reached
the Purchase, Bradshaw had reconciled him to
himself, which, of course, prepared him to be
pleased.
Willoughby, and Mr. Bradshaw, sen., as we
have related, left old Pete to his reflections in the
carriage-house. They entered the dwelling, and
found Emily alone. Mr. Bradshaw placed
Emily's
hand in Willoughby's, blessed them with a
fervent and holy blessing, and left the room to
find his wife. The lovers, left alone, strolled out
together,for the spring was again coming,
happy in themselves, and forgetful of all else.
My dear Emily, said Willoughby, as she
placed her arm in his, and gently and fondly
pressed it to himmy dear Emily, you have,
indeed, made me happy. Out of what seemed
the greatest misfortune of my life, has arisen the
greatest blessing. Yet it is selfish in me, love, in
my poverty, to woo youand O! how unselfish
in you to be thus won.
Selfish!why selfish? said Emily, clasping
her hands together, and thus, as it were, locking
herself to his arm while she looked up into his
face. How soon love, like theirs, when once
acknowledged, becomes confiding of its every
thought! No!I am the selfish one: for it
gives me more pleasuremore
selfish
pleasure
to show the world I love you for yourself, than
your wealth could possibly have given me.
I am, indeed, rich, in such a lovethat gentle
heart of thine, this fairy little hand are mine
mineam I not rich? Do you know, Emily,
continued he, smiling, that my self-opinion has
grown beyond all bounds, to-day. If, hereafter, it
is remarked, that my vanity grew great, when I
grew poor, it will be your faultand you know
your father tells us, and my father, love, that it is
a great sinthink what you have to answer for.
You grow a flatterer, like brother Clinton.
How much you reminded me of him, thenO!
there he is now, in a gig! Who can that
gentleman
be who has left him, and is advancing towards
us?
Willoughby and Emily were walking in a
path-way
,
that led through an orchard in sight of the
lane. Bradshaw had pointed out Willoughby to
Mr. Chesterton, and the old gentleman immediately
declared he would join him; jumping from the gig,
almost before Bradshaw had time to check the
horse, he hurried towards him.
Nephew! exclaimed Mr. Chesterton, as he
drew near the lovers; nephew! don't you know
me? It's all a dd hoaxI'm not deadugh
ughyou're my heirevery cent, every cent
ughDodridge is a knave.
In an instant, nephew and uncle were in each
other's arms.
Willy, Willyughughmy noble boy, you
must forget and forgiveI'll make amendsevery
centughevery centDodridge's an infernal
scoundrelIn mourning for your old unclehey,
boythe only one that didn't abuse meI'm
sorry
sorry;
and the old man sobbed aloud.
No matter, uncle, said Willoughby; you were
right to try me, if you thought my affection for you
was feigned. Uncle, continued Willoughby, after
a pause, in which neither spoke, you have been all
your life trying to find one who would love you for
yourself aloneYou have advised me to seek such
a one. I have succeeded, uncle: I told this lady
Miss Bradshaw, unclewhom I have long loved
I told her to-day, for the first time, of my love and
of my poverty, as I thought, and she told me she
loved me for myselfdid you not, Emily?
Miss Bradshaw would have been very much
embarrassed, not knowing how Mr. Chesterton,
who struck her, as he did every one else, as being
a very singular man, might regard her, had he not
instantly exclaimed, taking her hand at the same
time,
Happy to see you, missI've heard of you.
And so the dog was determined to be happy in
spite of me, hey,and you are content to be
happy with him, without a cent from his old uncle
ugh! ugh!
CHAPTER XI.
Mary Carlton
was still at Washington with her
father. Congress was holding one of its long sessions,
and she wrote to Emily Bradshaw, she was
desirous
to get home once more, but her father
insisted
upon her staying with him, until the
adjournment
of congress, when he would return to Oak
Park, (the name of his estate adjoining the
Purchase
,)
and spend the summer there. Home,
home, home, she wrote in her letter, I am
almost
crazy to get home. There is no place
like home, I sing the song so often, that I really
believe the folks here begin to think I know no
other. Oh! how I long to see you all. How is
Mrs. Penelope Selman? and what does she think
of matrimony? and how does her loving lord bear
the yoke connubial? How she used to worry him!
does she worry him still? and how in the name of
love, and matrimony does he bear it! And how is
our
friend Kentuck?I beg pardon, I remember
with what precision you always called him, Mr.
Wil-lough-by. What pro-di-gi-ous dignity some
ladies have on some occasions! Emily, Emily,
you're sly, very, very sly. You mention Ken
Mr. Wil-lough-by, so seldom in your letters, and
with such an indifferent kind of a style, that one
would think, who didn't know you, and who didn't
know our sex, that he was the most casual
acquaintance
in the world. Do you remember that Miss
Edith Bellenden, in Old Mortality, in writing to
her uncle, the major, speaks of trumpery novels,
and such gear in her letter, and only has a word
or two in the postscript, for the danger of her lover
Morton? Now you are a heroine, very much like Miss
Edith Bellenden, I take it, Miss Emily Bradshaw.
I've heard it all from Penelope: she wrote me a long
letter the very moment she heard iton the
afternoon
of the day when KenMr. Wil-lough-by's
uncle, what a strange man, went to the Purchase
with Clintondoes Mr. Clinton ride ghosts about?
Is the uncle a vampire?And so you accepted
the poor disinherited knight, when he hadn't a
cent? how provoking, that you will have to be the
richest bride in the country. You were so much
in the pouts, when you heard it was all a sham,
that you could not write to me, I suppose; you'll
now play Miss Lydia Languish, of course, and lead
your lover a life of it. Or will you just be married
in a plain kind of a way, and no more of it?
Penelope
is deeply interested for you. She tells me, Mr.
Wil-lough-by is the most devoted lover extant.
Well, I once thought that your devotion to your
pilgrim-name, was so great you would never change
it. But then there is so much chivalry and
constancy
in a Kentuckianand such a Kentuckian!
How did he make his declaration, Emily? He told
you, with a most funereal face, he was not worth
one cent, and you loved him for himself alone?
Where did you own the soft impeachment?in
the country, I hope, for the sake of all true
loviers. Apropos; a gentleman had thewhat
shall I call ityou now are a judge and can
decide
?
had the  to tell me the other day,
making a quotation from Halleck to express
himself
,
that, think of his impudence, Emily, for ain't
it impudence? that a declaration, when a girl truly
loved the declarer, sounded to her,
Welcome as the cry,
That told the Indian Isles were night,
To the worldseeking Genoese
When the land breeze from woods of palm,
And orange groves, and fields of balm,
Blew o'er the Haytian seas.
`World-seeking!' well, we seek a world, when
we seek true love; for the `world of the heart' is
all the world to us. What, though we find that
worldtoo often, like the Genoese, we meet with
cold neglect.I declare now, isn't that an envious
reflection, considering under what circumstances I
write to you? Pray, has such a world been
discovered
yet? are you upon the voyage, and do you
mean to be the discoverer? That is, are you
sanguine
as to that point? Envy again.
Congratulate me! I have an old beau here.
Understand; not one who has been paying his
distresses
to me for a long time, and is, therefore, an
old beau, but one who has seen the olden time, a
man of eld, as ancient, to be as limited in the
computation
of his years as truth will possibly admit,
as ancient as my father, and looking, at least,
twenty
years older. Fancy me cocking up my chin,
while I write the name of the Honourable James
Wortley, Secretary of the ! He has a very
large fortune!! he lives here in great style!!! he
is an aspirant to the presidency!!!! My father
and the Honourable Secretary are as thick as two
lovers. My father eulogizes the Secretary in a
good set speech three times a-day; namely, at
breakfast, dinner, and supper; and between whiles,
he drags him into his discourse so often that I
suspect
the discourse is frequently made for the sake
of the parenthesis, as Miss Edith Bellenden's letter
was written that she might append to it a postscript.
Let me inform you, nevertheless, that though he is
ancient of days, he is an agreeable and intellectual
man; but you know his reputation. You have only
heard of his talentshis great political knowledge,
&c., &c. You ought to see himself. Could you
ever abide your courtly cold man, except at a
birth-night
ball? You ought to see him, as I sayyes,
you must see him: I shall bring him in my train,
ahem! to Oak Park, that you may. I shall have
him dye his hair first of a raven blackit is now of
a blue-blackhis last dye not being goodwith,
here and there, a grayish streak, like the silk that
I wore the last time you saw me, and got stained
hold himself very erecthe always is erect, when
he thinks of the weight of years he carriesand
of this your blooming presence will remind him
get his coat judiciously padded, a new set of teeth,
and, after this preparation, now, that I know
you have been won, you shall see him. He shall
put on his fascinations, but not
all
of them; for I
would not throw Mr. Willoughby in the shade
completely. You shall see what I have done at
Washington:and, if you had not thrown yourself
away on a wild Kentuckian, I meant, on my
return
,
to have taught you and two or three other
girls, good and true, of our set, my trick of winning
hearts; and, like Captain Bobadil, (I have been to
the theatre so often, that you see all my thoughts
find resemblances there.Oh! for the green fields
once more,) with his select company, we would
kill off any number of men, `by computation.'`By
computation!' Ay, when you see my beau putting
his best foot foremostit will be his left, for he has
lately had a twinge of the gout in the right, which
has swollen it considerably, and made him limp on
that sideit will be impossible for you to tell how
many years he computesas impossible as it is to
compute the number of worldly advantages which
my dear papa thinks will result fromno, I won't
say the word. It takes two to make a bargain, it
is said, and, therefore, papa and the Honourable
Secretary, being two, think they have made a
bargain
on certain persons being one, butwould you
believe it?it takes three to make the bargain I
speak of. Wait till we meetI'll keep you awake
a whole night listening.
Do, my dear Emily, in consideration of my
father's health and mine, and of the
young
gentleman's
who will attend ussome day when you are
walking with Mr. Wil-lough-byhe caring not
whither, so
you
walk with himdo wend your way
to Oak Park, and seeoh, what a climax!that
the rooms are well aired. Do, now,there's a
Vol. II. 20
good girland for your reward, be gentle love
about your pillow. May hethe
boy
love, I mean,
why was he not a girl?or, to please prudes, why
not it?may he seek your lattice with the dew of
fairest flowers upon his wing, and leave it on your
lip to be
stolen
, when you are willing. Don't you
think I want an `ounce'no, a pound `of civet, to
sweeten my imagination.' Don't let Priscilla Perry
see this letter for the world. Don't read this part
to Penelope, for she will, in her mischief, repeat it
to Priscilla, and I shall depart from her good
graces for ever, but not before that `good
apothecary'
has dosed me to death with lectures on
propriety.
This moment, John came in, and gave me your
letter. My dear, dear Emily, you deserve to be
happy, and indeed you will be. The most
romance-loving
lady in the land would be satisfied with your
fate.
`O, young Lochinvar is come out of the west!'
Kentuck is a noble fellow. Do you know you
will be envied by every girl in the countryexcept
one? It is so romantic, I laid down my pen, and
cried and laughed for an hour. I shall soon be
home, but I see how it is, we shall roam no more
together over the Purchase. Three's bad
company
.
Well, ma'am, do you mean to live in Kentuck?
I mean the state. No! no! Emily, that must not
be; it must be stipulated in the bond that you do
not leave us. Mr. Willoughby has no relative but
his uncle, and he must be content to remain. Wait
till I get home. We girls must make the old
gentleman
as pleased as Punch with himself, and with
us, and keep him. If he says he wont stay, and
expects to take you with him, I will invite him out
to take a walk with me, inveigle him by the bank
of the deepest part of the branch, and give him a
sly push in, and so end the matter; for you must
not, must not leave us. But I know your father
and mother could not part with youoh, how I
have been worrying myself, for fear you would
leave us.
Tell Clinton, that his canal speech has been
republished here very handsomely, in pamphlet
form, and that it sells like a novel, that Mr. Clay
quoted from it yesterday with high compliments,
that grave senators explore it with curious eyes
that fair ladies repeat the beautiful extractsand
last, though not least, that no less a personage
than your humble servant, whenever she hears
him puffed, takes unto herself the honour of
boasting
of his acquaintance, and becomes garrulous of
the accomplishments, address, colloquial talents,
oratorical powers, flashing eye, and brave bearing
of Clinton Bradshaw, Esquire; for all which
personal
praise, be it known to him, through you, he
is indebted to my imaginationwhich don't choose
to stop at trifles, when it gets a goingas he may
see in the above sentence.
Give my love to your kind dear father and
mother; tell them I am happiest at the Purchase.
I am tired of the dissipation and heartlessness
around me. Remember me to every living thing
on the Purchaseto old Pete, and aunt Sally, and
all the race of Pete's young and old. I'll tell you
of a weakness of mine, last nightfor weakness it
would be called here, and whenever I want to
make myself an object of ridicule in this
community
,
I'll tell it. You know how often we have knelt
at your dear mother's knee, and said, `Our Father
who art in Heaven,' after her, and how often since
we have said it together? Last night, I was at a
brilliant party. I had, just before going, heard
pleasing things of youof home; there they were
repeated. I felt a strange giddy excitement.
Arrived
at our rooms, when the party was over, I
threw myself on my pillow, while facts and
fancies
whirled through my brain wildly. I fell, at
last, asleep, and awoke in the night, after an
unhappy
dreamit struck me I had not said `Our
Father'it was the first time I had neglected it
since we knelt at your mother's knee. It made
me feel so wretched that it was hours before I
sobbed myself to sleep. I am feverish and unwell
to-day; but it is the dissipation of this place, which,
thank heaven, will soon be over. I have scribbled
all this just to relieve myself.
God bless you, my dear, dear Emily.
M. C.
P. S. You are right. You always told me you
preferred Mr. Willoughby's society to any other
gentleman'syou never said you loved himand
I don't know that any girl should confess it even
to herself
if she could help it
, Emily, until my
gentleman has plumply and in good set terms made
his declarationbut alas! love, like murder, will
out.
M. C.
Mr. Chesterton (Willoughby's uncle,) had
become
a guest at the Purchase. He talked
sometimes
of returning to Kentucky to look after his
estate; but the fear of the ridicule that would
attach
to him, when the circumstances attending his
pretended death and endowment of an hospital
were known(the friend who had written the
letter announcing his death to Willoughby, was
held to secrecy, but Chesterton feared the report
would travel to the west)kept him no unwilling
guest at the Purchase. Emily's gentleness and
beauty won his regard, and the characters of Mr.
and Mrs. Bradshaw impressed him with a great
respect for them. Clinton, he said, would make
a marvel of a man if he wasn't such a dd
democrat
.
The old gentleman prided himself upon
his aristocratic opinions. To his nephew, Mr.
Chesterton was abundantly kind, it was evident he
was making every reparation in his power for his
mistrust of him. Sometimes, when he thought of
Dodridge, he was restiff to put his threat into
execution; but, upon the main, he was more
contented
than he had been for years. He bustled
into town to hear the news, and by the time he
had chatted with Bradshaw and half quarrelled
with his Jeffersonianism, and strolled around, his
cough would come on, he would say, and then
he would be off, in a hurry, for the Purchase, that
he might get where there was quietness and
recruit
.
He averred himself descended from an
expatriated
cavalier, who left England in the troubles
of Cromwell's time, and settled in Virginia, and
thence, he said, his ancestors emigrated to
Kentucky
.
He said he never liked the Puritans till he
saw Emily Bradshaw, and now he considered it
providential that he had crossed the mountains, and
20*
his nephew was to make such a matchfor it was
good with men and horsesugh! ugh!to cross
the breed; and he was a great judge of horse-flesh.
Clinton Bradshaw knew how to humour him, to a
fraction, and to draw him out. At first, Mr.
Bradshaw
had as strong a repugnance to Mr.
Chesterton
as one of his chastened feelings and Christian
charity could entertain against any one; but it gave
place, when he came to know him better, to other
emotions. Notwithstanding Mr. Chesterton would
occasionally express some heathenish opinion, or let
slip an oath, he daily more and more suppressed
the one, and coughed lustily when he found himself
on the eve of uttering the other; and, in a short
time, there grew to be a real liking between them.
Mr. Bradshaw saw his daughter's affections were
deeply engaged by Willoughby, and that the
Kentuckian
loved her with the full fervour of a manly
heart; and he was extremely solicitous that all
should harmonize. He could not bear the thought
of separating from his daughter. Mrs. Bradshaw
told the uncle that it must not beshe could not
part with Emily. Willoughby, in compliance with
Emily's wishes, and in obedience to his own, said
he meant permanently to locate himself with
Emily's
relatives; and it was agreed that, after they
were married, if Mr. Chesterton wished, they would
make a visit west with him. Mr. Chesterton, at
first, expressed himself very desirous that his
nephew
,
when married, should live in the west; but,
having no relatives there, he daily became more
and more weaned from it, and wedded to his new
friends. He would frequently aver, among the
neighbours, with whom he soon became very
familiar
and talkative, that he liked the old Puritan,
as he called Mr. Bradshaw, much; and that, if he
were put upon his oath, he would say Mr.
Bradshaw
was the most honest man he had ever met
with. A good man, he pronounced him, but a
dd Puritan. We agree now like two
pick-pockets
;
but if he and I had lived in old Noll's time, and
had met, we'd have fought with a vengeance. In
the evenings, at the Purchase, while the lovers
would stroll away, or sit apart, Mr. Bradshaw and
son, and Mr. Chesterton, would hold long
conversations
on things in general, as the latter gentleman
expressed it, and on methodism, farming, John
Wesley, Puritanism, the settlement of New
England
and Virginia, and the revolutionary war, with
a host of other matters, in particular. Mr.
Chesterton
had read and travelled much; he had a
shrewd perception of character, where his passions
were not concerned, and he delighted to expatiate
upon it. Nothing pleased Clinton more than to
get him upon that topic, for he would show off all
his own eccentricities in describing those of others;
while he thanked God, with the sincerest belief,
that he had notugh! ugh!an oddity,
whim-wham
,
peculiarity, or eccentricity, in the world.
This having a ridiculous point, he would say,
about one is no joke, gentlemenno joke
understand
meto yourselves, though others may find
great fun in it.
Emily, leaning on Willoughby's arm, often took
the path-way to the park, to superintend the
household
arrangements for her friend. The Kentuckian
was always by her side. Thus, weeks passed
away. In the mean time, the following paragraph,
from the pen of a Washington correspondent, who
was esteemed accurate, went the rounds:
Among the things that are to be, rumour says
the Hon. Samuel Carlton will be elected to fill the
vacancy in the Senate, occasioned by the
resignation
of  , who has been appointed a judge.
Mr. Carlton, however, will have a powerful
competitor
in General Murray, whose revolutionary
services
were arduous and self-sacrificing. It is said
that Mr. Wortley, who is from Mr. Carlton's state,
will throw his influence in the scale of Carlton;
and the honourable secretary, from appearances
and report, has good and sufficient reason therefor.
Mr. Carlton's daughter, who has been the reigning
belle here all this winter, and who deserves all the
praise her beauty and accomplishments have won
her, is to bestow her handso rumour says, and
appearances justify iton the honourable
secretary
.
This match, though equal in other respects, is
not in yearsthe secretary, however, does his best
to prevent and repair the dilapidations of time. At
all hours, he may be seen beside the blooming
beauty
,
whose sprightly vivacity and wit seem to
impart
new life to him. He seems no longer deeply
immersed in politics.
Clinton Bradshaw, carelessly, in the court-house,
picked up the newspaper; and glancing his eye
over it, fell on the above paragraph. He betrayed
an emotion, which, he had schooled himself to
believe
,
required sterner things to start. He had
scarcely calmed the disquiet of his brow, when
Cavendish (the court had not been called yet, and
the members of the bar were lounging around their
desks,) went up to him, where he was seated, with
a number of young men near, and asked
Bradshaw, have you heard the news from
Washington?
The `from Washington,' put Bradshaw on his
guard, but
The stream that seems to thee so still,
Hath such a tide below!
In an indifferent tone he asked, what news?
Why, that Mary Carlton is to marry Mr.
Wortley.
Heard it! to be sure I havelisten; and
Bradshaw read the paragraph from the letter.
While he read, the young men gathered around
him. He betrayed no emotion in reading, and
when he finished, observed
There, gentlemen, our richest heiress, and
loveliest
lady's goneand my old schoolmate, too, whom
I have beaued so often, and talked so much
romance
to.
Bradshaw, confound it, said Cavendish,
provoked
at his manner, I thought you were in love
with her.
We were schoolmates, you know, Judge, and
but I don't tell tales out of schoolparticularly on
myself. Miss Carlton has fascinations that would
make a lover of a stoic, but
`What care I how kind she be,
If she be not kind to me?'
Bradshaw, I shall suspect you of puppyism, if
you speak in this indifferent tone of a lady whom
you have known so long; and
Why, Judgethese gentlemen, judge us, judge
the fair lady has made as great a hole in your
heart as in mine. Here's an admirable critique on
Booth, in Richard, the night before last: I become
stage-struck whenever I see him.
Bradshaw, said Cavendish, without heeding
his last remark, it must be true; Talbot is just
from Washington, and he swears to it. It is
preposterous
to think she would marry that old man
it's January and May.
Well, Judge, though it is preposterous, May
wedded January, you know; the blooming rose
was encircled by the snow. What a cold embrace!
The snow did its best to melt; the widow's mite
is as acceptable in the eye of charity as the rich
man's gold; and why may not the withered heart
be as acceptable in the court of love as one as full
of blood, and buoyant passions, even as your
honour's
.
Thus will wounded pride jest with what
is dearest to it. When did Mr. Talbot arrive?
asked Bradshaw.
Last night: he has been nearly all winter at
Washington.
Ay! has he been a worshipper?knelt he at
the shrine?
I suspect he did. Here's Talbot, now, said
Cavendish.
Since the affair between Bradshaw and Talbot
in the court-house Restaurateur, they had been on
speaking terms, and Talbot had made advances to
sociability, which Bradshaw received without
reciprocating
,
but with the easy unembarrassed
manner
which characterized him.
Talbot advanced to the circle, and was greeted
by his acquaintances. He offered his hand to
Bradshaw, which he took, and asked
What news from the capitol, Mr. Talbot?you
bring sad tidings to the Judge and me. We have
been rivals for many years for Miss Carlton's smile;
and, from what we hear, we have agreed to
pronounce
the grapes sour.
Talbot had joined the group when he saw
Bradshaw
with the intention of telling the news, and
enjoying his dismay. He was, therefore,
astonished
,
suspecting, as he did, Bradshaw's feelings, at
his tone of easy raillery.
My tidings are from the newspapers, sir, said
Talbot.
Ay, coming fresh from Washington, we feared
you had some more authentic source of
information
Judge,
there's hopes for us yetthese lying
letter writers will say any thing. Have you any
idea, Mr. Talbot, who wrote the letter?
MeInot I, sir.
Understand me, sir, said Bradshaw, archly
I do not say that you wrote the letterthough
your friends here have given you credit for many
of the letters that have appeared in this journal
they have been very accurate and very acute
the letters, I mean.
With a heart ill at ease, Bradshaw left the
court-house
.
Can it be, thought he, thatno'tis
false. But then to have her name coupled with
Wortley's in that mannerthe tone of the letter
insinuates her willingnessyes, by heaven, Talbot
wrote that letter. In her letter to Emily she laughs
at Wortleybut a womanwho can read a
woman
!It
cannot beshe has a hold on my very
heart-strings. What a gentle passion love is, when
undisturbed!but mistrust plants daggers in the
heart. He who loves with his whole soul, and acts
nobly, amidst rivalry, suspicions, and morbid
misgivings
,
has a god-like spirit. Wortley and
Carlton
have some political scheme between themI
have no doubt. Carlton wants to be senator, and
Wortley aspires,heaven save the mark!to the
presidency, and to the daughterI'm told he's
subtle as a serpent. Her father has suspicions of
our attachment. If I am re-elected to the
legislature
,
for whom go I for senator? there's the rub
Mary will soon be home.
CHAPTER XII.
When
Congress adjourned, Miss Carlton, in the
charge of a friend, left the capitol, for her native city,
while her father passed with Mr. Wortley, into the
interior of the state, where that gentleman lived
before he was appointed Secretary of the .
These gentlemen were on an electioneering tour.
It was their intention, after travelling through the
state, to spend the remainder of the summer at
Oak Park, where Mr. Wortley was to be the guest
of Mr. Carlton. Mr. Carlton had set his heart, or
rather, his head, on making a match between his
daughter and Mr. Wortley; and that gentleman,
full of politics and the tender passion, was travelling
with his father-in-law, that was to be, as his
sanguine
hopes flattered him, with the double purpose
of recruiting his good looks for the court of love,
and his party for the election day.
'Twas a beautiful spring afternoon, and the
inmates
of the Purchase were partaking of its
enjoyment
.
Mr. Bradshaw, Mr. Chesterton, and Clinton,
were sitting before the door in conversation; and
within sight, straying through the orchard, were
Willoughby and Emily Bradshaw. Young Pete
had just passed the door, on his way to bring up
the cows, whistling as he went to the dog, that like
Vol. II. 21
a well-fed animal of more pretensions, had been
napping away the hours after dinner. Jowler, at
Pete's call, started up, looked round, stretched his
legs fore and aft until his back formed a hollow,
gave himself a shake, looked after Pete for a
moment
,
and then turned his tail on him, and entered
his house, in a manner that said as plainly as any
dog's manner could say, Pete, I can't go with
you, this evening. Jowler had scarcely entered
his house, when he jumped out, barking quickly:
at the same instant young Pete called out, Oh,
Massa Clinton! there come Miss  Yes, it's she
looking out of the windy.
Miss who? called out Clinton. Is it Mary?
Miss Carlton,and he sprang towards the gate.
Yes, it's Miss Mary, by goley
Peterare you swearing? asked Mr.
Bradshaw
,
sternly.
Pete slunk behind the carriage, which now drove
up; and Mary Carlton was greeted by her old
friends with a heart-felt welcome.
O! said she, throwing herself into Mrs.
Bradshaw's
arms, my more than motherthis, indeed,
seems like home to me.
Ugh! ugh! coughed Mr. Chestertonas Jack
Dryden says:
`Old as I am,ugh! ugh!for ladies' love unfit,
The power of beauty I remember yet.'
Ugh! ugh!why don't you introduce me to the
lady?
I ought to know you, Mr. Chesterton, said
Mary, making a courtesy to him, and offering her
hand, with a laughing eyefor she knew him from
Emily's description. I ought to know you, for I
have heard
Of my character, hey? Who has been writing
my character to you? asked he, darting a quick
glance around.
Emily, said Mary, laughing.
Ugh! ugh!then I know she gave me a good
character, said he, with a pleased smile,didn't
she?
Why, I can't say exactly, good: she
represents
you a gay Lothario
Mary! Mary! exclaimed Emily.
As a gay Lothario, continued Mary, without
heeding the interruption, who had been making
many a wild foray against the hearts of the girls
in our neighbourhood. She tells me Mr.
Willoughby
has learned to practise your winning ways
exactly
.
Ha! ha!ugh!I understand you: you're an
arch one. I shall like her, (said he, aside to
Bradshaw
.)
I understand you; and have you no
intentions
at a foray yourself? You've been taking, by
force ofugh! ugh!arms, the hearts of the
Solomons
of the nation, at Washington; and now you
have come here, as Burns says of one of his lasses,
`Like Alexander, to spreadugh!your conquests
farther'hey?
I see that your sagacity, said Mary,
penetrates
my intentions, at onceso, away with all
stratagem: therefore, I warn you, sir, to beware of
your heart. I'll take it if I can; and I'll wear it,
if I do, on my sleeve, or at my apron-string.
You will, hey? and you'll give me a fair chance
at yours?
Certainly. But, Mr. Chesterton, you must fight
fair; you have the advantage of me, as you are
such an old campaigner.
Ha! ha!you've hit meugh!old
campaigner
!
Yes, I'm in the hospital of the invalids:
I shall do battle no more.
I take you, said Mary, archly: that's your
artyou Kentuckians are used to bush-fighting;
you know how to play 'possum, Mr. Chesterton.
Hit me again! exclaimed Mr. Chesterton; and
then he observed, aside, to Bradshawplaying
'possum!ugh!do you understand?alluding to
my will, my hoax, my poor devil business. I like
her, thoughI like her. She'll keep life in me,
boy: she has the beauty of a Houri, and the wit
and grace of a Cleopatra. Why theugh! ugh!
devil don't youugh!court her?
Beautifully the moon rose o'er the Purchase that
night. The tree tops were tipped with the mellow
light that lived along the landscape, glittering in
the ripples of the Branch, like the dimple in the
cheek of laughing childhood. The breath of the
early spring flower scented the air. It was a night
for the full flow of the affections, and, above all,
for love.
Let us ramble, exclaimed Bradshaw, to Mary
Carlton. She took his arm; and, followed by
Willoughby
and Emily Bradshaw, they walked forth,
under the glorious moon-lit sky.
Whitherugh!away, my fair foe? asked
Mr. Chesterton, who was conversing at the door
with Mr. Bradshaw, whither away?have you
made Clinton a prisoner to your power?
No, sir, only an ally. You are too much for me
without assistance, so
Ay, I understand it; you mean to take him into
copartnership, as a-
sleep
Suspecting what was coming, Mary blushingly
hurried Clinton on, observing: It's a beautiful
night.
Beautiful; shall we wander by the Branch,
Mary?
Yes, to the old sycamore; it seems an age since
I have seen it.
Occupied with their own hearts, and with each
other, Willoughby and Emily followed them, though
at a considerable distance. As the pair of lovers
took the winding path through the orchard, and
then along the Branch to the old sycamore, they
seemed, indeed, the proper living beings of such a
scene. Leaning on Willoughby's arm, Emily looked
up into his face with an absorbed and full
affection
;
while he, clasped her hand, that trembled
like a prisoned bird, and gazed upon her like a star
upon the wave that reflects deep within its depths
the living lightand thus they walked in silence.
The very happiest hour of love is such a silent
one. Mary Carlton leaned on Bradshaw's arm;
and, as she stepped along, would, for a moment,
bow her head, flower like, and watch, apparently,
her little fairy feet, or turn to her companion, as if
she sought a repetition of what he said; yet she
heard him distinctlyor she would turn her head
away and smile archly, or look up at the full-orbed
moon, or on the landscapeand, thus walking, they
discoursed.
21*
Were you anxious to return, Mary? asked
Bradshaw.
Indeed I was, Clinton: what is more
wearysome
than your fashionable society, where you feel
little or no interest in any one; and they feel not
the least in you. If there is any thing worse than
your mere fashion, it is the mixed set of
place-men-patriots
,
(I'm qualified to use such words, I've heard
nothing else,) office-hunters and holders, and the
varieties of north, south, east, and west, that you
meet in Washington; I
I see, interrupted Bradshaw, that the
letter
writers have been trying to do justice to your
merits, as a belle, Mary; and that Mr. Wortley
has acknowledged your power, which, according
to the letter writer aforesaid, you mean to
exercise
in mercy.
What letter writer?What did he say?
You did not see it, then; and Bradshaw
repeated
the extract we have given.
Who could have written that? asked Mary,
in a mortified and angry tone.
I hope, Mary, there was no ground for it.
Ground for it!Clinton! Clinton! I thought
you knew me better.
And so I do, Mary; but it provoked me to
see your name coupled with any one's in that
way. Tell me, was Talbot very attentive to you
at Washington?
Mary spoke not.
Will you not give me your confidence?
Yes, I will. But, asked she, laughing,
when did your authority commence, Mr.
Clinton
Bradshaw?
When, dearest Mary,
may
it commence?
That depends upon your conduct, sir. But,
why do you ask me such a question of Mr.
Talbot
?
I have a particular reason?
Am I not to have your confidence, too?
I suspect Talbot wrote the letter.
It was base in him if he did! exclaimed
Mary. For, at Washington, he renewed a suit
which he made some time ago. Heaven knows,
I never gave him any encouragement; and, that
he might no more importune me, II told him
the state of my feelings. He affected surprise,
and said, that he thought Mr. Wortley was his
favoured rival. I, with indignation, taxed him
home at once, and asked him if he had ever seen
any thing in my manners to Mr. Wortley to
justify
such an opinion. After hemming and
hawing
,
he confessed he had not; but, he said, it was
evident what my father's wishes were with
regard
to Mr. Wortley. The new light that burst
in upon me, when he spoke of my father, set me
to thinking of Mr. Wortley's intentions, and of
father's; and, with a provoked sense of the
ridiculous
more
than half mad with myself, and yet
I did not know why I should beI sat down and
wrote that long rigmarole to Emily. My father
spoke to me afterwards; said I treated Mr.
Wortley
coolly, and that he had invited him to spend
the summer at the Park. I had made up my
mind to speak plainly to him, and was on the eve
of doing so, when, at the moment, some one
called. This was just before I left Washington.
My father never spoke to me on the subject
again, and I had no opportunity of speaking to
him; and, somehow or othernever having been
much with him, and when I am, conversing little
with him, even on common-place matters, never
having given him my confidence, for he never
sought itI shrank from making an opportunity.
I wish, indeed, now, that I had. But, assuming
a livelier tone, she saidthere, Mr.
Inquisitor-General
Bradshaw, you have had my whole
history
.Do
you wish to cross-question?
Bradshaw caught her hand to press it to his
lipsshe snatched it away, and said
You're a pretty fellow, Mr. Clinton
Bradshaw
,
to pretend to such deep interest in your
humble servant. You hold this interest in most
of the sex, don't you? That gay, young, rich
widow, Mrs. Douglas who knew you at the
legislature
,
and afterwards visited Washington,
made you quite the theme of her conversation.
She more than once insinuated, in public, and
would inform any one, in private, plainly, that
the speaker of the eloquent canal speech, made
more eloquent speeches even than that, and when,
too, he had the inspiration of one listener, only;
but, she would add, with a blush, and a smile, and
a sigh, his eloquence does not always prevail.
Ah! you became acquainted with the fair
widow
,
did you? She attended the debates
regularly
,
and has a claim, I believe, to the attentions
of every
young
member, particularly on his first
it open, and tumbled into the room. Within ten
feet of him, near the tar barrel, stood old Scratch,
with the light in his hand. Bradshaw rushed past
him, and descended the steps, into the grocery.
There were several persons around the stove, who
evidently had been startled by the report of the
pistol. Bradshaw looked round to see if there was
any back way, through which he could pass out;
for he reflected, without his false whiskers and hat,
he might be known to some of them, as the one
who had hurt Adams. He saw no way of passing
out, but by the front door. As he rapidly advanced
to do so, the fellow who had been conversing at the
stove with Kentuck, askedWhere's the other
fellow? Who fired the pistol? Where's your
whiskers and hat, my lark?
Keep dark, said Bradshaw; I left them up
stairs. There's watchmen hid away, about here,
I believe.
The devil! What will Adams do? Don't you
smell something burning?
At this moment, old Scratch called out from
aboveKnock him downkill him! He's a spy.
The fellows immediately placed themselves in a
threatening attitude: one brandished a formidable
club, and others drew their knives. They stood
directly between Bradshaw and the door, calling
out
Traitor, spywe know you. Say your
prayers
!
Make way, my brave boys, said Bradshaw,
nothing intimidated, drawing and cocking a pistol,
as he spoke. Make a clear passage. Put up
your knives and clubs. The first man who
attempts
to use one, I'll shoot dead.
Don't fear him, exclaimed the fellow who
had previously spoken: his pistol's not loaded.
Didn't you hear it go off, up stairs?
Why don't old Scratch come down, said
another
fellow, intimidated by Bradshaw's manner,
and help us, if he wants him caught?
See, boys! said Bradshaw, producing another
pistol, and holding one in each hand,two pistols
have not been fired: one must be loaded. Your
blood be upon your own head! The first one that
attempts to stop me is a gone case.
So speaking, he passed deliberately by them,
while old Scratch came running down stairs,
crying
out, Stop him! They followed, but at a
respectful
distance, after Bradshaw, determined to
dog him. He crossed over to the old building in
which were the watch. He thought it best not to
call them, as the fellows might then scamper off;
and he wished them to be taken. They followed
after him, giving, at intervals, a low whistle, which
was answered from the upper part of the lane,
where footsteps were heard advancing. All at
once, the cry of Fire! Fire!! from a hundred
tongues, burst forth in that fearful tone, that tells
it is near: at the same moment, a blaze of light
revealed
,
to Bradshaw, the forms and faces of the
watchmen, among whom he stood.
We've found him, said Bradshaw. He's at
old Scratch's.
He turned and beheld the old villain's house on
Yes, Miss Mary, I know that; but young Mr.
Bradshaw come here to-day; I told him all was
out; but he come in, thew right open the windy,
and lay right down on the sofa there, and kept
looking at your picture, (there was a picture of
Mary opposite the sofa, by Jarvis,) and I forgot to
shut it after he went away!
What did he say, Sue?
Nothing, miss, only he asked when you'd come
homeif missus had a letter from you when
Where did he go?
He rid away on horseback.
Did hedidhesay any thing about me,
Sue?
No, Miss; he just lay down on the sofa, looked
at the picture, and asked me for a glass of water.
I brung itand then he forgot that I told him that
missus had no letter from youfor he asked again
and then he went away. He gave me a half a
dollar, and told me, when you come, I must come
my own self round to his office and tell him.Why
were you going, Miss Mary?
You say aunt won't be inif ClinI'm going
out to old Mr. Bradshaw's farm, Sue; to the
Purchase
.
When a man truly loves, no matter how cold
or worldly, or ambitious his nature, he is often
betrayed
by his passion into a boyish confession of
her
power in his every tone and look, which, though he
knows well of, and tries to control, he cannot; which
gives his manner a kind of silent shyness.
Bradshaw
was as unsusceptible of this sensation we
speak of as any other man, but as Mary Carlton
stood before him, so graceful, so beautiful, so
accomplished
,having
caught from the world all the
adornment and elegance it could bestow, without
altering, in the least, the naturalness of her
character
,
or the gentleness and goodness of her heart,
realizing all in her that his heart had panted for,
in its young dream of love,he felt, in the still
moonlight, in this scene of his boyhood, with her
by his side, a woman, who had roamed by his side
a girl, and whom he had loved then, as now, from
whom he had been longer parted than he ever had
been beforehe felt
What he could ne'er express, yet could not all conceal
an overpowering sense of her loveliness and of his
love.
My beautiful, my own Mary! he exclaimed;
I knew not how much I loved you, till you were
away.Raphael's canvass never gave back more
truly a lovely form than did my heart yours:it
lived, breathed, burned there. Ambition,
worldliness
,
the strife of the thick crowd forsake me, in
your presence, to-night. I feel now how Mark
Antony lost the world for loveand yet he should
not have lost it
she
should have been to him, in
the stormy strife for empire, a light to guide, a star
of blessed destiny. When I feel the stir of
ambition
most, I feel strongest the necessity of your love.
Where can man learn such holy, such disinterested
counsel as from the lips of her who has linked her
destiny with his? In a free country like ours,
where popularity is every thing, where can he find
one who will so much advance him, as one with your
powers to please? Call this not selfishness; I say
it because in every scene of life my spirit is wrapped
up in thine.Mine is not the holiday love that, like
the bird, must seek the grove to tell its talethat
only lives where flowers bloom and fountains
sparkle
.
No, Mary, no! if I obtain power in this great
land, and men's applause, and influence, by your
gentle aid must I win and use them. And, if I fail,
as thousands have, stranded by an adverse tide, or
without powerhaving miscalculated my strength
to `ride the waves of glory'when, all
baffled
,
I am driven back to the obscurity whence I
emerged, to the Pilgrim's Purchasewill you not
make the pilgrimage with me? Shall I not
pillow
upon a heart whose every throb will still be
mine? Your voice will have no reproach for me;
its every tone will be a lullaby of rest.Yes, I
would leave the strife of the world, as my pilgrim
fathers left their father-land, and find in thee, my
own Mary, a world of love beyond it all.
Bradshaw, as he spoke, held a not unwilling
hand, and pressed a lip that chid not.
I know: every body says you can be what you
please, Clinton. You do not know how many things
the great men in Washington said of youhow
many questions they asked of your characterif
you were ambitiouswhat side you took in
politics
.
Did they? said Bradshaw, while a proud
smile broke over his countenance, and his eye
became
lustrous as the bright evening-star to which
he elevated his brow, and on which, in abstraction,
for a moment, he fixed his gaze.
Vol. II. 22
Yes, Clinton, but shall I indeed be to you all
you have said? Am I indeed so necessary to your
happiness?
My Mary, the praise which you have uttered
from any other lips could not move me. Then you
are unchanged, and you did think of me in the gay
world!bless you!
Beneath the aged sycamore the lovers plighted
anew their faith, the moon had been shining on
them much longer than they imagined, ere they
arose to return to the house. Just as they entered
the little gate to the palings that surrounded the
dwelling, they overtook Willoughby and Emily,
who, like themselves, were just returning: at this
moment, the cheerful voice of our early
acquaintance
,
Miss Penelope Perry, now Mrs. Selman,
greeted
them.
Oh, you romantic creatures!here have I been
these two hours, like Miss Patience on the
monument
,
cold in the cold moonlight, waiting to see
you; and you have been wandering, like a
Jack-o'-lantern
,
down by the Branch. Only see what
all this love ends in!the person puffing that cigar,
and sitting opposite to me, not beside me, is Mr.
Henry Selman, who once
Penelope, my dear, said Selman, in a low
half-provoked, half coaxing tone, don't, now,
trifle so.
Who once, continued his lady, laughing, but
without heeding the interruption, gave unto your
humble servant, ladies, a devotion which would
shame the chivalry of your knightsand now
behold
him smoking the filthy weed in spite of my
remonstrances against the pollution of his breath.
I wish we two were twain again just for one
moment.
Yes, indeed, if you were Penelope,
interrupted
Mary Carlton, you would have that cigar
extinguished quicker even than was Sir Walter
Raleigh's when his servant, who had never seen
him smoke, thought he was a case of
self-combustion
,
and threw a pail of water on him. I've learnt
a lesson.
Is it possible, Mrs. Selman, asked Bradshaw,
that my friend Hal has obtained such authority
as to pronounce `no pipe, no Parr.'
Oh yes, indeed! exclaimed Mrs. Selman; it
would seem so. I happened to read an article in
some book or other, this very afternoon, while I
was waiting for my lord and master to bring me
out. It told an anecdote of Dr. Parr and a lady.
The lady refused to let the Dr. smoke in her best
room, on account of her curtains, as well as of
herselfhe remonstrated, but she was peremptory.
He called her the best tobacco stopper in England.
One of two things appears,either that I have
none of the powers of command of the lady, or Mr.
Selman has none of the qualities of Dr. Parr.
My dear, exclaimed Selman, you know very
well I told you I wouldn't smoke if you had any
objection.
There, now, Mr. Selman, why did you not tell
that before, sir;I only wished our friends to see
that I had not lost all my authorityI
Ah, my dear! exclaimed Selman, in haste to
be delivered of a punnow I
smoke
you.
Clinton, my boy, said Mr. Chesterton, who
had been in the house, reading, but who, on
hearing
the voices had come to the door, ugh
Dryden
has a fable versified from old Chaucer to the
point, patughIt kept me, my boy, from
matrimony
.
A lustyughknight, it says, did a very
naughtyughthing in king Arthur's time, for
which he was sentenced to deathugh. At the
queen's intercession, he was saved, provided he
could find out `what women mostughdesire.'
What a dl of a trouble he had to find outany
body who sees the sex now a daysughcould tell
him. At last an old hag told himughbut the
condition!she told him true, neverthelessugh.
Repeat the lines if you know them, I can't for
coughing.
If Selman has no objection, said Bradshaw,
laughingand if I remember them. Ah! you
know the hag tells him, and he tells the queen
I had more than one proof of them to-night.
My lady liege (said he)
What all your sex desire is sovereignty!
The wife affects her husband to command;
All must be hers, both money, house, and land;
The maids are mistresses, even in their name,
And of their servants full dominion claim.
This at the peril of my head, I say,
A blunt plain truth,the sex aspire to sway;
You to rule all, while we, like slaves, obey.'
Ughugha facta very truthughI
believe
it kept me from matrimony. It seems you don't
mind being governed, though, you democratic dog,
you
The only sovereign we democrats democrats, is
the lady of our choice. And you remember, Mr.
Chesterton, the hag's condition was that the knight
should grant whatever boon she should desire; and
when his life was saved, she claimed his hand. She
turned out to be a beautiful womanand, Selman,
will you excuse me? knowing your former fondness
for a quotation, I have fallen into a trick of it,
`And their first love continued to the last.'
I've no doubt you will verify it, Selman, continued
Bradshaw, bowing to Mrs. Selman.
I'm in a fair way to verify the sovereignty
quotation
,
said Selman.
Ughughyou'll all verify that, young
gentlemen
,
I can tell you.
It appears you will not be so controlled, Mr.
Chesterton! exclaimed Mary Carlton, laughing.
Not, unless you conquer, fair queenI shall
ughhold out to the last. I shall resist your
apron-strings until you have me bound fast with
them, as a slave resists the chains of servitude.
Oh, you barbarian! And when I've conquered,
and I drag you forth, like a captive Goth, amidst
the splendours of Rome, you will pout in barbaric
dignity, I suppose.
22*
CHAPTER XIII.
In
due course of time, Mr. Carlton returned to
Oak Park, with Mr. Wortley as his guest. The
worthy politicians had been gathering their forces
with all possible carerummaging in the remotest
parts of the state, like an old wife in a sly corner,
for some article she had packed away against the
day she should want it. Many an old politician,
who had been laid upon the shelf, and who deemed
himself so entirely forgotten, as to have sundry
suggestions
from his wounded vanity, on the propriety
of taking the other side, in order to remind his
former
friends of his existence, and his country of his
patriotism, in some flaming resolutions that he
contemplated
introducing in the first county meeting
that should be held, was speedily disabused of his
erroneous impressions, and forthwith made firm,
either
by a letter, visit, or completary frank of
public
documents, long enough for a year's reading.
Mr. Carlton, knowing his daughter was treated
by the Bradshaws with parental care, gave himself
no trouble on her account, during her childhood.
He felt, indeed, that the inmates of the Purchase
were better guardians for her than any he could
appoint, or than he could be himself. As she grew
up, by tacit consent, she visited her friends and
relatives
,
the Holidays, and between her father and
them, a cold courtesy was, at length, established.
His professional business, his speculations in
property
,
and in politics, left him not leisure,
sometimes
for months, to call and see his daughter. He
was satisfied to know that she was well, and with
his neighbours, whose solid, unworldly qualities he
could not but respect, while he felt that to imitate
them, was not the way to advance in the world;
and, therefore, he was content to praise them.
Full of schemes for the accumulation of wealth,
and for political advancement, years glided away,
and the flowers at the Purchase budded together
unsevered by Mr. Carlton. As Mary grew up,
her father oftener called to see her: he took great
delight in her playfulness, vivacity, and wit,
became
proud of her, but there was no communion
of the heart between them. When Mary was
told that her father would be out at such a time
to see her, she would say to Emily Bradshaw, with
an arch smile, for she possessed a natural
observation
of character, and understood what would please
her father, Now, Emily, I must put off my
puritanism
,
look my liveliest and prettiest, and put on
my most fashionable dress; for if my father thought
me the least puritanical in my notions, he would
whisk me off to boarding-school.
Mr. Carlton, therefore, knew little of his
daughter's
feelings, even in her childhood, and as she
grew older, if possible less, for she discovered how
entirely he wished her to act a worldly part, and
naturally shrunk from conversing with him, on
schemes where she felt she must thwart him. He
had her taught every accomplishment, and lavished
jewelry, dress, and wealth upon her, believing it,
judging from himself, the best way to win her
affections
,
or rather to control them to his own
bestowal
,
which he was determined to do, for his
political
advancement, as well as for her worldly
advantage
.
Of the boy, Clinton Bradshaw, he had thought
not at alland when Clinton grew towards
manhood
,
and his great talents became a topic of public
notoriety and praise, Mr. Carlton had an early
opportunity
of finding him one whom he could not
use, and who would probably one day cross his path,
unless he advanced very rapidly; for one of
Clinton's
first speeches, was at a political meeting, got
up by Mr. Carlton, for the purpose of producing a
certain effect, by the passage of a set of
resolutions
which he had brought with him, cut and dry,
for the occasion. Bradshaw took a stand against
the resolutions, and offered an amendment to them,
which, after a long debate between him and Mr.
Carlton, was carried. Mr. Carlton felt himself
under
too many obligations to the Bradshaws to show
any dislike towards Clinton; in fact, motives of
policy
were more than sufficient to restrain such an
exhibition, were his dislike even deeply rooted,
which it was not: and if Clinton had shown the
least symptom of being subservient to him, they
would have been very good friends, as the world
goes. Bradshaw supported Mr. Carlton for congress,
though latterly, he was dissatisfied with some of his
votes; and was certain to differ with him on the
presidential
candidate, if Mr. Wortley was his choice.
Mr. Wortley was a gentleman of talents, who
had held several distinguished stations, and who
was one of the thousand and one talked of
candidates
for the presidency. He was a native of the
same state with Mr. Carlton and Clinton. It was
thought his own state, as a matter of pride, would
certainly support him, and in the multiplicity of
candidates, it was believed by his friends, he
would be able to carry the vote in several other
states, as it was asserted, his popularity was fast
increasing. Therefore, there was no knowing
what would turn up, and consequently the
knowing
ones who were on the fence ready to take the
strongest side, at the first break of the sun-shine
on Mr. Wortley's prospects, turned their faces to
him, whenever they could steal the time from others.
Mr. Carlton and Mr. Wortley had long been
friends, and the former had every reason to believe
that in the success of the latter, he would hold one
of the highest and most honourable offices in his
giftan expectancy, which he could not found on
the anticipated success of any other candidate.
Mr. Wortley, also, was a man of wealth, and these
considerations were sufficient to impress the father
with the deepest conviction of the advantage of
such a match to his daughter. Occasionally, when
he heard his daughter teazed about Bradshaw,
a suspicion of her attachment would pass over his
mindbut nothing in her manner would revive it;
for, observing there was little or no cordiality
between
her lover and her father, she never spoke to
her father of him, and he never mentioned Bradshaw
to her, from two motives: First, it occurred to
him, if his daughter was pleased with Bradshaw,
it was but a girlish partiality, which would be
soon forgotten in the bustle and adulation of
fashionable
societywhen she was away from him,
and heard not his name mentioned: Secondly, he
could not in his conscience speak against
Bradshaw
:
and, if he had reconciled his conscience to
it, which he could have done upon a push,
expediency
would have told him, that as his daughter
was devotedly attached to Clinton's family, and
had every reason to be so, her generous feelings,
would be aroused in his vindication, and the very
effect might be produced, which he was
endeavouring
to avoidfor we at least never dislike those
whom we vindicate, and we often learn to love them.
Bradshaw's attachment to Mary Carlton had
grown upon him unawares; and when he
discovered
its unconquerable strength, or rather when
he discovered it was returned, he determined to
win a reputation, and the means of supporting her
in affluence; commensurate, somewhat, with her
expectancy, before he asked her hand. To this
his own pride, but more her father's manner
towards
him, moved him.
The day after the arrival of Mr. Carlton and
his guest, at Oak Park, Bradshaw rode out to
make a formal visit to him; for there was a great
show of courtesy between them, particularly on
Mr. Carlton's part. But, somehow they kept, since
the political meeting we spoke of, the ice of
ceremony
frozen to its hardest between them, which
Bradshaw seemed not unwilling to break; for his
manner was frank, unrestrained, and free, and, as
if he were not the least aware that there were any
passages in their intercourse disagreeable to Mr.
Carlton; while the manner of that gentleman to
him was that of pique, which he feared to vent,
and could not entirely conceal. In fact, Bradshaw
had the desire to be friendly with Mr. Carlton; but
he would not, by look, or smile, or tone,
compromise
the independence of his conduct; or advance
a hair's breadth more than he was met. He quickly
perceived Mr. Carlton's manner had changed
towards
him since his amendment to his resolution;
but he resolved to show him (Bradshaw was under
the impression Mr. Carlton knew he was attached
to Mary,) that while there was no change in
himself
,
he had acted, and would act, perfectly
independent
with
uninfluenced and fearless purpose,
in expressing his opinions, and in acting upon them.
As Bradshaw gave his horse to a servant, he
asked for Mr. Carlton, and was told that he, with
Mr. Wortley, had taken a walk; the servant did
not know where, but he believed to some of the
neighbours.
Electioneering, thought Bradshaw. Where's
Miss Mary? he asked.
I believe Miss Mary's in the garden, sir.
Bradshaw entered the garden, and then the
summer-house
,
and found Miss Carlton arranging a
number of books which she had brought from the
dwelling, on a table.
Mary, how blue you're getting! he exclaimed.
Ah, Clinton! is it you? Walk in, am I not
blue? yes, as blue, sir, as Mrs.
No, Mary; you are not as blue as Mrs.
Her blueness is that of skimmed milkblue from
thinness. Her stocking won't take the dye, though
she dye it ever so often. But you're like the sky
above you
`Darkly, deeply, beautifully blue.'
What, a quotation and a compliment again. I
thought you had done with such things, when
Penelope married.
No, there are some who always remind us of
poetry and praise. What book is that open there?
Moore's Life of Sheridanone of your idols.
And Moore says, sir, notwithstanding, Mr.
Sheridan
was an exception that`Nature delights to
put her costliest gems in the
frailest
vessels:' a
very foolish thing on the part of Dame Nature,
certainly; but the fact, if it be a fact, is, I suppose,
abundantly satisfactory to the vanity, and quite a
balm to the bodily condition of Mr. Clinton
Bradshaw
.
Clinton, Sheridan was a very scurvy
fellow
.
I shall detest the very mention of his name
how he neglected that lovely and devoted wife
of his!And yet I have no doubt he made as
many soft speeches as some I know of, when he
wooed her. There was a strange coldness in her
tone, which Bradshaw did not understand.
Doubtless, lady; for he knew how to make
speeches. What a time he had of it to win her!
Yes, and with what treachery he acted
towards
his most intimate friend and to his brother!
Will not a lady forgive the treachery which is
practised for love of her? He may tell her, with
the poet, that `treachery was truth to thee.'
If she does, she is sure to be punished for it, as
Mrs. Sheridan was punished`Treachery truth
to thee,' that's fiction, Clintonfalse foul fiction
Mrs. Sheridan found it out to her sorrow,
indeed
.
Mary, what's the matter? Why, such a tone?
Why, Mr. Talbotno matter.
Mr. Talbotno matter;but it is matter,
Mary; and matter of the deepest importance to
me, if it gives sorrow to you.
I meant to play the hypocrite and be `
treacherous'
when I met you, but,Clinton, Clinton, is
it true; can it be true, that you made a jest of me
publickly in the court-house, and said I was to
marry Mr. Wortley, called us January and May,
and laughed at me?
Ha! now I understand itBy heaven! Talbot
and I will meet upon that narrow pass ere long,
where one of us must leap the precipice,
muttered
Bradshaw between his clenched teeth.
Clinton, Clinton Bradshaw, remember what
the violence of your passions have donedo no
injury.
Mary, what said he? asked Bradshaw, in a
tone of assumed mildness. What did Talbot
say I said of you, Mary?
That tone of calmness cannot deceive me,
Clinton, said Mary, alarmed at the danger in
which a quarrel would involve her lover, and
forgetting
,
in the alarm, every feeling else;I
don't believe itI meant not to tell it to you
you must promise me on your honour to say
nothing
about it.
Will my honour allow me to make such a
promise, Mary?
It willit will.
Mary, listen to me:Talbot has been
poisoning
your ear against meIt is proper, you know
Vol. II. 23
it is proper, Mary, that I should know what he
has said.
It was said to no one but myself, Clinton;
let it pass.
No, Mary, it must not pass. If you will not
tell me, Talbot shall!
What, will you go, Clinton Bradshaw, and
represent me as a tale-bearer to you of what he
says!
Mary, you told me the last nighthappy night
we spent at the Purchase, that you had, in
Washington
,
when Talbot importuned you with his suit,
told him of what had passed between us. He knew,
then, that I loved you; that my love was not
frowned uponnay, let me not hunt for delicate
phraseswas returned. Well, knowing this, (
Bradshaw's
frame trembled with rage,)knowing this,
he writes a letter that you are to marry another!
Yes, by heaven! I believe he wrote that letter
a published letter: on the heel of it he returns and
proclaims the truth of the report; and while it
rings in my ears, in the jests and jeers and glad
regrets
of those around me, he listens to hear what I
shall saywhat I shall say, when pride, stung to
madness by suspicions and unrequited passion,
buries
the barbed arrow in the heart, and smiles and
jests with the desolation that withers it. Yes! he
listens. Did I not know that he was listening? And
think you that I would suffer him, if you had so fallen
from your high promise, and wrecked my dearest
hopes, to read it on my brow?
`This mask before the babbling crew
This treachery was truth to thee,'
No! ladyI may die a martyr to this love I bear
you yet; but, like the Indian at the stake, no note of
lamentation shall break from me, to gladden the
heart of such as Talbot: it is not in my nature
but it is in his, and he shall answer for it. And he
started to go.
Clintondo not leave me! O! do not leave
me, in this ungovernable passion.
Listen to me, Mary. After this letter was
writtenafter Talbot confirmed the reportafter
the jests and jeers that echoed it, rung in my ears
at which, in the sin of my agony (for it was
sinful
,
it seems, to feel on this occasion) I dared to say
that such a union would be blooming May with
hoary January,after all this, I met you: did I
taunt, did I reproach youdid I cast at you what
Talbot uttered, and mistrust you upon his
authority
?
O, Clinton! Clinton! she exclaimedif I
reproached
when you did not, 'twas because I loved
you the more.
Bradshaw caught her to his heart. My noble,
my frank, my beautiful loveforgive me. A
conviction
of how unworthy I am of you, suffered me
not to read your feelings. Know you not that
At this moment, Mr. Carlton, accompanied by
Mr. Wortley and Talbot, (two of them, at least,
astonished
witnesses of the scene,) stood before the
lovers. Talbot, if not so much astonished, was, at
least, as much enragedfor the latter part of the
conversation of the lovers had been overheard by
the intruding party, who had opened the gate
unheard
,
and whose footsteps had fallen noiselessly
on the grassy walk of the garden.
MaryMiss Carltonwhat does this mean?
exclaimed Mr. Carlton, in astonishment and anger.
What does it mean, I say? and he stamped upon
the floor furiously.
Mary sunk on a chair, which happened to be
near her; and bowing her head, in confusion,
covered
her face with her left hand, while her right
one unconsciously remained in Bradshaw's grasp;
his unengaged hand was thrust into the bosom of
his vesta habit with him. Talbot's glance upon
them was the concentration of envy and ill-will.
What does this mean, Miss Mary Carlton?
continued Mr. Carlton, more furiously. Mary spoke
not; and, turning to Bradshaw, he askedWhat
does this mean, sir, Mr. Bradshaw?
It means what it seems, Mr. Carlton, said
Bradshaw, proudlyfor he could not brook the
tone in which he was addressed.
Sir! exclaimed Mr. Carlton, I see through
you; I've been informed of your character,here
he looked at Talbot, in a manner that told
Bradshaw
,
though it was not meant where the
information
came fromSir, you're a villain!
Mr. Carlton, said Bradshaw, you well know
that your age, and the respect I bear your daughter,
protect you, or you would not use such language.
Our readers, to understand the extent of Mr.
Carlton's passion, must be informed, that when Mr.
Wortley and Carlton left the house together, Mr.
Wortley recounted to Carlton the contents of a
host of letters he had received; giving him most
flattering accounts of his prospects for the
presidency
:
after which, and after saying, that in the
event of his elevation to that high office, he should
require, as he had often told him, his friendly aid;
he delicately hinted, that it would be the greatest
pride and pleasure of his life, if the tie between
them could be made yet stronger. Now these
worthies understood each other from the beginning;
but there's an explicitness in words, in airy words,
when they tell to hope her dream, that for a
moment
seems to place the reality, which, in fact,
may be as far off as ever, in your grasp. Mr.
Carlton
delightedly caught at the hint; and father and
son-in-law, that were to be, became entirely
confidential
with regard to their anticipated domestic
relations. Mr. Carlton had no doubt, knew, in fact,
that his daughter's affections were entirely
unengaged
.
She might have had slight preference at
one time, which all girls, just from school will, for
a week or two, entertain; but latterly, this foolish
romance (if she had ever entertained such) had
given place to a proper view of things. Thus
conversing
,
like the lovers, they forgot all time,
until they were joined by Talbot, who had spent
the previous night at the Park; and who, in a
conversation
on that evening with Mr. Wortley, in
answer to that gentleman's inquiries concerning
Bradshaw's talents and influence, for Mr. Wortley
was electioneering, and was curious about one so
much spoken of as Bradshaw, had not failed to let
him know that Clinton was opposed to his
pretensions
;
of which opposition, Talbot gave a most
exaggerated account; professing himself, at the
same time, the devoted friend of Mr. Wortley. He
pronounced Bradshaw's talents more overrated
than any man's he had ever known; and was
satisfied, he said, that he was as high as he ever
23*
would be. Mr. Carlton was by at the
conversation
;
and Talbot afterwards spoke to him apart,
but with a hope that he would not let it be known
from whom it came, and told him that Bradshaw
was as much opposed to him as to Mr. Wortley,
and was, in fact, the chief promoter of a call for a
public meeting, that was to be held in the city
on the next evening; at which, it was rumoured,
the propriety of a measure, which Mr. Carlton had
warmly advocated in congress, was to be discussed.
Talbot, seated in a large bow-window of the
mansion, and hidden by the curtains, had
overheard
Bradshaw ask for Mary Carlton, and saw
him enter the garden. He immediately seized his
hat and hurried out in search of Mr. Carlton and
Wortley; resolving, by hook or by crook, to lead
them to the garden, and prevent the
tte--tte
of
the lovers; for it not only awoke all his envy and
jealousy, to know that they were together, but he
dreaded an explanation between them of what
Bradshaw had said in the court-house, when the
report of Mary's marriage to Wortley was spoken
of, which he had foully misrepresented to her.
Let us return to the summer-house. The tone
and manner of Bradshaw increased the rage of Mr.
Carlton.
You deserve worse language than any I can
use, he exclaimed: you have taken advantage
of my daughter's being at your father's, and
endeavoured
basely to steal her affectionsyes, sir,
steal
her affections!
Father, interrupted Mary Carlton, with
dignity
,
there was no stealing in the caseI freely
gave my affections.
Don't speak to meif you disobey, you'll find
yourself a beggar. Yes, continued Mr. Carlton,
addressing Bradshaw, steal her affections! Why
did you not speak to me, her father, as an
honourable
man would have done? No, sir, this is
in keeping with the rest of your Jesuitical and
vil
Mr. Carlton, said Bradshaw, interrupting him,
spare your lungs, I pray you, sir; there is to be
a public meeting to-night, when you may have to
use them. Mr. Talbot, it will not be agreeable to
Miss Carlton to have her name connected with
mine in recounting, either in letter writing, or
scandalous tattle, this scene. You act at your
peril
,
sir.
Clinton! Clinton! exclaimed Mary,
remember
your promise; do notdo not
Mary, said Bradshaw, your very slightest
wish shall be my inviolable law. Mr. Wortley, I
regret our acquaintance was not renewed under
less turbulent auspices; we have not had leisure
to exchange even the courtesies of a greeting. I
bid you good morning, sir: and Bradshaw lifted
his hat, leisurely left the garden, mounted his
horse, and rode to the city. Bradshaw sat in his
office all the afternoon, brooding over what had
occurred. There was more tenderness in his love
for Mary Carlton than he had ever felt before; he
had loved her for her bewitching vivacity, for her
beauty, for her wit, for her mindwhich was every
day impressing him more and more with its
superiority
to the generality of her sex,he had loved
her with a proud love, connecting her with the
dreams of his ambition; but now his heart gushed
over towards her, and he thought not of these
qualitieshe thought of the pure and loving spirit
that dwelt in her bright form. He long mused in
a revery of love. Then the gentle emotions which
she called up fled as he thought of her father; and
as Talbot crossed his mind, an expression
amounting
to loathing passed over his countenance.
Bradshaw
had rather a taste than a talent for poetry,
and he often sought to express his emotions in a
hasty rhyme; seizing a pen he wrote as follows.
(Talbot's Christian name was Andrew.)
RECIPE FOR MAKING A TALBOT.
Take just enough of law to lead astray,
And just enough of politics to bray
Of virtue, just enough to talk about it,
And just enough of faith, in faith to doubt it
Of spirit nothing, and of honour naught,
And not one gleam of independent thought
No love of country, and no sense of shame,
And no aspiring for a lofty name
Not art enough to make a lucky knave,
Of fawning,
quantum suff.
to make a slave;
With it enough of moral strength to say,
An ay or no, as interest leads the way;
Behind his back, with safety in the blow,
Take all the courage that would strike a foe,
Courage that aims a bullet at his brain,
And trembles so, that 'tis a fruitless aim
A serpent's smoothness, and a parrot's prate,
And, when there's safety, floods of Billingsgate;
No incantation need you say or sing,
Mix these ingredients, and you'll have the thing.
CHAPTER XIV.
The
political meeting for which Clinton
Bradshaw
advised Mr. Carlton to husband his strength,
had been called by the party who were opposed to
Mr. Carlton, together with some who were
personally
favourable to him, but who entirely
disapproved
of the course he had taken in regard to a
particular measure. That measure we may not
designate; for it is our purpose to meddle not, in
these pages, at all in politics; and we allude to it
because it is necessary in our historythough we
name not its character, nor comment on its
consequence
;
and we rejoice that we can progress just
as well without doing either. Mr. Carlton's
determination
to spend the summer at home, was, no
doubt, made with a view to his popularity. In the
fall, the congressional election was to take place,
and he intended being a candidate for re-election.
Believing in the adage, that a bird in the hand is
worth two in the bush, he resolved, if the people
would re-elect him, still to hold his seat in congress,
and afterwards to become a candidate before the
legislature for the vacant seat in the U. S. Senate.
Therefore, if he should be elected Senator, he could
easily resign his seat in the House of
Representatives
;
and, should he fail in his senatorial ambition,
he would still be a representative. The tour which
he had taken through the state with Mr. Wortley,
was as Wortley's friend, to add that gentleman's
strength to his own, in his senatorial aspirations;
for it was thought, as we have said, that Mr.
Wortley's
native state, from motives of pride, if for no
other reason, would support him in the presidential
contest.
As soon as Mr. Carlton reached home, the
meeting
to be held this night had been called. He had
been taught to believe, by some of those sycophants
who always gather round, at least, a
rich
politician,
that the excitement was a mere bubble, that would
dissolve in airin empty words. Bradshaw, though
generally in favour of Mr. Carlton's course, was
opposed to that which he had taken on this
particular
occasion, of which we speak; but he had no
part in getting up the meeting, though Talbot had
asserted to Mr. Carlton that he was the arch mover
of it. Resolutions declaratory of the opinions of the
state legislature, of which our readers are aware
Bradshaw was a member, passed that body after a
warm debate, and chiefly by Bradshaw's exertions,
in which the opposite course to that pursued by Mr.
Carlton was recommended to Congress; but when
this meeting was called, Bradshaw said he felt no
inclination to take part in it, remarkingI have
no wish to attack Mr. Carlton; and when I am
myself
attacked, it will be time enough to speak upon
the subject. Therefore, Bradshaw was surprised
to see, in an evening paper of this daya paper
devoted to the interests of Mr. Carltona severe
attack upon himself, as the originator of the
meeting
,
in which he was denounced as the covert foe
of Mr. Carltona snake in the grass, who had not
courage to show himself.
I understand it, said Bradshaw to himself, as
he paced up and down his office, just before the
meeting convened; Carlton thinks I'm a mere
political popinjay that a breath of his can
annihilate
.
The scene of this morning has determined
him to crush me at onceha!but for that I
might still have continued an humble member of
the legislaturea member of the legislature, where
young unfledged gentlemen of all sorts, sizes, and
conditions do congregatebut I have other
aspirations
and,
if I had not, how dare I to take a course
political contrary to the opinions of the Hon. Samuel
Carlton?Bah!I do flatter myself that he is
most egregiously deceivedmay be the honourable
gentleman will have hard work to hold his own
this popularity of mine, if I have any, has grown
up in the dark, while he was away! on his
dunghill
!!
Snake in the grass. Think of that, my
Pilgrim fathers. What sought ye thus afar? to
leave behind you a posterity who should shrink
from expressing their free opinionsopinions they
were bound to express! Have ye, whose course
was as straight as an arrow, left a race whose path
is as obliquitous as the serpent's. I did think to
temper your blue-law spirit with a little worldly
caution, if not heavenly charityyour stiff-necked
notions with a little courtesyand to accommodate
myself in other things to the spirit of the times;
butthe fact is, said he, pausing, I have little
of the rock in me, and less of Plymouth rock than
any other; for but for MaryI fear, if the truth
were toldI should have been at war with this
great Goliahin his own estimation, before. I'll
have a sling at him to night for my honour, if not
for my loveI'll wait and hear him. He would
serve me as I've seen a big boy serve a little one
he puts a chip upon my head, and then dares me
to dare him to knock it off. Well, I shall dare
himI know this question, I think, thoroughlyI
have examined it over and over; I shall not be
caught napping. Ay, the meeting is held in the
square opposite Mrs. Holliday's'twill be a large
onethe probability is that he has brought Mary
in with him. `Never strike a man,' says
somebody
,
`unless you mean to knock him down.' He
thinks, perchance, if I dare to appear there, he'll
annihilate me on the spot, and show Mary what a
lover and what a father she has!well, so be it!
if it must be so.
In this disjointed manner, Bradshaw soliloquized
for some time,till, at last, the hour of the
meeting
arrived. Just as Bradshaw left his office, he
was hailed by Jekyl.
Mr. Bradshaw, said he, is that you?
Ah, Jekyl, my friend, I know your voice, though
I can't distinguish your personwhat news?
Step back into your office one moment; I want
to say a word to you, Mr. Bradshaw.
Walk in. They entered the office.
I suppose you have seen the attack, or rather
the attacks on you in the Evening Gazette.
Oh yes.
Well, I'll tell you who wrote them! you know
there are two, one editorial, and the other a
communication
.
The editorial was written by old
Carlton
himself, and the communication by my
particular
friend, Talbot. One of the hands of the Gazette
was at my office not ten minutes ago. He says he
has set up the manuscript, both of Carlton and
Talbot, often, and that he knows their hands, and
he's certain of it.
Is it possible?
Yes, factold Carlton miscalculates his own
strength, and underrates yoursor he's been
misled
in some way. There'll be a louder call for
you than Carlton thinks fordon't fail to come, I
must hurry off. So saying, away went Jekyl.
Alone, Bradshaw pursued his way to the
meeting
.
It was now some time after dark, and from
the many persons before and behind him, all
tending
in his direction, he knew the meeting would be
a very large one. Various comments were made
by the crowd, to which Bradshaw was an
unobserved
,
but not a careless listener.
We shall have good speaking, said one; Mr.
Carlton is no slouch at it, and Bradshaw's no chicken
if he
is
younghe's game to the back bone. He
beats every thing I ever heard.
I mistrust him, said another, in reply; folks
say he wants to marry Carlton's daughterhe's
against Carlton in this businessbut he hangs back,
as I have heard, on this account.
Why, ain't he a-going to speak to-night?
Some say he is, and some say he ain't; but I
mistrust him. I've seen him with the daughter
Vol. II. 24
once or twice, and I think there's something
between
them.
Here the speakers crossed the street, and passed
out of the hearing of Bradshaw.
Can it be possible, thought he, that my
attachment
for Mary Carlton is thus talked ofa
town talk? Can it be believed of me, that love of
the daughter shuts my mouth after this fashion?
He was interrupted in his reflections, by hearing
his name mentioned, in a squad of five or six, just
before him.
Yes, said one, we must have Bradshaw out
let's get together, and call him with a
vengeance
.
To be sure, we must have him out. He's a
young man, like one of us, and he's no mean pride
in him, that keeps him from knowing a poor man.
Have him out! no, indeed, said anotherI
go for Carltondid you see the paper?
Bradshaw found a great concourse of people at
the place of meeting. It was held, as we have
said, near Mrs. Holliday's mansion, which fronted
on a public square, and opposite to which was a
large hotel. From a first floor window, of the
last-mentioned
building, a temporary stand, or hustings,
was erected, and a couple of engine lamps,
borrowed
from the engine company for the purpose,
were so placed as to throw their light on the form
and face of the speaker. The crowd stood in the
street, and, such was the interest taken in the
meeting
,
that it was computed there were from four to
five thousand persons present.
With some difficulty, Bradshaw elbowed his way
through the crowd, who, however, made room for
him, whenever, by the flare of the lamps, or by the
voice, as he asked for passage, they recognised him.
When he entered the room, from the window of
which the stand was erected, he beheld Mr.
Carlton
,
with a number of his friends around him, in
lively political conversation. Mr. Carlton was
stating to them his reason for the vote he had
given, and they were listening with approving nods
and smiles: among the most conspicuous in
approbation
was Talbot. As soon as Bradshaw's
acquaintances
in the room observed him, they
gathered
around him, and one of them said,
Bradshaw
,
Mr. Carlton intends, he says, to give it to
you, for the part you took in passing those
resolutions
.
Ah, does he? Well, I must summon fortitude
to receive.
Ughughand courage to reply, I hope, my
boy, said Mr. Chesterton, who bustled up to
Bradshaw's
elbow, and slapped him on the shoulder.
I'veughcome in all the way to town to hear
youyou sly dognever spoke a word of this
meeting
,
heysteal a march on every body, would you?
I heard it by the merest accident, that you were
going to hold forth. Dn it, I would have been
provoked with you, if I had missedughthis
When did you get in, Mr. Chesterton?
Ughnot ten minutes since: called at your
office
for youugh. I heard all the great
stump-speaking
in Kentucky in my dayPope, Clay,
Barry
,
Joe Daviesall of themughwe used to hold
the meetings in
Here the uproar of the crowd without, calling
on the speakers to commence, drowned the voice
of Mr. Chesterton; and Mr. Carlton pushed by
Bradshaw, with an assumption of great dignity, and,
assisted by Talbot, stepped on to the stand. There
were considerable applause and clapping of hands,
when he made his appearance, though not so much
as he seemed to expect.
Bradshaw's friends, in the room, called out to
him to step out on the stand, and show himself;
but he laughed, shook his head, and said, I'll wait
awhile, till I hear what's the play.
Mr. Carlton went into a long history of his
political
life, and dwelt upon all the leading public
measures he had advocated, until he came down
to the particular one under consideration. Upon
that he expatiated at large, spoke of the
resolutions
of the legislature, and said, That he was
sorry
so respectable a body of men should have been
so misled by a set of designing demagogues; one of
whom, at least, who, he was sorry, represented the
same people with himself, might have waited the
prompting of older and abler heads.
Is Mr. Bradshaw present? interrupted a voice
from the crowd.
I am here, sir, said Bradshaw, stepping out on
the stand, where the light shone full upon him, and
lifting his hat.
Hurra for Bradshaw! shouted a thousand
voices; to which there were as many dissenting hisses
from the strong friends of Carlton, whom the speech
of that gentleman, and the paragraphs in the
paper
had incensed against Bradshaw. Bradshaw
stood erect, and looked round upon the crowd,
while the hurras and hisses continued for more than
a minute. At last, there was silence, when
Bradshaw
said, in a courteous, clear tone, that every
one present heard,
I am here, my fellow-citizens, and ready to
defend
myself; which, with your leave, I will do, when
your honourable representative in congress has
concluded
.
Go on now, Bradshaw! shouted a number,
while others told him to be off, you won't do,
&c. He did not appear embarrassed, but, putting
on his hat, stepped back, and leaned against the
house, remarking, as he did so, When Mr.
Carlton's
done, my friends, I will not detain you long.
Mr. Carlton now, thinking the sign strong in his
favour, became much more personal and severe
on Bradshaw, who stood by, looking on the crowd,
from which he not unfrequently cast his eye to
Mrs. Holliday's window opposite, where he was
satisfied he saw Mary Carlton, for, every now and
then, she would leave the window, at which the
ladies sat, and walk across the room restlessly,
and, whenever she did so, the light from the large
lamp on the centre-table shone full upon her
features
.
Bradshaw felt a stern indignation against
Mr. Carlton, and, for the while, thought of Mary
only as the witness of his reception from her
father's
friends. He, however, waited without
showing
any emotion, until Mr. Carlton concluded, and
when that gentleman finished, there was a long
and loud call for Bradshaw, from both sides, as all
felt anxious to hear him. Ugh!ugh!coughed
24*
Mr. Chesterton, who had taken a seat on the
temporary
railing, by the wall, near Bradshaw; now,
my boy, there's a chance for you. Pour it on to
him`scalding lava,' as old Parr said.
As soon as Bradshaw advanced to the place
which Mr. Carlton had left, a deep silence reigned
over the crowd. Men like these keen encounters
of their fellows' witsthey look on with pretty
much the same kind of feeling that inspired those
of old, when they pressed to the gladiatorial arena,
where he who showed the most skill, and made
battle most bravely was sure to win the
approbation
of the multitude.
There are, a wish to do justice, and an impulse to
generosity, that run, like electricity, through a
large crowd, when they are not controlled by a
deep-rooted prejudice, or an absorbing, passionate
purpose, that always will display themselves, when
there is any thing to call them up.
Without any premonitory flourish, and with great
apparent calmness, Bradshaw said, in the first place,
he had nothing to do with the call of the
meeting
,
and stated why, in his legislative capacity, he
had advocated the resolutions above mentioned.
He did his duty, he said, and left Mr. Carlton to do
hisnothing more was said, he continued, on the
subject, until Mr. Carlton returned, and the call of
a meeting by those who thought that gentleman
had not acted with an eye to their political
interests
,
was, Bradshaw thought, the very thing
Carlton should have sought, if he was aware that
there was any dissatisfaction with his course. But
Carlton was not prepared to meet dissatisfaction,
let alone censure, and he returns not only
dissatisfied
with, but highly censorious of, those who dared
to act contrary to his notions. Here Bradshaw,
with indignant rebuke, commented upon Carlton
and then, changing his tone suddenly, to one of
ridicule
,
he apologized for Carlton's apparent
self-sufficiency
,
and said he was to be excused, as he
was fresh from Washington, where, as they all
knew, he led among the magnets of the land
Heaven
save the magnets!and that, on his leaving
Washington, he had taken a tour to superintend
the political infant schools that had been established
throughout the state, under his patronage. He has
been teaching the young political idea how to shoot,
in the country, said Bradshaw, for he knows,
that,
`Just as the twig is bent the tree inclines'
and when he returned, and found that our opinions
wanted pruning, he set right to work; and, as I
had been a member of the legislature, and had
expressed some unpruned notions, when this
meeting
was called, he looked upon me as the naughty
boy at school, who has been caught in one act of
mischief, and is sure to have laid at his door, or,
rather, on his back, every prank that is afterwards
played. The fact is, he wanted to drive me into
an act of rebellionto compel me to take part in
the
barring out
, so that, when he gets
in
, birch in
hand, he may inflict upon me an awful
punishment
.
Here Bradshaw turned towards Mr. Carlton, to
whom Talbot had handed a chair, and who had
seated himself very conspicuously near the light,
with the look and manner of a frightened urchin,
who is begging off. His droll suiting of the action to
the word, took every body by surprise, and caused
an uproarious shout of laughter and applause; at
which, Mr. Carlton jumped up in a passion, and,
shaking his finger at Bradshaw, called him a
buffooning, boyish demagogue. The threatening
finger of Carlton, so like a pedagogue's, made the
thing still more laughable; and the whole crowd
took
, in a moment, and laughed and shouted loud
and long. Carlton, not at all perceiving the
humour
of the scene, turned to the people, and
denounced
Bradshaw with furious gesticulations; not
one word of what he said was heard; and this, if
possible, increased the uproar; for what is more
ridiculous than a man bellowing and furiously
gesticulating
to a crowd, who hear not one word he
says, for laughing at him?
No! exclaimed Bradshaw, with great popular
tact, when the uproar at length ceased, and
Carlton
had taken his seat, no, my fellow-citizens, I
am under no man's patronage or pupilageI am
one of the poor ones who go to the great
free-school
of liberty.
At this there was a stirring hurra for Bradshaw,
mingled with groans and hisses. All, at length, were
silent, except one, who, from the midst of the
multitude
,
kept interrupting Bradshaw's efforts to
resume
,
by an admirable imitation of the bleating of
a sheep, which caused those around him
involuntarily
to laugh. Turn him out, exclaimed some:
Give that sheep some grass, said othersstill the
bleating continued. Turn that fellow out,
exclaimed
many of the crowd, indignantly.
Don't interrupt him, I beg of you, my friends,
said Bradshaw, he can't help ithe is the great
belwether of our honourable representative's flock;
and what you hear is
instinct
, not imitation.
The belwether's bleating ceased with the laugh
that the remark occasioned, and Bradshaw,
changing
his tone, went on with great dignity; and with
an eloquence that kept every man in the crowd
an excited listener. He showed that he was right
in the view he had taken of the measure under
consideration; that, previously to his election he had
advanced the same opinions he now held; that he
was elected on these grounds; and that, therefore,
he was bound to advocate them on the floor of the
legislature; that he did so without being in the least
influenced by Mr. Carlton's opinions. For, said
Bradshaw, if I had been disposed to consider him as
`Sir Oracle,' I should instantly have reflected that,
like the oracles of old, he courted that ambiguity
necessary to the success of the oracular craft, which
might have left me a victim, where I expected to
be a victor; for, however much there may be a
doubt of our `Sir Oracle's' foretelling from what
direction the popular breeze
will
blow, none will
question the admirable facility with which, like the
weathercock, he adapts himself to the breeze when
blowing.
Fact! fact! true! true bill! shouted
many of the crowd.
My fellow-citizens, resumed Bradshaw, in
conclusion, I have but one remark to make.
Here he took the Evening Gazette from his
pocket
,
and read the articles it contained against him.
The editorial article accused him of duplicity, of
political tergiversation, of professing friendship to
Mr. Carlton, and pretending to be his political
friend, and of acting like a snake in the grass
against him. Of the communication, said
Bradshaw
,
referring to the article signed Junius, which,
Jekyl said, a hand in the Gazette office told him,
was written by Talbot,of the communication
I now say nothing but this, that I know the
dastard
who wrote it, that he is now present, and
that I tell him to his face and to his teeth, that he
is a dastard and a coward;but of this editorial
article I wish to speak: I pronounce it untrue, in
every respectfalse in spirit and in letter; and I
charge the
honourable
Samuel Carlton, our
most
honourable
representative in Congress, with being
the writer of it.
Mr. Carlton started up, and advanced forward,
as if to address the people, when Talbot sprang to
his side, drew him back, and whispered
something
in his ear, of which Bradshaw heard, Tell
them you consider it impertinence in Bradshaw,
that you're not here to answer such charges. I
must give up my......No! no! on your
honour
,
no! interrupted TalbotWe......
Bradshaw
heard no more.
After a minute's whispering with Talbot, Mr.
Carlton went forward, and said, after clearing his
throat, 'Tis true, gentlemen, I did write that
article
I
sent it in town this morningI did not
request it to be put in editoriallyI expect to
prove every word in itevery wordyou shall
have my authority some other timeI must
consult
with the gentleman first.
Mr. Carlton stepped backthe crowd uttered
not a word. Bradshaw at this instant, and for the
first time since he had commenced his speech, in
looking towards Mrs. Holliday's, thought of Mary
Carlton, and the pain that all this must give her.
He took the place that Mr. Carlton had left, and
said
My fellow-citizens, I deem it but an act of
common justice to Mr. Carlton, to say that I
believe
he has been most foully and falsely deceived
with regard to my personal as well as my
political
course towards him. I pronounce his
authority
a liar, and dare him to the issueI am almost
morally certain of the dastard; but he is no
candidate
for your favour,
now;
and when he is, I shall
not shrink from meeting him at Philippi.
Bradshaw's friends gave three cheers for him,
while those who cheered not made no
demonstration
of disapproval, and the meeting broke up.
Don't leave us, Bradshaw, exclaimed a
number
of Clinton's political friends, who had gathered
round him in the bar-room of the hotel. Come,
let us adjourn to a private room, and take
something
.
Thank you, my dear fellowsbut I must be off
to  county, where the court sits the day
after to-morrow.
Ah! said one, you go to defend the
kidnapper
old
Leethe rascal: don't you?
Yes.
I'm told you made him pony up to a pretty
considerable
tune; but, come, you can spend a half
hour with us, nevertheless.
Thank you: I cannot, indeed'tis now eleven.
At four, the stage calls for me, at my office; and I
have a trunk full of books to pack up. Your
country
lawyer is keener than he of the city: he uses
no library, and carries his law in his head. The
juries in  county think a lawyer very
profound
,
if they see him dog-earing a big book. For
the more effect, I take a trunk full, and shall
parade
them, in regular files, as a militia-captain
displays
his band on a muster day, on the trial-table,
before the jury. I take with me a parcel of new
books, with the fairest covers on them, like a clear
conscience. I have often thought that one of your
old law books, that has been thumbed and soiled,
with only here and there a white spot, was the
very fac simile of the conscience of an old lawyer.
Good night!
Bradshaw crossed the square, towards Mrs.
Holliday's
.
The light was still burning in the front
room, but the shutters were closed. He hesitated
at the door. Was Mary still there? Was her
father
with her? Mrs. Holliday was away: could
she be alone? He paused a moment before the
door, and then deliberately ascended the steps, and
rang the bell. In an instant, it was opened by Sue;
and Bradshaw asked
Is Miss Carlton in, Sue?
No, sirO! it's Mr. Bradshawyes, sir, Miss
Mary's in, and so is Miss Emily. Missus was gone
away, and I was keeping house.
And an excellent housekeeper, I have no doubt,
you are, Sue. What gentlemen are here?
Mr. Kentucky, sir, and a strange gentleman,
what coughs: he's gone to bed, replied Sue,
showing
her ivory, with delight, at Bradshaw's
compliment
to her housekeeping.
As Bradshaw entered the room, Mary Carlton
started up from a table, at which she was writing,
to meet him; and then, checking herself, said
Come in, Clinton.
Bradshaw advanced, and, seizing her proffered
hand, pressed it to his lips; and, gently encircling
her waist, asked
Do you forgive me, love, for all I have been
compelled to say of your father, in my own
defence
?
Clinton, said she, blushing deeply, don't you
see Emily and Mr. Willoughby?
`Behave yourselves before folks,' as the song
says, said Willoughby, laughing.
Bradshaw turned, and, for the first time,
observed
him sitting on the sofa, in the back room,
beside Emily.
Ah! Kentuck, exclaimed Bradshaw, you see
I live in so much light here, from bright lamp,
and brighter eye, that, dazzled as I am, I cannot,
through the folding-doors, pierce the darkness.
Miss Emily Bradshawmy respects to you, sis:
where's Mr. Chesterton?
Just gone, most unpoetically, to bed.
I did not know that you were in town. I saw
Mr. Chesterton, but lost him, somehow or other.
Bradshaw, I expect nothing yet, but that I
shall be disinherited in your favour.
If you think so, said Bradshaw, laughing, I'll
make such an agreement with you as John Horne
Vol. II. 25
made with the nephew of the individual whose
name he
took
, and became John Horne Tooke. But
where's Mr. Chesterton, we must not let him hear
the agreement! The uncle was an odd fish, said
Bradshaw, lowering his voice, often quarrelled
with his nephew, and on one occasion, the
misunderstanding
went so far that the uncle told Horne
if he would take his name, he would leave him his
estate; Horne did so, but entered into an
agreement
with the nephew, as he was satisfied the
uncle would soon quarrel with him; that, no
matter
to which of them the estate was left, they
should go halves.
Ah! I never saw that before.
Didn't you? It's told in Tooke's life. The
uncle left the estate to the nephew; the scamp
promised
Tooke a certain part of it, which he said,
was all he wanted, and afterwards refused to give
it to him. Tooke sued him and recovered it. So
let Mary and Emily be the witnesses, and it's a
bargain, if you say so.
These ladies fair cannot well be witnesses,
Bradshaw; for, I hope, before my uncle shuffles
off this mortal coil, they will have changed their
names, and ladies may not be witnesses for, or
against their lords, saith the books.
Lords! how that sounds, exclaimed Mary
Carlton.
In a few moments Willoughby, in a low voice,
sat conversing in the back room with Emily
Bradshaw
,
and Clinton, taking a seat by Mary, asked
her in as low a tone, what she was writing.
A note to you, Clinton, a note to you, charging
you, if you had any regard for me, not to involve
yourself in a duel with Talbot.
Duel with Talbot!My dear Mary, there is
no fear of that: Talbot could not be kicked, cuffed,
or horse-whipped into a fight.
Then, will you promise me that you will not
fight him?
Mary! Mary!no, love, I must not promise
you that; but I will promise you, if he challenge
me for any punishment I may inflict upon him, I
will not meet him, unless you sayfor you shall
be judgethat my honour demands it. But don't
talk of Talbot. With whom did you come to
town?
With my father, Mr. Wortley and Talbot in
the same carriagethe most disagreeable ride I
ever took or ever expect to take. O! Clinton,
my father and I had such a scene after you left.
He wished to compel me to marry Mr. Wortley,
whether I would or no. I cannot tell you how
stern and unkind he spoke. I became indignant:
I told him plainly and openly of all that has
passed between us. He threatened to disinherit
me. He reviled me; but, no matter'tis sinful
I should feel anger against my parent. But,
Clinton
,
why should he compel me?I have never
been with him any length of time in childhood,
or since. When did he ever seem to take a
parental
affection in me? Often, for months, I have
not seen him, and then it was a cold greeting.
And now, when I may be subservient to his
ambition
!O!
I never knew a mother's careYes!
yes!I have known a mother's care, and a
father's
care; but it was not at the Park. After
years, when he has been to me almost a stranger,
shall I
Mary, I would not let these things trouble
me with a second thought. As for the
disinheritance
,
love, said Bradshaw, with a smile
have you not heard the agreement which
Kentuck
and I are to make? I am rising rapidly into
practice. If I were to quit politics, and devote
myself to the law, and to making money, I have
no doubt that in a few years I could acquire a
large fortune. I
No, Clinton, money-making never will
content
younever should content younor mere
reputation as a lawyer. You can stand among the
highestwhy not the very highest?in political
power and public consideration. You do not know
how ambitious I have learned to be at
Washington
.
'Tis not the wealthiest man, there, who is
sought for, Clintonfollowed, applauded, courted
nor the wife of the wealthiest, who draws round
her the considerations of the great. You see, 'tis
selfishness in me.
Then, Mary, at once be mine, and teach me
to be ambitious, and to aspire.
Teach you to aspire!
When will you be mine, love?
I must see my aunt Holliday, ClintonI must
speak with her of my fatherI must not act
unadvisedly
I
am strangely situated. My father
brought me in this evening, and has not called for
mehe has, I suspect, gone out without me. I
must see auntI must consult aunt.
Brother! Mary! interrupted Emily
Bradshaw
,
from the back room, do you intend to talk
there all night?'Tis after twelve.
It is! exclaimed Mary Carlton. Bless me,
the neighbours will tell aunt, when she returns,
that we have kept open house here, and had
parties
every night. Mrs. Grey, our near neighbour,
has the School for Scandal enacted in her parlour
every evening.
Good night, sis, said Bradshaw, to his
sister
.
I shall not see you for a week or more, as
I told you I must be in  county the day after
to-morrow.
You defend a kidnapper, do you, Clinton?
asked Mary.
Yes, Mary, whispered Bradshaw; and if
you would let me steal you, I think I could
defend
myself ably in any court in Christendom,
particularly in the court of love.
25*
CHAPTER XV.
A day
or two after the public meeting, the
proceedings of which we have very imperfectly
given, while Bradshaw was attending court in
county, a meeting of those opposed to the
re-election of Mr. Carlton was called. Jekyl was
one of the prime movers of it. It was very
numerously
attended. Jekyl nominated Bradshaw
as a candidate for congress, in opposition to Mr.
Carlton, and Cavendish seconded the motion in a
very able speech, in which, with cynical asperity,
he ridiculed Carlton, and was truly eloquent in
his praise of Bradshaw. The nomination was
accepted
with great unanimity.
The friends of Carlton were very much
incensed
at the proceedingsthey called
counter-meetings
,
and passed violent resolutions against
Bradshaw. The press, on Carlton's side,
denounced
him unsparingly, and threw out broad
hints of charges against his private character,
which, if Mr. Bradshaw insisted upon being a
public man, should be substantiated and
published
.
Jekyl had, in the increase of his patronage,
been induced to enlarge his paper, and issue it
tri-weekly instead of weekly, and he was doing
very well with it. He hoisted the banner of
Bradshaw
,
and the moment he did so, Carlton's friends
dropped his paper. Such is the encouragement
given to the freedom of the press! And not content
with this, a squad of them had a meeting, and
deputized
two of their number to wait on, and
inform
him, that if he continued to support
Bradshaw
,
they were determined to ruin his paper, and
that, if he would take the side of Carlton, he should
be greatly benefited. Gentlemen, said Jekyl to
them, when they had delivered their message,
rising with indignation from his chair, I have
always
eaten the bread of honest independence, and
I thank God! whether my paper rises or falls in
this contest, while I have my health. I can still
earn it. Mr. Farren, you are a man of wealth and
influenceand I did not believe, until to-day, sir,
what was said of youthat you were a sycophant,
and a time-server. You, Mr. Lyle, are descended
from a revolutionary worthy, sir. I am sorry to
tell you what I do, that you are the degenerate
son of a worthy sire. You would sell your
birthright
.
Tell the gentlemen that they may do their
worst. Mr. Bradshaw was my earliest and best
friend: I believe him politically right. I won't
give up the ship, sirsthe causethe paper
while I have the means to circulate it. I shall
give an account in my next paper of your message,
gentlemen; and I shall publish your names, and
the names of those who sent you. Now, there's
the doormake a bee-line out, if you please,
gentlemen
,
and never enter it again, unless you wish
to feel the arm of one who has been an honest
blacksmith, and who will be an honest blacksmith
again, before he'll follow the tracks of either of
you.
The day after the visit of the gentlemen, above
mentioned, to Jekyl, eighty-three of his subscribers
sent the peremptory order,
Stop my paper
.
This did not abate Jekyl's zeal for Bradshaw, nor
prevent him from publishing his interview with
Farren and Lyle, with their names, and the names
of those who sent them, in full. These gentlemen
were highly incensed, and made a most furious
attack
on Jekyl, through the columns of the Gazette.
In reply, he spared them not, and dealt as
severely
with Mr. Carlton. The day after this last
publication
,
while Jekyl was sitting alone in his office,
our reader's acquaintance, Mr. Chesterton entered.
Thisugh!is Mr. Jekyl, editor of the
Mechanic
Advocate?
Yes, sir.
My name is Chesterton.
Take a chair, Mr. Chesterton, said Jekyl,
offering him a chair.
Give meughyour hand, my boy, I'm glad
to know youyou've heard of me?
Yes, sir, I've often heard your nephew, and
Mr. Bradshaw speak of you.
Ah! you've heard ofughmy poor devil
business, as master Clinton called ithey!of my
willsir, I had fawning knavesDodridge and
other sycophants, sirughughwho deceived
me. After my nephew left me, sir, I had nobody
but them and my slaves about meslaves all. I
don't likeughdemocracy, sir, your democracy;
but I honour an independent man, and I despise,
from my soul, this cringing and fawning spirit
subscribers dropping offhey?
Yes, sir, and I'm gaining a few.
Ughglad to hear itthat's good for
Bradshaw
.
I like that boy; he suits me to a T, to a
fractionughughughhe'll thunder in the
capital
yet, hey! suppose you know my nephew,
Kentuck they call him,is to marry his sister?
Yes, sir, I've heard so.
Wellughof coursethen I'm interested in
the family.
Yes, sir.
Ughwell then I'm interestedughin you
and in your paperugh. I don't do it for your
dd democracyunderstand. I've no chick nor
child; Willy 'll get all, except what I leave to
Bradshaw. Ughughmay be my purse is as
deep as some others we might name, ughugh
ughso go a-head, my boy, and when you want
any money, I'm your man. This is to be a tight
contest; Bradshaw ought to be home; Carlton made
a stump speech last night, and abused him like a
pick-pocket. Good deal ofughboisterous
Billingsgate
in himhey!can't you make your
paper
a daily, hey?and meet that daily liethat
gazette, with a dailyughcontradiction and
castigation
.
You must do it; I'm your man; any
time you're ready, I'm your man. Ha, ha, so you
ordered
the rich, rascally, ragamuffins out, hey! we
must beat 'em, we must beat 'emughwhat do
you say of a daily, hey?
I don't think, sir, that Carlton's friends can hurt
me much more; they've stopped two hundred
papers
,
though, already.
Ughthey have, hey? well, don't say any thing
about it, but put me down for two hundred papers.
I understanddon't do it to help a Jacobin, what
I take you to beughbut I like the boy,
Bradshaw
,
and we must beat them.
I had, since I came out for Bradshaw, sixty
new subscribers, who came to the office unsolicited,
and subscribed. When Bradshaw returns, if he
determines to be a candidate
Determines to beughugha candidate!
he must be a candidate; that's yourughdd
democratic Jacobinical doctrine, `neither to seek
nor decline;' ha! ha! ha!ughugh
preposterous
;
but Bradshaw must hold to it, and you must
hold to him as the candidate, that's allbut I
interrupted
you.
I was about remarking, sir, that if Bradshaw
determines to be a candidate, and I think he will,
I may safely say, I can make a daily of my paper
with a little assistance. I could give a mortgage
on the establishment; it is now free and
unincumbered
I
could make a daily of it and run the
gazette hard.
Ughughit must be done. Some puppy
did you see it? some puppy of a correspondent has
an article on a stranger's meddling in politics, and
ughughtakes me off. I'll cane him if I find
ughhim outtakes me off; the anonymous knave,
did you see it?
Yes, sir, I saw an article in that paper yesterday,
alluding to a stranger's interfering in our politics,
said Jekyl, with a smile, which he could not
suppress
;
but I was not aware he meant you, sir.
You smile, hey! exclaimed Mr. Chesterton.
UghI understand: you're thinking of Pope, the
poet, hey! and mad DennisDennis, the critic
ughmy thunder Dennis, hey?
Jekyl protested that he was not, and that he did
not know to what Mr. Chesterton alluded.
Don't know to what I alludeughughmy
cough's bad to-day. Why, when Pope's Essay on
Critughicism was published, DennisDennis
and he were at daggers drawnstepped into the
booksellersughopened the poem, and read,
`Some have, at first, for wits, then poets passed,
Turned critics next, and proved'ugh`plain fools, at last.'
Ughughha`By gad! he means me!'
exclaimed
Dennismad Dennis. Do you take now,
my boy, my brave blacksmith?
Yes, sir, said Jekyl, laughing heartily at Mr.
Carlton's oddness; I take.
Ha! ha! it's good, ain't it? I tell you, my
brave blacksmith, General Morgan, of our
revolution
,
was a blacksmith: did you know it? We
must have a caricatureughugh. I bedeviled
a fellow nearly to death once, with one of them
ughyou remember when Bradshaw made the
people laugh so, when he talkedughabout the
barring out, and put on the look of an urchinha!
ha!ughthe fellow'd make a good actor, first
rate. Wellughwe must have a caricature,
and have him barring old Carlton out of Congress
ugh. Scene, Congress Hallughdoors and
windows all shut, Carlton, with a switch in hand,
mounted on the backs ofughwhat's their
names? exclaimed Mr. Chesterton, snapping his
fingers with impatience. Ah, I have the rogues;
mounted on the back of Farren and Lyle, trying
to get in the windowughughha! ha!
Bradshaw
has the window a little way open, and is
knocking him on the head with a bundle of papers,
some inscribed with the name of the measure
Carlton
has been advocating, and some Mechanics'
Advocate
.
Hey! what do you think of it? continued
Mr. Chesterton, who had been walking up and
down the office, every now and then, stopping
before
Jekyl. What do you think of it? he asked,
stopping short. Yes; and there must be a
bundle
of Gazettes sticking out of Carlton's pockets,
and a fellow behind him, who is trying to get one
of them, catches himughughby the coat tail,
and, ha! ha! that prevents him from getting at
Bradshawughughthere's a notion for you,
my brave Morgan blacksmith.
Jekyl, who never restrained his impulses, threw
himself back in his chair, and gave way to a
hearty
laugh, which Mr. Chesterton attributed entirely
to his caricature, and was pleased accordingly.
Ha! ha!ugha good notion, you think, hey!
who draws? who draws? I've a thousand things
here, tapping his head with his finger; yes, a
million, if I could only get them written down.
Jekyl was delighted with the idea of ridiculing
Carlton, and told Mr. Chesterton that a young
friend of his, an engraver, who had a great turn
for such things, would be glad to get the job, and
would execute it admirably.
That's the thingthe veryughthing!
exclaimed
Mr. Chesterton, let him meet me here this
evening ifughyou say so. And set about your
daily arrangements, by that time too, folks like your
paperughI know it will go with a littleugh
pushing. We'll wax the rascals! So saying, Mr.
Chesterton departed, stopping, however, at the foot
of the steps, and calling up, Mindmy brave
Morgan
,
not antimasonryblacksmith, don't forget this
evening.
The day, Bradshaw returned to the city, the
following article appeared in the Gazette:
LEE, THE KIDNAPPER.
We have just learned that this notorious
character
has made his escape from  county jail,
under the following extraordinary circumstances:
Clinton Bradshaw, Esq., whom a certain set here,
headed by a quondam blacksmith, now the editor of
the Mechanics' Advocate, would elevate into a
congressman
,
was sent for by Lee to defend him. In
times of such political importance to the aspirations
of Mr. Bradshaw, it is to be presumed he, Bradshaw,
would not leave here without a considerable
consideration
.
And we were, therefore, not surprised
to hear that Lee, who is a counterfeiter as well as
a kidnapper; gave him the enormous sum of five
thousand dollars!!! to defend him. We may
expect
ere long to have counterfeit money circulating
in our city particularly in the payment of
election
billsit is but justice to say of the leading
Vol. II. 26
members of our bar that they refused to defend
Lee for any sum. But to our purposeMr.
Bradshaw
,
on his arrival at  county, went to the
jail to see Lee. The jailer showed him to the
room, where Lee was confined with other prisoners,
but so dainty are the olfactory nerves of this
aspirant
to congress, whose general company in this city
would not warrant such an opinion, that he refused
to speak with his client in the common room, saying
that the smell was too offensivethink of that, Mr.
Editor Jekylthat the smell was too offensive, and
beside he wished to see Lee in private. The jailer,
who is an unsuspecting man, took Lee out of the
common room, and suffered Bradshaw to be alone
with him, in a room which hethe jaileris in
the habit of occupying as a kind of office, wherein
he keeps the irons not in use, the keys, &c. The
jail is on the outskirts of the village, as county jails
generally are; and in the room into which
Bradshaw
and Lee were introduced by the jailer, and
left together, there is a window that looks out on
a common, at the foot of which is a thick wood,
full of undergrowth, that terminates in an almost
impenetrable swamp. The jailer went about his
usual avocations, not presuming to lock Bradshaw
up with Lee, and expecting he should have notice
from Bradshaw, of his intention to depart. But no
such thing, Bradshaw left without saying a word
to the jailer, merely telling his wife that she had
better look after LeeLo! when the jailer went
`
to look after Lee
,' the window above mentioned,
was found open, a window that at least requires
the strength of two men to open it, and Lee is not
a strong man, and the bird had flown.
We leave the reader to his own conclusion.
We have a host of
facts
, with regard to the morals
and character of this youthful aspirant, that shall
be forthcoming, if he still insist upon thrusting
himself before the public, in opposition to one of
our most talented and worthiest citizens.
We warn Mr. Bradshaw, in time, of the
exposures
,
which his friends seem determined to force
upon him. When a man is content to remain in
a
private
station, the press should have nothing to
do with his character; but when he insists upon
being a public man, then should his misdeeds be
made
public
, in justice to the people whose support
he seeks.
The moment that Bradshaw saw the paragraph,
he walked to Glassman's office with the paper in
his hand, and read it to him. What do you think
of that, Glassman?
I've seen it, replied Glassman; but I wished
to see with what kind of a countenance you would
read ityou'll do for a politician, my friend; and
that's what cannot be said to every man possessed
of political talent. Now, if you had raved and swore,
I should have advised you to quit politics. What
are your intentions?
This paper, you know, is controlled by
Carlton
.
Well! I'll run him a race, blow high or blow
lowon that I am resolved. And I'll make
Janson
,
this rascally editor, contradict every
You must leave Janson to meI understand
him exactly; and, as I stuck him once for heavy
damages, in a libel suit, for a client of mine, when
he had laughed, and told me I could not obtain a
six-penny verdict, I think I can manage him. What
is the foundation of this?
The foundation is, that Lee bribed the jailer to
suffer him to escape, and it was agreed between
them that when I went to see Lee, and just after
I had left him in the room to which he was always
brought, he was to pretend to knock down the
jailer and make his escape, which he did. The
jailer's wife, not knowing their agreement,
manfully
resisted Lee's escape, in the passage, where she
chanced to meet him, and he knocked her down.
The jailer over-reached himself; for, not knowing
what had happened to his wife, he hoisted the
window
that opened on the common, and then rushed
out the door, and raised a hue and crytold the
people that Lee had knocked him down, and
escaped through the window; and away he went,
with a number of them, towards the woods. Others,
more anxious to see how Lee got out, than where
he went, hurried to the jail to gaze on the open
window, when, lo! the jailer's wife told how Lee
had knocked her down, and escaped through the
back passage; and she showed her wounds. This
discrepancy in the account of the jailer and his
wife, raised suspicion: the jailer's apartments were
searched, and three hundred dollars, in bills, some
of which were identified by Lee's fellow prisoners,
as having been in his possession, were found there.
The jailer was arrested, and confessed the fact.
Truly, Janson has a lively imagination!
exclaimed
Glassman, laughing. He would have
made a good novelist or poet. It is recorded of
Sheridan, your favourite, (old Sherry, as they used
to nickname him, for good reasons,) that he one day
asked his wife, if, since they had been married,
she had ever kissed any man but himself? `No,
my dearbut why do you ask?' `Well, have you
ever wished to kiss another?' `No, not even wished;
but, tell me, why do you ask?' `Egad! my dear,
I'm up for parliament; and, if you have, they'll find
it out and print it.' This is the age of
inventions
,
you know. Some one saidwho was it?that a
certain parson's preaching was a forty-horse-power
preachinghe preached so well. Janson, there is
no doubt, has a forty-horse power of lyingfor, to
my certain knowledge, the rascal, if you will suffer
me to make a wretched pun,
steams
it with a
vengeance
.
But, Bradshaw, my friend, this is a good
omenthis abuse. It is a proof they fear you
much; and would, therefore, put you down by any
means, fair or foul. If the election came on
to-morrow
,
Carlton would undoubtedly beat you; but
you will gain on him every day. You should draw
him to the stump as often as possible. He prides
himself on being a veteran on the stumpand so
he is; but you must serve him as Napoleon served
the veteran Wurmser: take more prisoners from
him than you have soldiers, till, at last, he himself
has to capitulate. Men are often weakest when
they think themselves strongest. He holds himself
to be a marvellous man on the stump.
I think he is a good stump speaker, said
Bradshaw.
Yes, so he is, in some respects; but he wants
tact. The thing is, not so much to make in itself
26*
a great speech, but a speech that is great to your
audience. Burke, in his splendidly drawn
character
of Townsend, says of him, that he had the
power of `hitting the house between wind and
water.' He might have made a better speech, and
shot over their heads. You don't want the
reputation
so much, do you? of making great speeches
as of gaining great endsspeaking is the means.
On inquiring for Mary Carlton, Bradshaw found
that she had left town, and had gone to Mrs.
Holliday
,
who, as our readers are aware, had made a
visit to the country. The lovers, when they last
parted, had promised to write to each other, and
Bradshaw had written to Mary, but had received
no answer. In the mean time, weeks wore away,
and the political contest between Carlton and
Bradshaw was growing warmer and warmer: Jekyl
had attacked Mr. Carlton with so much severity
for some of his land speculations, that Carlton had
thought proper to institute suit against him for
slander; and was determined, it was said, to
prosecute
him to the utmost rigour of the law. The
caricature made its appearance under the auspices
of Mr. Chesterton, and, owing to the excitement,
it took excellently well, much to his delight. It
presented admirable likenesses of the opponents,
though Bradshaw was represented as a
smooth-faced
urchin with the collar of his shirt turned over
his jacket, and the head of Carlton projected at a
pro-di-gi-ous length from the body and
shoulders
of Dominie Sampson. It was a great
annoyance
to Mr. Carlton; for, go where he would, his
resemblance, as if distorted by a wizard, stared
him in the face.
Every moment of Bradshaw's time was
occupied
.
His professional business had accumulated
so rapidly upon him since the adjournment of the
legislature, that he found either that he must
neglect
his business or take a partner. Willoughby
appeared to have given up the idea of practising
since the arrival of his uncle. Indeed, he had
become
so devoted a lover, that Bradshaw never
thought of speaking to him of their contemplated
partnership, except jokingly;and then Kentuck
would laugh and say that Emily would not let
him practise law, as she had determined to be a
farmer's wife. Bradshaw, therefore, made a
proposition
to Cavendish to become his partner.
Confound you, Bradshaw, said the Judge, in
reply, I expected you to do this before: agreed;
but our partnership shall only last till the
congressional
election, unless you beat Carlton; for, if
you don't, I'll curse and quit you. And, mark you,
Bradshaw, don't let any hankering you may have
after Mary Carltonthe women have ruined many
a man's fairest prospectsI've dn little opinion
of themprevent you from dealing with Carlton
as he ought to be dealt with.
Why, Judge, have I not dealt pretty plainly
with him?
Yes; you have so far done as you ought; you
and he will soon have to stump it through town and
countyand you must not let any woman's
flummery
and stuff interfere withto make a long
story shortyou must meet Carlton just as if he
never had a daughter; now mind that, and I'll
keep close here to our office. Your smooth tongue
and stump speeches must catch the birds, and get
their votes; then send them to me for lawing, as
they call it, and I'll fleece the fees out of them. I
go in for making money. By-the-by, Bradshaw, if
you should want a little in your electioneering, I can
contrive to lend you. Don't you, Bradshaw,
trouble
yourself the least about our business; don't
think on the law till after the electionI can
attend
to it.
Not the least efficient of Bradshaw's partisans,
were Nancy, the apple-woman, and Job, the jailer.
They proclaimed his merits in all places and in all
companies.
Yes, said Nancy, one morning in the
market-place
,
with a host of the market folks around
her; butchers, country people, and their customers
with almost every one of whom she was
acquainted
individually, Bradshaw will run
mightily
;
and I tell ye he ought to run. I've knowed
him 'afore he first commenced to read law, when
he lived at his father'sone of the most
respectableist
of our honest farmersI often buy fruit from
him,in the county round. It was going out to get
fruit that I used to see the boya smart boy he
was in head-work then, but sickly; and Mr.
Gowler
,
our parson, tells mean he's a feeble man
himselfthat the smartest folks is often ailing; it's
natural to them. But who can speak, for all that,
like Bradshaw; and he always has a kind word
for every bodypoor or rich, it's all the same to
him, ye may swear. I've been, this twenty years
gone by, tending in yer old court, and yer new
court; and I've hearn the best o' yer pleaders.
I've a right to be a judge in lawing matters, as
Judge Price says. Well, I declare to ye all, that
in all my born days, I never heard such a speech
as he made agin Johnson, the watchman, when he
wanted to lay his own murder at a poor young
creature's door.
Yes, but Nancy, said one of the by-standers, a
Carlton man, they say the gal give him a fee in
that case?
That's no fact, said Nancy; the poor thing
had no fee?
I don't mean exactly that, said the fellow,
winking at the by-standers; you women have a
way of engaging young men in your cause.
That's a foul-mouth inspersion, Jim Bunks,
exclaimed Nancy, highly nettled; it's a foul-mouth
inspersion, and an unchristian slander, to make such
an insinivation agin any woman. The girl's as
good as airy lady in the land. Ain't we all
sinners
?answer
me thata sinful, fallen, misled
race. I know the first man was misled by a
woman
;
but if yer casting that up, yer throwing dirt
on yer own mother, Jim Bunks, and yer sisters;
and it's no use in some families to talk of the
univarsal
sins of the world; they're enough to do to
mind their speciality pleas, as the lawyers say.
Jim was hushed up, for certain family reasons,
not necessary to mention.
No, said Nancy, addressing the by-standers:
I can tell ye a nannacdote of myself, that shows
Bradshaw to ye. Ye see, Josey Mulvany, afore
Josey an' I was married, had laid up one thousand
and ten dollars, with hard labour, I tell ye, to keep
his old age; and, being unsure of the savings bank,
he puts his money in Judge Harper's hands. The
judge took the benefitthat was afore we were
married, jist the very day, though. Poor Josey
was a comfortless and sad man, ye may swear, and
tell no lie. We thought the money, hard yearnings,
was clean gone. Every body said it was gone; but
Bradshaw he said nothingbut he looked round,
and through the business; and he talked to this
creditor, and that, and to the judge; and he worked
it so, that Josey got every cent of it. He wouldn't
take no fee, nor nothing for his sarvice. And
when I went to him, to say that I and Josey was
thankful, he jist took me by the handBradshaw's
none of yer high-notioned folks, what think
themselves
above poor peoplehe jist took me by the
hand, and said, `Don't say a word on it, Nancy;
ye'd do as much for me, any day, I know,' and so
speaking, he jist took an apple, and wouldn't hear
another word about it. What think ye all of that,
I ask ye? If Josey and I had told our troubles to
yer Mr. Carlton, would he ha' done it? But I don't
want to say a word agin Carlton, for he's a sweet
daughter; and I had the notionbut I ask ye all
if such a man as Bradshaw ain't the man for
Congress
?
You may well say that, Mrs. Mulvany,
exclaimed
Job, the jailer, who had been a listener to
Nancy's harangue; you may well say that, if I
know any thing on human natur. There's not
one scrumption of arusticrusty in Squire Bradshaw,
not one scrumption. He's as much of an
American
,
democratic, revolutionary, Jeffersonian
republican
,
continued Job, waving his hand oratorically,
as much, I say, of an American, revolutionary,
democratic, Jeffersonian republican, with as little
arusticrusty in him as any man that ever went to
the continental congress, saving and excepting,
always
,
as the lawyers say, more or less, Genral
Washington. As for his law, I always said it, since
the first day we shook hands, that he would take
the rag off of the bush at this barclean off: and
Mrs. Mulvany and me has a right to know who's
best among our lawyersthat every man on you,
friend or foe, must give into. When he comes over
to the jail to see a client, he don't strut and swell,
and gape round, like some of your foppy lawyers,
and treat me, the 'sponsible person there, as if I
was nobody. No! him and I has long talks, and
he often stops and takes a dish of tea with my wife
and Lucy.
And a fine cup of tea it is! interrupted Nancy.
Yes, Mrs. Mulvany, you may say so, said Job,
and so says Squire Bradshaw. I tell you, the
very night that Adamsyou've all heard of him
he's the fellow that robbed old Jemmy Swartz,
many years ago, and played the devil ever since
the night he got himself hung atwixt the bars of
the window, Squire Bradshaw took tea with my
wife, Lucy, and me. And him and me went
together
to the rascal's cell, and saw him hanging
right by the chin like, and his limbs were just
quivering
the death quiver. In that very case of
Johnson, the watchman, who killed Isriel
Carpenter
,
though Bradshaw did get him hung, that was
owing partly to me, for I knowed the human natur
of that Scrags, and found him out. The Squire
was, at first, in a little of a flurry, in that case
but we managed it. In that very case, the Squire
raised a pretty considerable of a sum for the
orphans
,
widows, and daughters. We managed
Job, if you can manage so well at the law,
interrupted one of the by-standers, jerringly,
why don't you turn in and practise it?
And why not? asked Job, disdainfully.
You'll have to, I reckon, replied the
interrupter
,
if you go on, at this rate, talking
politics
.
Have to!Why?
You'll get turned out of the jail for busying
yourself so much in political matters.
Not afore you're turned in, an' I've turned
the key on you, you rapscallion. I'm a free man,
an' I'll explain an' expound an' expand my free
'pinions publicly, wherever I please. This is a
free country, ain't it?
The crowd spoke their approbation of Job's
sentiments, loudly; and, with their approval
ringing
in his ears, he walked on in his lordliest
fashion
,
with his huge fists thrust into the pockets
of his great jacket, so as to bring them almost
together
,
and his market-basket resting on his arm,
remarking, as he wentI'm a free man, and I
go for Squire Bradshaw.
So do I! and So do I! said two of the
crowd.
And so don't I! said another.
That's the very way it 'll go, said Job,
looking
over his shoulder: two to onethat's enough,
I reckon; and, after taking a step or two, he
remarked
,
to himself,there's a good deal of
human
nater in man.
Mr. Chesterton, who had been in town for the
last day or two, had come to the market-place in
search of old Pete, as he wanted to send some
message or other to the Purchase, and was a
witness
to the electioneering talents of Nancy and
Job. As Nancy was following in the wake of
the departing Job, Mr. Chesterton said to her, at
the same time offering her a dollar,
My goddess Pomonaugh!I'm glad to see
you here.
Nancy, hearing herself called a goddess before
such a crowd, and by such a queer-looking man
as Mr. Chesterton, whom she had never seen but
once before, and who then addressed her in a
very different style, feeling herself scandalized,
exclaimed
Man!what do ye mean? Yer mistaken in
the personI'm none of yer goddessesI'm no
miss of yersI'm an honest woman!
Ugh!ha! ha! laughed Mr. Chesterton,
outright
.
She takes me for another Vertumnus!
and in the market-house to imitate that unruly
god!Ugh!ha! ha!He transformed himself
to an old woman, while I imitate Jove himself,
and come in the Danan shower! and for such
fruit!
The man's clean cracked! exclaimed Nancy,
who remembered Mr. Chesterton's manner and
Vol. II. 27
remarks, when she sold him some apples, as our
readers remember, in Bradshaw's office, which
she then thought very strange. The man's
clean cracked! demented outright! Who knows
him? asked she, of the crowd, who appeared to
be inclined to adopt her opinions with regard to
his mental operations.
Ugh!ha! ha!My goddess, don't you
know me?
No, man! I don't know you.
What!ugh! ugh!don't you remember we
had a little comfortableugh! ugh!chat, all
alone in Bradshaw's office?
Man! exclaimed Nancy, enraged, forgetting
for the moment her impression that Mr.
Chesterton
was crazy,Man, do ye mean to disperse
my character in the public market-place! What
do ye mean by yer conductions?
Ugh!my dear, good apple lady, you
misunderstand
meab ovough!Pomona was the
goddess of fruit, and Vertumnus was a god in
heathen mythology; just as Mough!as
Momus
The Lord deliver me! exclaimed Nancy,
forcing her way through the crowd. Let me
pass! let me pass! he's one of yer Mormonite
preachersa heathen from the far away wild
westhe's fresh from the evil one with his gold
and silver to tempt the followers of the Lord; and
she darted through the crowd in real fright, for
she was very superstitious.
The people gathered round Mr. Chesterton,
gaping and wondering at him, while he,
chuckling
to himself at Nancy, looked about for Pete,
unconscious of the crowd: at last he asked them
My friendsugh!do you know Peter, who
be
Ah! he's at it, exclaimed Nancy, who had not
yet passed out of hearinghe's berating the
blessed Peter, and next Paul 'll catch it, and the
whole of the Heavenly apostlesthe Mormon
heathenthat I should have discoursed with him,
and taken his money! I remember now, he only
took a fip's worth, and got no change for his
quarter
.
I must go an' see Mr. Gowler. We're sorely
beset, sorely beset in this world!
Here, some of the people half in jest, half in
earnest, called on Mr. Chesterton for a sermon.
Now, at once perceiving their impression, he
hastened
away, followed, though, by a considerable
number, who thought he was seeking a proper
stand for holding forth; nor did he get rid of them
till he entered a hack and ordered the man to
drive away.
CHAPTER XVI.
With
all his energies, Bradshaw devoted
himself
to electioneering. In the neighbourhood of the
Purchase, he completely stole a march on Mr.
Carlton, as he, before that wily gentleman was
aware, had visited all the old farmers, who knew
him when a boy, and their sons, with whom he had
grown up to manhood, and interested them in his
success. He knew he had to contend against the
united influence of wealth, and long established,
and extensive political connexions. If Bradshaw
had been consulted himself, on the propriety of his
being a candidate in opposition to Mr. Carlton, he
would have refused, in all probability. But when
he found, that a very large meeting had
voluntarily
nominated him in his absence, and that the
friends of Carlton, in public and in private, by
speech and by the press, were leaving no stones
unturned, not even the dirtiest, to injure his
character
,
personal and political, he determined, come
what might, to be a candidate. Having made this
determination, he knew well, that to place himself
on the course, with any chance of success, it was
necessary his exertions should be untiring.
Therefore
,
long before the usual time for calling the
meetings, at which the candidates addressed the
voters from the stump, Bradshaw again and again
visited his political friends in town and country.
He frankly told them why he was so anxious;
that he felt it a personal as well as political
matter
.
But he made no noise in his operations:
apparently, he was leisurely strolling through
town with little to occupy him; gallanting a lady,
may be, when observed on the main streets, and,
when seen in obscure places, appearing to have no
particular purposewith a group at a corner
he paused but a moment, like a passer-by, who
has been caught by a casual remark, or who stops
to make one. As usual, he went on Sundays to
the country church, but there was nothing of the
electioneerer in his manners; they were unchanged.
His courtesy obtained no increase, and he did not
appear more anxious than formerly, to recognise
an old acquaintance, or to form new ones.
Bradshaw had a quality which Lord Bacon has
praised in Csar; a singular power of
extinguishing
envy. He conversed with men generally upon
such topics as they wished, and upon which he
knew them acquainted; he never appeared
solicitous
of distinction; he never assumed; he never
seemed doubtful of men's regard, nor anxious for
it; he was not the least envious of the standing of
other men, and he took his place in all companies
as if every body knew it was his, and he himself
thought not at all upon it, but was thereno
matter
how flattering the situationif we may so
express
ourselvesnaturally. He never seemed to
dream that any one, however wealthy or renowned,
27*
had the least wish, or would dare for a moment, by
slightest word, or tone, or look in his presence, to
derogate from his standing or character, (a great
point, by the by, in character, this last.)
Willoughby, said Cavendish to Kentuck, one
day, did you ever see such a fellow as Bradshaw!
He takes all this abuse on one side, and puff on the
other, as a matter of course; how he has schooled
himself, or something else!
That's a fact! was the reply. The truth is,
Judge, Bradshaw never seems to presume the least,
and he has the profoundest admiration for talent,
and would show all deference to its possessor, did he
meet him at a dinner party or ball; but the moment
Bradshaw was his competitor at the bar, in
congress
,
any where, that moment he would act, as if
he were the equal of the greatest man he might so
meet, and he has the knack of making the
by-standers
think it is perfectly a fair match`Greek
meeting Greek.' His friends never feel for him in
any situation; the truth is, his ambition is of the
loftiest, and he feels now that he is just getting
upon the course, where he has a right to enter
among the full bloods; and as his strength never yet
has been tested, no one knows what he can do.
The other day Bradshaw and I dined with
Wortley
;
the old fellow finds that Bradshaw may be a
spoke in his wheel, (for though he knows Clinton
is opposed to his pretensions to the presidency, yet
it is his character to conciliate,) and he was all
courtesy.
Was Carlton there?
O! yes, Bradshaw and he spoke not to each
other. Well, W was there, the great lion;
he voted with Carlton on this certain measure, you
know; and, of course, he and Bradshaw differ.
W lugged the measure into conversation, I
thought with a spirit bent on controversy; Carlton
doing all he could to draw him out. It was not
exactly the place, at a dinner table; however,
W talked hard at Bradshaw for some time: I
thought him really personal. Bradshaw bore it
till he could bear it no longer, and then he entered
the list. It was a large dinner party, and all were
hushed at the self-possessed sarcastic way
Bradshaw
took him up. Well, Bradshaw three times
set him right with regard to opinions which W
attributed to distinguished men of the revolution;
and gave him chapter and verse; and he showed
in every respect more knowledge of the subject,
more self-possession, and more power. Nobody
seemed to think, what is a fact, that he has been
thinking upon that subject these six months. He
met Carlton upon it, at the meeting called on
Carlton's
return; and he has since been preparing
himself
,
still on this theme, for the coming stump
meetings
.
You have no idea how Bradshaw studies
even his stump speeches. I don't mean the
language
;
that he leaves pretty much to the impulse
of the occasion. But there is not a point that may
come up in this contest, that Bradshaw has not
made himself master of thoroughly. He could get
up now out of his bed, if he is in it, and express
his opinions, on any subject Carlton may chose to
touch upon, right out; and he'll give you the why
and wherefore, apparently, as extemporaneously
as the morning salutation.
Weeks rolled on. Bradshaw and Carlton had
had many stern encounters on the stump. The
election day approached. The press on both sides
was daily becoming more rabid: both sides were
sanguine. Handbills began to be circulated.
Often, from the stern strife of politicsa strife
with her father, in which every weapon had been
used to wound him personallydid Bradshaw turn,
in thought, to Mary Carlton, and check the
vehemence
of his passion; but, with unconquerable will,
he kept his energies ever watchful, and his spirit
ever firm. Twice he had written to Mary, but
had received no answer. His sister, with Mr.
Chesterton
and Willoughby, had taken a pleasure jaunt
to a neighbouring cityor, rather, they had
attended
Mr. Bradshaw, who had gone on some
important
business to his church, to a general
conference
there; and, from her, he could not hear of
Mary. A friend, who had passed through the
upper
part of the state, told him that he had called
to see Miss Carlton, who, he understood, was with
Mrs. Holliday, at a medicinal spring, which was
celebrated for its waters; and that he was told she
was not in good healthbut he did not see her.
Not well! Why don't I hear from Mary? 'Tis
strange! Such thoughts would occur to
Bradshaw
a thousand times, in the course of the day;
but they would be as often banished by the
exciting
scenes in which he was an actor, or by the
reflectionShe does not like to be here while the
contest is going on between her father and myself.
She might, at least, write to me. Perhaps she has.
The letter may have miscarried: some foul work,
may be,and again he would be called from love
to ambition.
Man's love is, of man's life, a thing apart:
'Tis woman's whole existence!
Where is Mary Carlton?
Daughter! said Mr. Carlton to Mary, a few
days after she had left town, and while she was
with Mrs. Holliday, on a farm, where we have said
that lady was spending a few weeks, whither Mary
Carlton had gone to consult her, and where her
father
had followed her, a few days afterwards
Daughter, (the tone was full of gentleness,
changed, indeed, from their last meeting,) my dear
daughter, I was wrong, very wrong, in wishing you,
so peremptority, to marry Mr. Wortley: let that
passforget it. What can I have, but your
happiness
,
in view? You are my only child. I have
none else to leave my fortune to. I was wrong
but, be assured, it is true what I have told you:
this Bradshaw is unworthy of you. This girlthis
Jane Durhamis a creature, whom, some years
since, he defended for murder, and, by some
unexpected
management, contrived to save from condign
punishment. I'm told she is a woman of some
attractions
;
but you may judge what she is, when
she was found in that miserable lane, and accused
of murder. Be a woman, my daughterthank
God you are saved from him. I have not minced
the matter with you. She has been, from that time
to thisall the while he was wooing youhis
mistress
.
There is no doubt of it. An intimate friend
of mine, who has your interests, your welfare,
deeply
at heart, informed me of the fact. You have
observed, yourself, that the newspapers which I
sent you, darkly hinted of it. Before the election
day, which is now drawing very near, there will
be, I expect, a public exposition of the business.
Bradshaw has acted, they say, with great perfidy
though that I cannot well believe, in this instance;
for she was a wretched thing, fit for any deed, when
he saw her. We have talked it over two or three
times. Now, daughter, I don't want you to be
precipitate. Remain here till after the election is
overthat's all I ask of youso that you will not be
subject to his wily arts; for, be assured, though he
loves you, my daughter, so much, as he says,yet,
you may be sure, such is his anxiety to defeat your
father in this election, that he will not seek you
he will not think of you; and, surely, your woman's
pride, your sense of self-respect, will prevent you
from throwing yourself in his way. Consult your
aunt, my daughteryou think her your best friend
consult her. I have spoken with herconsult
her. Be a woman, daughterbe a woman. Good
bye. I must hurry to town. This man, who has
so much love for you, my daughter, spares not, on
that account, your father. In all my lifenow, I
may say, an old man, at least, in comparison with
him; for I am old enough to be his father,in all
my life, I never have been met with such bold and
unsparing denunciation, and sarcastic levity and
ridicule
,
totally devoid of all respect, as from this man.
But it is not on my own account, daughter, I thus
speak to you'tis for you. I would save you. I
know you are indebted to his family for kindnesses;
but do not let your regard for them plead for him.
I did not think you would be grieved so much. Be
a woman, daughter. And the father took his leave,
mounted his horse, and hastened to town.
Merciful God! exclaimed Mary, after her
father
had left the room, take this load off my heart!
Oh! take this load from off my heartor break it,
in thy mercy!break it, and let me die! No!
she continued, wildly walking across the roomI
will not, must not, cannot, believe it. Can Clinton
be so false, so base?have we not grown up
together
?
Yes! yes!and this love has twined itself
into my very being. If it be true, my woman's
pride shall support me, though I die! My father
never was so kind to mehe seemed to feel for me.
Now, I remembernow, I remember: Clinton did
not deny he laughed in the court-house, when
Talbot
spoke of my engagement to Mr. Wortley; but
itall this my father has told memay be a trick
of Talbot's. But my aunt seems to believeshe,
who thought so much of Clinton. O! his baseness!
The day of the trial he spoke to Jane Durham, and
went with her to the jailhis perfidy! to come to
me, with his endearments, from this wanton's
She buried her face in her hands. There's aunt
coming. I will consult her. Aunt, what shall I
do? said Mary, struggling to be self-possessed.
My dear niece, said Mrs. Holliday, taking her
hand affectionately, I do not know what to think
of it. I have always believed that Clinthat Mr.
Bradshaw was attached to you. I have always
thought him a young man of high honour; and I
have often looked forward to the time, with pride
and pleasure, when you and he would be one;
(Mary wept;) butbut, if this is true; and, really,
these hints in the newspaperwhat your father
sayswhat I told you Nancy, the apple-woman,
said to me, when this girl was triedit had slipped
my mind, as an idle gossip, until I heard your
father's
account, and then it occurred to me,I can
hardly believe it, Mary, after all; but, dear, we
will go to the springs, and stay there awhile. Be
comforted: all may yet be well; but if it is true,
niece, you must forget him.
Mary spoke not for a moment, and then
exclaimed
,
I will try, I willbut, aunt weIlet
us go to the springs; let us go to the springs, aunt.
Mrs. Holliday left the room, and Mary continued
to herselfI had no letter from Clinton, from
county; he said he would write. He will not write
to me here, expecting me home; nor will Emily.
If he does write, what's that to me?I will return
them; he shall explain all his conductandand
he willhe will.
Accordingly, Mary and her aunt passed into the
interior of the state, to the springs. But Mary
could not quiet her spirit, or regain her vivacity;
she tried to rally her pridefor there was much
of it in her character; but for once it failed. Her
first girlish preference had been for Bradshaw, and
never, for one moment, had a rival crossed him in
her dream of love. If she had reached
womanhood
before love usurped her thought, and fancy
free' had gone forth into the world, the courted
of many, before she made a choice, such was her
character, that, perhaps, she never could have
been o'er mastered by the passion so entirely. But,
the boy who won her hearthow superior to all
the boys around him! and the man who held her
heart, had realized more than the promises of his
boyhood had given. The voice, that in itself was
the most eloquent she had ever heard, had gushed
out in tenderness to herhad praised her above all,
in her childhood. The eye, that in itself was the
brightest she had ever seen, for years had looked
in hers with glances that, each year, the more told
her were love's. That voice had grown deeper;
there was more pathos in it; and the eye had
grown darker, and there was more fire in its beam;
but voice nor eye had not altered in the passion
they expressed; they had but learned to express
it with more intense power. The past to her was
but a memory of himand to the future she had
sent hope forth like the dove from the ark; it had
returned with a promise, and gone forth again and
found a resting place. Alas! thought she, where
the bitter waters must o'erwhelm me.
At last, after they had been at the springs some
time, Mary said to her aunt, My dear aunt, this
doubt, with nothing to confirm or destroy it, I
cannot
bear; let us go to town. There may bethere
is something false and foul in all this: at least,
when I see Emily, I will speak plainly to her and
to Clinton, and know the truth, and act
accordingly
.
I cannot bear thislet us go, my dear aunt,
to town; come, do, dearest aunt, let us go; we will
get in just after the electionif it is true, it is all
told: this suspense, I cannot bear it. I am peevish,
aunt, forgive meand she threw her arms round
her aunt's neck, and sobbed aloud.
Vol. II. 28
To please Mary, Mrs. Holliday, who felt a
mother's
attachment for her, immediately gave orders
for their departure. They travelled the first half
day in her carriage; but, in making a sudden turn,
in a declivity of the road, which was very rough,
the fore wheel of the vehicle was broken. Luckily,
no one was hurt; but, in such an out of the way
place, it was impossible soon to get the wheel
repaired. The accommodation stage came up as
they were standing beside the broken carriage, and
deliberating what to do. There were, happily,
vacant
seats in it; and the baggage was transferred
from the carriage, which was left in the charge of
the coachman, with orders to have it repaired, and
away dashed the stage. Travelling in the stage,
they arrived in town sooner than was their
calculation
,
when they started in Mrs. Holliday's
carriage
,
as they travelled much faster. It was on
the evening previous to the election, an hour after
nightfall, that the stage dashed into the city.
Where shall I set you down? asked the driver
of the passengers.
Mrs. Holliday told where her residence was.
Another passenger said, that his residence was
immediately
on the way to Mrs. Holliday's. Do
you know, asked he, where Mr. Glassman
lives?
What? Glassman the lawyer?
Yes.
I live just three doors above.
Ay, ay, ejaculated the driver.
The stage soon stopped at the last mentioned
passenger's door; a hack that had been rattling
behind
it for the last square, stopped at the door
immediately
below. Mary Carlton was seated on
the back seat of the stage next to the house, and
having heard that June Durham lived near
Glassman's
,
her attention was acutely directed to the
hack. Let's have a light! said the stage driver
to the passenger, as the latter descended from the
vehicle, and tell us which is your trunk?
At the moment the stage passenger returned
with a light, the door of the house below opened,
and two personsa male and female came forth.
Mary Carlton started, could it be Clinton
Bradshaw
,
and was that the girl he defended for
murder
?
The female took the man's arm, the hack
door was opened, and as he was assisting her in,
she said, in a soft voice
Wait one moment, I have forgotten something.
She turned, and in a quick step re-entered the
house. The man advanced towards the stage and
asked the driver, Jerry, what to they say of the
election up the country?
At this moment, the light shone full upon the
face of the speaker, and Mary Carlton recognised
at once, the voice and the features of Clinton
Bradshaw.
Squire, is that you? said Jerry, leaving a strap
half unbuckled, and advancing to take Bradshaw's
proffered hand.
Yes, Jerry: how goes the election in the
county?
Why, squire, at Pottstown, you'll have to
crack your whip the hardestI'm mightily
thinking
the old chap 'll beat you thereat long swamp,
it'll be neck and neck, continued Jerry, resuming
his occupation, as Bradshaw turned towards the
female, who, at this moment, descended the steps
of the door below: but they do say, that all
round the country, by your fathers'I was up
through there dealing in horses, last weekthey
do say, that you'll beat him.
Are you ready, Jane? said Bradshaw to the
female.
Yes, said she, and he handed her into the
carriage, and followed himself, calling out as the
door closed on himGood night to you, Jerry;
crack your whip loud, to-morrow, Jerry, and have
your hacks out early.
Ay, ay, squire, there's no miss in me, replied
Jerry, as the hack drove off. There's your trunk,
continued Jerry, to the passenger. Dang it! this
here smashed buckle kept me a long time. The
squire's a keenerhe's wide awake on all pints, I
tell youI wonder what he's after, now. Gosh!
he'll run to-morrow like furies.
I hope not, said the passenger, as Jerry
mounted his box, but I wouldn't care much
where he runs, if he wouldn't run to
Ha, ha! exclaimed Jerry, cracking his whip,
you don't bet on him, heyyou go for the old
racer; and away rattled the stage.
Come, niece, love, get out, my dear, said
Mrs. Holliday, who had descended from the stage,
at her door, and stood offering her hand to Mary.
Yes, aunt, yes, said Mary, mechanically
stepping out, and entering the house with her
aunt. It's true, aunt; it's all true, said she,
throwing herself on the sofa;it's all true: dear,
dear aunt, shall we go back again?
CHAPTER XVII.
The
day of the election was one of great
excitement
.
Long before the polls were opened,
groups might be seen at the corners, and in other
places discussing the prospects of the candidates;
and through the whole day hacks were traversing
the city, in all directions, bringing up the maimed,
the halt, and the blind, to the polls. Horsemen
dashed from ward to ward, from county to town,
and from town to county, in restless desire, to
ascertain
the state of the election; or bound, perhaps,
on some tricky errand of manuvring or betting.
All sorts of reports, and rumours of reports, were
current, of the changes in such a township, of the
effect produced in such a ward, by such a speech,
of the great odds offered in a bet that was refused,
of the injury such a handbill had done such a
candidate
in a certain quarter, &c. &c. Just after the
polls were opened, handbills were circulated in
quantities, giving a purient account of an
unfortunate
young creature, named Jane Durham, who
had been seduced, and abducted no one knew
whither, by Bradshaw. It was alleged, that he
had forced her into a hack the previous evening,
and that, since, she had not been heard of, &c. &c.
An account somewhat inconsistent with previous
reports, as related by Mr. Carlton to his daughter.
28*
With indefatigable perseverance, Bradshaw
visited
the polls throughout the town, and in the
county, as far as time and distance would permit.
The place of voting in one of the wards was at the
hotel, immediately opposite Mrs. Holliday's; and
Mary Carlton sat at the window, a most unhappy
observer of the crowd. The handbill charging
her lover with the seduction of Jane Durham, had
been thrown in the door, and Sue had brought it
to her. With heavy heart, she now sat looking
into the bustling streetthe scene fell with a deep
depression on her feelingsHe will be elected,
she thought, and think no more of me, I ought
to thank heaven that he quarrelled with my
father
,
or I never should have discovered his
character
,
until too late. With what seeming
tenderness
he helped that poor deceived creature into
the carriage last night! While indulging such
sad thoughts, which she in vain attempted to
banish
from her mind, she at once was startled from
her vacant look at the crowd, on beholding
Bradshaw
ride up rapidly to the polls. He was on
horseback; and the moment his friends recognised,
they gathered around him. He laughed and talked
gaily with them, while they eagerly shook hands
with him. She observed him cast his eye
towards
the house. He does not think of me, she
thought. In a minute he descended from his horse,
and, giving the reins to a boy standing by, crossed
the street. Will he dare, said Mary to herself,
with an indignant countenance, will he dare to
come here? She had scarcely said it, when
Bradshaw, who stopped not to ring the bell,
entered
the room. He sprang towards her, but she
started back, with a beautiful disdain upon her
lip, and with averted head, waved him away with
her hand.
Why, Mary, are you angry, love? In what
have I offended? You are like Sheridan's
description
of justice, `lovely, though in your frown'
Justice, sirbegone! carry your false words
and your falseMr. Bradshaw, this is intrusion,
sir. Will you not go? If you will not leave the
room, I must.
Mary, explain to me the meaning of all this.
I understand you not!
I understand
you
, sir, thoroughly. I'm a
witness
,
though not a willing witness, of yourwords
are idle. Allow me the privilege of choosing my
own company, Mr. Bradshawor, if you are
determined
to remain, I bid you good morning, sir.
Mary, this is some strange mistake. Explain
why not explain? In what have I offended you?
to what do you allude? Has Talbot again
No, sir; no Talbot again. Your friends are
calling you, sirif you are determined to entertain
them in my aunt's house, you must excuse my
presence
.
She walked towards the folding-doors.
Bradshaw heard his name called repeatedly, in
the street. Advancing to Mary, he asked, Shall
I have no explanation, Mary? I conjure you, by
every thing you hold sacred, to tell me what this
means? If there islet me know what there is
I am myself a witness, sir. I was in the stage,
and saw you bear off thatthat woman.
At this moment, one of Bradshaw's friends, who
was a little elated, and who had seen him enter
Mrs. Holliday's, followed after, regardless of time
and place, in his anxiety to inform him of the
handbill
against him. As Bradshaw turned to him, Mary
Carlton left the room. Bradshaw led his political
friend out, for he required some assistance, and,
after listening to his maudlin talk for some time,
he, with great difficulty, got rid of him.
I see it, said he to himself, as he mounted his
horse; I understand it now. Carlton has told
Mary of this Jane Durham case; and she saw me
with her last night. Talbot is at the bottom of all
thishis time's come. What a spirit spoke in
Mary's eye! What dignitybutII
Here one of Bradshaw's friends rode up to him,
and away they went together.
Bradshaw, you must stir your stumps, said his
friend, as they rode rapidly off: the old fellow's
running like the deuce. These infernal handbills
were out, in the upper part of the county,
yesterday
,
and the report is that they are doing you
a great injury among the farmers.
Let us return to Mary.
Where did these books come from, Sue?
asked Mary Carlton, of the servant girl, as the
latter entered her room, with a number of
souvenirs
and annuals in her hand.
Mr. Longshore, ma'am, who cleans Mr.
Bradshaw's
office, brought them, miss. He says Mr.
Bradshaw sent 'em.
Ay, he
cleans
his office! is that it? and sends
me home my books. Put them on the foot of the
bed, by me, Sue;and, Sue, I'm not at home if
any body should call.Emily BradshawDid
you see Pete in the market this morning?
O! yes, Miss Mary, and I forgot it till this
minute. Miss Emily got home late last night.
If she should come in, Sue, of course, I'm
home; but come and tell me when she comes,
first, before I see her. Do I look as if I were not
well, Sue?
You looks a little pale, Miss Mary; and your
voice sounds a little as if you
No matterOh! no matter!As if you
what?
As if you were troubled, Miss Mary.
There, put the books there.Don't shut the
door.
Mary Carlton opened one of the books, and in
a blank leaf cast her eyes on some hastily written
lines, in Bradshaw's handwriting. With a quick
glance she read
The tears of early love are like
The gentle rains of spring;
They fall while sunshine laughs, and birds,
Like hope, are on the wing.
Thus, when first we parted, Mary,
We wept away the pain,
While passion, like the opening bud,
Grew in the dewy rain.
But when love is wrapped in wo,
And tears refuse to start,
Then has the arid season come
That withers up the heart.
Thus, when last we parted, Mary,
There fell no dewy rain,
And dry will be the fountains, Mary,
Ere we meet again.
That `arid season' has, indeed, come, said
Mary; that `dewy rain' can fall no more! no
more!and she buried her head in her pillow,
and burst into a flood of tears.
Late in the afternoon, we next find Bradshaw.
With now a bent and angry brow, and now a
gentle smile, he was talking with his sister, at
the door of the Purchase; Pete was standing at
the gate, holding his horse: the animal was all in
a foam.
Tell her all, my dear sisteras you love me,
tell her all! were the words he was uttering as
we thus find him.
My dear brother, I willI will, if I
understand
you; but you speak very incoherently.
Here, give her this letter'tis Talbot's own
confession. She'll understandmy friends wait
for methey'll wonder, in town, where I amit
may hurt my election. 'Tis this way, Emily,
'tis this way,listen, dearest sister, to me,as
Kentuck has told you, Talbot, in a most
dastardly
manner, attempted my life in an oyster cellar
the day Johnsonyou were at the trialwas
tried for murder. We only suspected it at the
time. Sincethe other daytwo gentlemen who
were taking oysters in an adjoining room, came to
me, knowing the manner Talbot was acting in this
election, came to me, and gave me a certificate
that they saw him cock the pistol and fire at me
while my back was turned, and I was opening the
door to let Kentuck in; Kentuck persuaded me not
to publish the certificate, to wait till after the
election
.
This morning I saw MaryI have told you
of what passed between us. Talbot, I knew, was
at the bottom of the reportthe handbill. Mary
was in the stageshe saw me hand Jane Durham
into a hacktell her that Glassman is in the
hospital
insane, after a fit of intemperance: I heard of
it late in the afternoon. I took Jane Durham to
see himshe is the only one who can do any thing
with him. That's alltell her so, on my honour.
I have ridden away out in the country,Talbot
got up this handbillhe skulked away. A fellow
who lives just above Jane Durham's, a friend of
Carlton's, told him of this `seduction and
abduction
.'
I showed himTalbotthe certificates, and
threatened to publish them. I told him so before his
father and family; and he made the confession, to
prevent the publication. Tell Mary all, do,
dearest
sister, allall. Ride right in, sisterI must
be offget her to come out to the Purchase with
you; she will, I know, if you persuade her. I will
be out by twelve o'clock to-nightthe expresses
will be all in then, and we shall know who is
elected
Bradshaw
mounted his horse. Oh, sis!I
saw Sue, as I was starting from town to go in
search of Talbot; from what I gathered from her,
Mary thought I returned those books, in
consequence
of what took place this morning: at least,
so I suspect. Say to Mary, that Cavendish and I
had taken another office; and I ordered the man,
when he moved the books, to take Mary's to her.
God bless youwe shall know by twelve o'clock
who's electedbring Mary out with youshow
her the lettershe'll come.
Clinton! Clinton! called out Emily, don't
harm Talbot. Oh, do not expose him!
Not I, my fair sis. Show that letter to Mary
not I. But he may thank Kentuck for it; I
would have done itblazoned his infamy to the
world. I told him to-day what my uncle Toby said
to the flybut not in his benevolent spirit; and I
made a kind of exception, I told him there was
room enough in the wide world for both of us, but
not in our small city; so he'll take up his line of
march, and he and Scrags may hang out their
banners
as leaders in whatever city of refuge
scoundrels
most do congregate; but not when there's
any courage to be displayed. Pete, I owe you a
fip; I can't stop to put my hand in my pocket
come right in, sisand away he dashed.
On reaching the city, Bradshaw rode
immediately
to Jackson's livery stable, changed his horse, and
then proceeded to visit the different wards. People
were rushing to the polls, as the hour of closing
them drew near, and a great excitement prevailed.
Both sides were sanguine, and betting ran very
high; but without any odds given on either side:
or, if on either, by the friends of Carlton. Night
closed in, and the people gathered in crowds around
the printing offices to hear the returns, as they
were brought in by express. The friends of
Carlton
congregated round the Gazette office, and those
of Bradshaw round the Mechanics' Advocate, (
Jekyl's
.)
Though the offices were several squares
apart, one party could distinctly hear the shouts
and hurras of the other, as the returns were read.
When there was a shout at the Gazette office, a
dead silence reigned over the multitude by Jekyl's,
and whenever they shouted, no echo came from
the other quarterwhile individuals might be seen
hastening from one office to the other, anxious to
know what were the reports among their opponents,
and to discover from their tone and conversation,
their hopes and fears. The night went on leaden
wings. At last an express from the county came
in, all the townships were heard from, except the
Purchase.
It's very strange, said Jekyl, we don't hear
from Purchase township.
It has been
bought up
, exclaimed some punster.
A great many votes were taken there.
Carlton
,
you say, is a-head one hundred and thirty,
said Bradshaw. Close scratching, by Jove!
According
to their calculation, what majority did they
give me in that township?
Not more than fifty, said one.
You're wrong, said Jekyl,one hundred.
How many votes have been counted at the
Purchase? asked Bradshaw.
I don't knowbut that's the largest township.
How many votes were taken?
Don't knowbut they say a larger number
than ever was taken before.
That counts in my favour, said Bradshaw
at least, I think so. Hear how the Carlton men
are shouting! It comes on the night breeze, a
complete
whoop of exultation. You're not through the
woods yet, gentlemen. I've been thoroughly
through that township, and
I'm afeared we're a case, Mr. Bradshaw!
interrupted
one.
Hear how the fools shout! said Geirson, the
man in whose behalf Bradshaw made his first
speech.
Yes!hear to 'em! said another.
Wait awhile, boys. I think I know the
Purchase
.
If there were as many votes polled there
Vol. II. 29
as is generally believed, I'll run him hard. I may
turn a sharp corner on him, yet.
We hope so, squire!we hope so! exclaimed
they, simultaneously.
At this moment, a great bustle was heard
without
,
while the shouts from the Carlton quarter
ceased.
The last express is in! called out the crowd.
The news! the news!
Bradshaw's elected! called out Jekyl. He
leads, in Purchase township, three hundred votes!
By Jove! exclaimed Bradshaw, dashing the
tear from his eye: that gives me more pleasure
than the victory. The lads that I have grown up
with, were true to their old school-mate. I thought
they would be. I thought I knew them.
Let's shout like thunder! exclaimed Geirson,
and let the other fellows hear
us
now.
Jekyl announced to the crowd without, the vote,
and they made the welkin ring again with their
cheers. Bradshaw! Bradshaw! Bradshaw!
they shouted. Lights were placed in the window,
at which Bradshaw made his appearance; and,
after being greeted with the most enthusiastic
hurras
,
he returned his thanks to his friends, in
language
glowing from the heartin a manner that
almost reconciled those of his opponents, who
chanced to be by, to his election.
After this, a procession, headed by a band of
music
,
was formed by Bradshaw's friends, and they
escorted
him to Broadbelt's establishment, where they
insisted upon having another speech from him.
Bradshaw found at Broadbelt's Mr. Chesterton,
together
with Selman and Cavendish, and, on asking
for Kentuck, he was told, that, as soon as the result
was known, he had mounted his horse and gone to
the Purchase. Bradshaw burned to follow him,
but he could not tear himself away from his friends.
The pedagogue, rod in hand, chased the
urchin
hard, said the Judge, but the urchin out-ran
him.
Ha! ha! you're alluding, exclaimed Mr.
Chesterton
,
ughyou're alluding to my caricature,
hey! not a bad notion that. Boy, (to Bradshaw,)
this southern sun improves the puritan breed
your mother is a southerner, hey! you'll see what
a race Willy 'll raise: by theughby, speaking
of such thing, I saw old Carlton at Mrs. Holliday's.
Was Mary there?
Ughughwhy do you interrupt? I didn't
see her. I told the old fellow, plumply, that he
had been deceived by that wily dogugh
Talbot
,
and that his daughter would have you, and he
couldn't help itughhe was as wrothy as Mrs.
Pomonamy apple womanmy goddess, ha! ha!
said he wouldn't give her one centughugh
he's rabid. I told him, if things worked right,
(winking at Bradshaw,) he might be senator, if he
was beaten for Congress. Egad! he takes it hard:
he raged; he blew like a porpoisebut I'll
manage
him.
Bradshaw stole away from Mr. Chesterton,
whispered
to Cavendish he was not very well, and
requested
him, if any one should ask for him, to say
that he was so much fatigued and unwell, that he
had gone home.
I will, Bradshaw; you ought to go; you look
worn out: they'll excuse you; but don't let them
see you going. I don't often frolic; but I am
determined
to go it to-night. We'll drink to you in
bumpers. Selman's married now; a tipsy frolic
won't harm him as much as formerlyhey, Hal?
It was on Bradshaw's account that I got high
before, said Selman, with some little confusion,
and he got me off; so, if I go in for it now, and
there's anyahem, clearing his throat,
Bradshaw
must bear the blame, and plead the cause.
`It is the cause, it is the cause,' hey, Bradshaw, as
Othello says.
Ah! Selman, said Bradshaw, shaking his hand,
if matrimony has reconciled you to quotations, I
know you're a happy man. So saying, Bradshaw
stole away. After some little delay at the livery
stable, he obtained a horse; and, giving him the
spur and the rein, he went with the speed of Dick
Turpin, or Mazeppa, but with far different
feelings
.
He dashed on with a swelling heart. I
have my foot on the ladder, said he, and I'll
mounthow our neighbours stuck to me!it made
me feel prouder than I ever in my life felt before.
When Carlton and I met at the Purchase polls
to-day
,
and the old farmers gathered round me, and
left him alone in his glory, I felt like Rob Roy on
his native heath, when he proclaimed himself
M`Gregor. And my old schoolmates, how they
stood for me; and Kentuck, Selman, Jekyl, the
Judge, old Chesterton, true as steelTalbot's
expatriated
,
hey! I've done good deeds to-day; and, by
the light of heaven, if ever he return to the city,
that certificatehis infamy, shall go forth upon the
four winds. And Mary, the only woman I have
ever lovedmy boyhood's worshipmy manhood's
passion, idolatry, pridehow wasted and wan she
looked! I felt at once, deep in my heart's core,
how much I loved her. And shehow completely
a woman. That wan look of hers; though pride,
wounded pride, flashed in her eye, told me, indeed,
I was beloved. I do love such a spirit as hers; and
then her all-surpassing beauty, and her gifts of
intellect
Clinton
Bradshaw, he exclaimed, rising
in his stirrups, and speaking to his horse, that at
the word sprang forward at full speed; Clinton
Bradshaw, you will win your way in this broad
world. 'Tis a good omen to be the elected of your
lady love, and your countrymen, on the same day.
But is Mary at the Purchase?am I her elected?
I trust in God Emily has explained it all. There's
the moon; she is above the clouds, at last; they
obscure her path no moreshe is leaving them like
young ambitiongloriously she beameth.
Here he reached the Purchase gate: his horse
was so restless and excited, that he could not turn
his head to the gate, so as to open it. He had to
dismount. As he threw the gate open, the horse,
with a bound, broke from him, and darted away.
You're a free spirit! exclaimed Bradshaw,
and good luck to you! As the nearest way to the
house, Bradshaw cut across the orchard that was
intersected by the lane; and in this direction he
approached the side of the dwelling. The house
was an old-fashioned one, as we have said, of but
one story. Through the shutters of his father's
Vol. II. 30
chamber, which were partly open, he saw a light
streaming. He trod noiselessly, and looked in
He beheld his father on his knees, by a stand on
which stood a light. A Bible was open before him,
and, with his hands extended on the open page,
he was praying fervently. There was no one in
the room but his father, and Bradshaw stood with
filial awe contemplating the picture. The light
shone full upon his parent's long gray hairs, amidst
which it beamed, while his fine features wore the
expression of deep devotion. Intensely Bradshaw
listened.
Oh, most holy Father! said the parent, in a
fervent voice, as thou hast vouchsafed to bestow
upon him a superior minda mind to control his
fellowsguide and guard him in the path of
rectitude
,
and patriotismendue him from on high
with the energy of virtue. Let the stern love
of liberty of conscience, which brought his
forefathers
to this happy land, sink deep into his heart.
Make him thy servant, Father. Teach him to act
for thy glory, and for thy people's good. Make
him the succour of the friendlessthe righter of
the wronged. Let not a usurping ambition
mislead
him from thee. Temper and chasten his
spirit in its aspirings; and let them only be in the
cause of virtue and of truth. Teach him to know
what thy Son has taught; and oh, enable him to
practise it! Give him strength from on high,
most holy Father! And, Parent of all mercy,
if thy servant has felt vain-glorious in his
success
;
if I have nursed an unchristian pride,
forgive
Here
Mr. Bradshaw bowed his head
upon the Bible, and his voice became so tremulous
that his son could not hear him. Clinton leaned
against the house, and wept. At this moment he
heard a voice within a few feet of him, say, in
soliloquy
,
I wonder Clinton does not come. Oh,
what a load is from my heart!
He turnedit was Mary Carlton, who, when
the moon shone forth, had stepped out to look
and listen for him.
Marymy Mary! said Bradshaw.
Clinton, oh Clinton! and she threw her arms
around him, and buried her head in his bosom.
THE END.